You heard me. Thank God. I'm Kareen Brianon, Doctor Graves' assistant.
We're from a ship called the Enterprise. We monitored your distress call but then you never acknowledged our response.
I'm sorry, I couldn't take the chance.
Chance? What chance?
The chance that I might find out someone was coming. Kareen knew full well that I would not be pleased, to put it mildly.
I had no choice. I refuse to stand by and watch you deteriorate.
What symptoms have you noticed?
He has pain, shortness of breath, irritability.
Ridiculous! I'm as healthy as a Rigelian ox!
He's not himself, believe me. His temper is completely out of control.
Nonsense!
Ira!
I am a doctor. Lieutenant Selar.
No offense, but I don't want you touching me in any way. It's no secret that I don't like people much, and I like doctors even less.
That's funny, I thought most doctors were people.
Then you're wrong. Ask any patient. Although I will admit, for a doctor you're not a bad looking woman. Well, well, well, what have we got here? Another lovely specimen of womanhood.
I thought you didn't like people.
Women aren't people. They're women.
I'm Deanna Troi. It's an honour to meet you, Doctor Graves.
Yes, of course it is. This is one of the truly great moments of your life.
Excuse me, sir. Are you a Romulan?
Hardly.
He's a Klingon, Kareen. Kareen has lived here since her father died when she was very young. Her only knowledge of unhuman races comes from me. Klingons and Romulans don't look much alike, Kareen, even though they act much alike.
Must I stand here and be insulted?
No insult intended, Mister Klingon. You see, Doctor, there's nothing wrong with my hearing. My, my, my, my.
Lieutenant Commander Data
Shhh! Absolutely no aesthetic value whatsoever. Looks like Soong's work.
Quite correct, sir! Did you know Doctor Soong?
Know him?! I taught him everything he knows. You could say that I was the father of his work. Which kind of makes me your grandfather, doesn't it sonny? Damn doctors! Always sneaking up on one. Attacking from the rear. Go on, gorgeous. Spit it out. Whatever the hell it is, I can take it.
I've checked twice to make certain. You have Darnay's disease. I'm sorry, Doctor Graves. It's in it's final stage.
Can't you do something for him?
In all cases, Darnay's is terminal.
Captain's log, Stardate 42437.7. We've successfully repaired the stricken liner, Constantinople. Forty six of her people suffered injuries, mostly minor. They have been treated and supplied with the proper medicines. Our task complete, we are heading back to Gravesworld with great dispatch.
I have noticed, Doctor
Call me Grandpa. Seems more touching in my final hours.
I have noticed, Grandpa, that you keep repeating the same notes of a musical phrase I am unfamiliar with.
It's an ancient little tune called 'If I Only Had A Heart.' A plaintive lament sung by a mechanical man who longs to be human. It's his only wish.
What happens to this man?
He finds out he's human after all. Always was. Just worried so much, he never realised it.
A happy ending. The mechanical man gets his wish.
Stories often have happy endings. It's life that throws you for a loop. It must be so hard for you, to be so close to being human and yet never really knowing what it's like to know pain.
But pain is unpleasant, is it not?
Pain. Lust. Envy. Pleasure. Desire. Do you know what desire is, Data?
Desire? To long for, to crave, a wish, a request, a
Do you know what desire is?
No. I do not suppose I will ever really know.
I feel pity for you. Your existence must be a kind of walking purgatory. Neither dead nor alive. Never really feeling anything. Just existing. Just existing. Listen to me. A dying man takes the time to mourn a man who will never know death. Funny, isn't it?
Funny. I have had great difficulty determining what funny is.
I've had the same difficulty most of my life. We're much alike.
I'd say he has a week, but that's only an estimate. We do know that the disease attacks the brain and nervous system. We can expect more of the erratic behaviour of the kind you've been noticing.
His feelings towards you are very warm. He's attracted to you in many ways.
Attracted? I know I've felt certain feelings from him. And for him. Had I been older, perhaps we could've been. That's not the way it worked out. And now it's like he's afraid to face me. The only one he talks to is your friend, Data.
You mentioned your impending death, Grandpa. May I say you face it with remarkable courage and stoicism.
That is because I am an incredible man, possessing an iron will and nerves of steel. Two traits that helped me become the genius I am today as well as the lady killer I was in days gone by.
You condone homicide, sir?
It's an expression, Data. It means I was once as beautiful as I am smart.
Really, Grandpa?
No, not really. But what the hell. I'm dying. I can remember my life any way I want. And I'll let you into a little secret, Sonny. I don't really believe I will be dying.
But the Doctor
Oh, I'll die, but I won't really be dead. You see, I believe I've learned to transfer the wealth of my knowledge into a computer. Before I die, I plan to transfer my great intelligence into this machine, thus cheating the Grim Reaper of his greatest prize. But what would you know of death? It is a subject forever alien to you.
That is not necessarily true, Grandpa. I do have an off button, if you will. Its activation robs me of my consciousness, therefore rendering me dead for all intents and purposes. It is not something I enjoy contemplating.
I can understand that. Just where would Soong position such a device? Don't tell me, let me guess.
Captain to away team. We're standing by.
I do not wish to interrupt Data and the Doctor. They seem to have developed a genuine rapport. But the Enterprise has reached it's orbit and I'd like to transport Graves to the ship as soon as possible.
That will not be necessary, Doctor. He is gone.
Gone?
It happened just a few moments ago, in my arms. Ira Graves is dead.
Captain's log, supplemental. I leave Gravesworld with an empty feeling and the knowledge that our mission was unsuccessful. Whatever scientific secrets Ira Graves was about to unlock have been lost forever. Our immediate priority is to reach the nearest starbase so that Graves' assistant can get on with her life.
Why didn't you contact Doctor Selar when you saw that he was beginning to go?
To do so would have been pointless. All things must pass. May I go now, sir?
Yes, of course.
We will try to honour him in the manner in which he specified, will we not, sir?
I said we would, Data.
I am glad, sir. It was his dying wish.
Hello Data. It's good to see you again. The stars are so beautiful from space. Yet they seem
You always did love the sky. A stargazer. That is what you are.
Did Ira tell you that? I guess he's right. I used to spend hours just lying on a hill, looking up.
Ira never told you how beautiful you were to him. He never told you that, did he? He could not tell you, do you understand?
Yes. I understand.
He wanted to. Every waking moment. And he wanted you to know that. You were everything to him.
He was a fine man. A man of rare gifts. and great accomplishments. He will be sorely missed. Does anyone else have anything to say?
I believe I have a few words to say, sir.  Just look at that face. The face of a thinker. A warrior. A man for all seasons. Yes, Ira Graves was all that and more. But he was not perfect. Perhaps his greatest fault was that he was too selfless. He cared too much for his fellow man, with nary a thought for himself. A man of limitless accomplishments, and unbridled modesty. I can safely say that to know him was to love him. And to love him was to know him. Those who knew him, loved him, while those who did not know him, loved him from afar.
Data.
I'm almost finished, sir.
You are finished, Data.
We now commit the body of Ira Graves to the timeless depths of space.
I am sorry, sir. Perhaps it was my admiration for Grandpa that got the best of me.
Grandpa?
That is the way I think of him, sir. My only living relative, no longer living.
Data.
I was only trying to carry out his wishes. I just wanted to keep my promise to him.
I know that, Data. Look, I realise you've been studying the human equation with great alacrity, but perhaps you've been working at it too much. Don't try so hard to be human. Just be yourself. All right?
Yes, sir. I will work on staying within myself.
Grand. You're dismissed, Mister Data.
Thank you, sir.
Captain's personal log. Although Commander Data has assured me that his odd behaviour will return to normal, I can't help thinking that something went wrong during his visit to Gravesworld.
I'm still concerned, Captain. I've never seen him act like this.
Could it be that grandfather analogy that Graves planted in his head?. Data is an orphan in a manner of speaking. Is it possible that the loss of Graves might have affected him? Touched him on some emotional level we didn't know he possessed?
I hope you're right. I hope that's all it is.
That was a great speech, Data. To know know him is to love him is to know him.
Verbal composition at it's most sophisticated level. Your child-like mind cannot appreciate the timeworn wisdom of my words.
Child-like mind?
When you get to be my age, you will understand.
Your age? Data, chronologically, you're not much older than I am.
You are only as old as you feel. Try to remember that, boy.
You're not turning into a philosopher, are you, Mister Data?
I am many things. Scholar, Artist, philosopher, lover, genius.
Data, what's wrong with you?
How beautiful.
I thought you might enjoy the Bridge, Miss Brianon. I'm aware of your interest in science. Perhaps you'd like to see the computer terminal
Yes, I'm aware of your interest in her.
What was that, Commander?
Nothing sir. Nothing at all.
These are the science stations. From the command centre here, we have control of the science stations
Data, what are you doing?
I detest hypocrisy. I wish they would just come out and admit it!
Admit what, Mister Data?
That your interest in Kareen is not purely professional. Try as you will, you cannot win her heart. She does not care for older men. Or men of limited intellect.
Mister Data, you will come with me right now. Do you understand me?
I understand. I understand all too well. Removing the competition will not help you, Picard.
Excuse me.
Do you know what that was all about?
Jealousy. Intense, burning jealousy. A human emotion, and it was coming from Data.
If you wish to apologise, I am prepared to listen.
You expect me to apologise to you?
You were a bit rude to me. Might make you feel better if you said you were sorry.
Data, something has obviously gone wrong with your circuitry.
That is ridiculous. I am as healthy as a Rigelian ox.
I wish I could believe that. I would accompany you to to Sickbay, but I doubt if that would do us any good.
Sickbay? Are you ill, Captain?
I'm getting there. I'm going to have Engineering run a full physical on you.
I am sure that will not be necessary, Captain. I am fully capable of running a circuit check on myself. It will immediately determine any abnormalities.
Do it. That's an order.
Just as I expected. I am fine. Could not be better.
For the first time since I've known you, I don't believe you.
Try and hold still, will you, Data?
Data, will you wait for me in the corridor.
Why should I? This concerns me more than it does any of you.
You will wait for me in the corridor.  His insubordination is growing by leaps and bounds. I could use discipline, but I'd rather try and help him.
I wish I knew what to suggest. I'm damned if I can find a thing wrong with him.
Perhaps we're looking in the wrong place.
Meaning?
Well, if Data's physical health is unimpaired, perhaps his mental health needs to be addressed.
What, are you saying that Data is losing his mind?
With your permission, Captain, there is one way to find out.
Now, Data, you remember the psychotronic stability examination. We all had to take it before graduating from the Academy.
It was a waste of time then and it is a waste of time now.
It will just gauge your psychological reactions to the images it projects. Watch the screen and let your mind go blank. The device will do the rest.
It's safe to say that you're his best friend. Is it possible to speculate about what's happening to him?
Well, sir, it's just a guess, but, sometimes he wants to be human so badly he can taste it. I think he just tends to get confused when his human qualities surface.
Go on.
Witnessing Graves' death may have been some sort of catalyst for the way he
I have the results of the tests. I ran them several times to be sure.
To be sure of what?
There are two disparate personalities within Lieutenant Commander Data. Each distinctly different. A dominant and a recessive.
But he's an android. Is that possible!
It must be. The dominant personality is unstable. Brilliant but vain, sensitive yet paranoid. And I believe it is prone to irrationality.
Of course.
Sir?
Nothing. Go on.
It seems to have an especially strong hatred of you, Captain, or to a lesser degree, any authority figure. And worst part is, it's growing.
How do you mean?
The alien persona is getting stronger and gobbling up what is left of the weaker ego, the Data we know. If something isn't done to stop it immediately, we will lose our Data forever.
Captain's personal log. We have arrived at Starbase Six where Miss Brianon will await transport back to Earth. I am greatly troubled by the unusual behaviour of Commander Data and fear that somehow it is directly related to the experiments of Ira Graves.
Where is Data now?
He should be in his quarters. You ordered him not to leave.
Tell me, where is Lieutenant Commander Data?
Current location, Ten forward.
Lieutenant Worf, will you go to Ten forward and keep an eye on Data? Don't interfere with his actions unless you hear otherwise from me.
Worf here, sir. Acknowledged.
I want to know more about what happened down on Gravesworld. Lieutenant Selar, report to the Captain's ready room.
Hello, Kareen. Don't you think it's time we stopped pretending? You know who I am.
You're Data.
You do know who I am.
Ira?
It is me. I am here. I am alive.
How?
I deactivated Data and transferred my mind into his frame. I never imagined how much of my self I would retain. My feelings, my dreams.
They won't let you get away with it. They'll try to stop you.
How can they? It is my body now. It is out of their hands.
Doctor, tell me. How much time did Data and Graves spend together?
They were together practically the entire time we were on the planet.
Always alone?
Yes. Always.
Doctor, what was your impression of Graves?
He seemed brilliant, egocentric, arrogant, chauvinistic.
Sound familiar?
Something wonderful has happened. I can take a deep breath now without feeling stabbing pain. I will never have to face death again. Think of the things I will accomplish over the next thousand years! What? Oh, I know what you're thinking. There is no need to worry. I will create an android body for you, too. We can witness the end of time together. Why are you crying, Kareen? I can love you now. The way I always wanted to. It was not right before. I was too old for you, too weak. Now I can be everything you want me to be.
I won't let you put me in a machine. I want to live my life. I won't let you take it away from me. Ira! Ira, you're hurting me!
Worf to Captain Picard.
Commander Data has left Ten forward. Should I follow?
Negative. I'll handle this myself. He was an expert in cybernetics?
Yes.
Our memorial service may have been premature. What an achievement. 'So long as men can breathe or eyes can see, so long lives this, and this gives life to thee.'
He was working on bridging the gap between man and machine.
It seems he built that bridge. I may be forced to tear it down.
I can hear you coming, Captain. My ears are better than the average dog's, you know.
I know who you are and what you've done.
Of course you do.
I came here to talk to Data.
I cannot allow that.
I understand your desperation. The shock of learning you were dying. But you had no right to do what you have done.
I had every right, Captain. I am man, he is machine. There is no question who must live and what must die.
What of Data?
Data? Before me, he was nothing. Just a walking tin can with circuits for intestines. Pathetic. Without heart, a man is meaningless. I would not come up here if I were you, Captain. I might not like it.
You are most fortunate, my dear Captain, that I am not a violent man.
Not a violent man?
This is not my fault. They told me I was not supposed to be up here. They should not have done that.
Graves, listen to me. No one can deny the significance of your transformation. But I don't believe that this was part of your plan. Encountering Data was mere coincidence. One that offered you more than you could have dreamed. But something has gone wrong. Look here. Graves, this experiment must be terminated.
This is idiotic.
Picard to Sickbay.
Yes, Captain.
How is Miss Brianon?
Her left hand is fractured in two places. We've just begun treatment.
I'm afraid there are two more injuries in Engineering.
I'm on my way.
Who's next?
These were all accidents. I did not intend
How many more accidents? You must leave this body.
No, I live here now.
Graves, every man has his time. Every man, without exception. But you've cheated. You have extended your life at the expense of another. Graves, give Data back. Give him back.
Data is dead.
No. He must not be lost. He's not simply an android. He's a life form, entirely unique.
Data is not human! He is
He is different, yes. But that does not make him expendable, or any less significant. No being is so important that he can usurp the rights of another. Now set him free!
No!
How many? How many more accidents?
Data! Where is he?
Just take it easy.
I can't afford to take it easy, Doctor.  Tell me, where is Lieutenant Commander Data?
Data. Data, can you hear me?
Geordi.
Yeah.
May I ask a question?
I think you just did.
Quite correct. Then may I ask another question after this one?
You can ask me anything you want.
Why am I lying on the floor in this undignified position with the four of you standing over me, displaying expressions of concern?
I've heard more than enough. You're you again.
Captain. Captain, look at this.
He's in there. Ira put himself in the computer.
Captain's log, supplemental. We've said goodbye to Kareen Brianon, with the hopeful feeling that her future will be a bright one. The intellect of Ira Graves has been deposited into our computer. There is knowledge but no consciousness. The human equation has been lost.
And you don't remember anything?
Not a thing.
To know him is to love him is to know him?
Perhaps it is best that I do not remember. I trust I did nothing unbecoming to a Starfleet officer?
Does wrestling with a Klingon targ ring a bell?
Mister Crusher, take us out of orbit.
Aye, sir.
Did I win?
Good evening, Mister Data.
Actually, good morning, sir. Ship status is
No need to report. I'm just here to do some work on my own.
Aye, sir.
I'd like to talk to Doctor Mowray at his archaeological site on Landris Two. Could you put it through to my Ready room?
I'm sorry, sir, but Stellar Cartography has requested a communications blackout while they run an experiment.
How long will it be?
Another three hours twenty two minutes, sir. I can override it if necessary.
No, it's not important.
Aye, sir.
Computer, display the latest excavation schematics on Landris Two.
Library computer is temporarily offline.
Explain.
Library systems have been allocated to Stellar Cartography.
Tea, Earl Grey. Hot.
Replicator systems are offline at the request of
PICARD + COMPUTER:Stellar Cartography.
What could they possibly be doing down there?
In or out, just close that door. And don't move. It'll take a second for our eyes to re-adjust. Okay, levate to three point two, Marquez.
Now at three point two, Commander.
Good. Good we can do this. No, no, no, we're losing vertical alignment. Compensate. Compensate!
Compensating.
Gently. Gently, Marquez, don't bump it. No. No wait. Hit the. Oh, forget it. Forget it. Lights. Whoever you are, you just ruined four hours of work.
You might have taken the simple precaution of locking the door.
It's three o'clock in the morning. Captain Picard.
I assume that you must be Lieutenant Commander Daren.
Yes, sir. I'm sorry. It's just we weren't expecting anybody to be up at this hour.
Well, you're new on the Enterprise. You'll have to learn to expect the unexpected.
That's why I put in for this assignment, sir.
Excellent. Now perhaps you can tell me what was so important that it required depriving the Captain of his cup of Earl Grey?
Earl Grey? No wonder you can't sleep. Computer, bring replicators back online and give me a cup of Daren herbal tea blend number three, hot. You shouldn't be drinking a stimulant at this time of night. I think you'll like this.
I've programmed seven other blends into the replicator. You're bound to like one of them.
I look forward to sampling them.
I'm sorry if the system blackouts we requested inconvenienced you. We're taking very precise gravimetric readings. It wouldn't have taken much to throw them off.
What were the readings for?
I'm trying to construct a mathematical model of an emerging star system. If it works, we'll be able to predict the configuration of a star system that won't be formed for another two million years.
A long time to wait to see if you're right.
I have a few things to do between now and then.
Captain, we'll be arriving at the Borgolis Nebula in three hours.
Yes. I understand it has unusual radioactive emissions, and I'm sure that Stellar Sciences will find it a most interesting study.
Commander Daren has already requested extra time on the main sensor array.
Well, you have the Bridge, Number One.
Captain, I would like to remind you of our concert this evening in Ten Forward. We will perform Chopin's Trio in G Minor.
I'll be there.
And so the upshot is that we'll be close enough for you to slip away for a few days and see Wesley.
Oh, that's wonderful. Thank you, Jean-Luc. This is delicious. What is it?
It's an herbal tea blend. I, er, found it in the replicator files. Have you met any of the new crewmembers who came aboard at Starbase two eighteen?
In fact, I have a new nurse, Beck. He's an obstetrics specialist.
I met the new head of Stellar Sciences last night. Lieutenant Commander Daren.
Yes. Nella Daren. She came into Sickbay for her physical last week. I like her. Very forthright.
Did you know it is now possible to predict the configuration of a star system which won't be formed for another two million years?
Really? No, I didn't.
It's really quite intriguing. The whole thing is made possible by a complex mathematical construct based on fractal particle motion. But that's only the foundation. The modeling itself is done by gravimetric wave input.
I see.
Well, I know this is all pretty dry stuff. Stellar cartography isn't everybody's cup of tea.
I'm sure it's really quite fascinating.
You know, we'd should be getting along to Ten Forward. We're going to be late for the concert.
Thank you.
Well done, Mister Data. Well done.
Commander, that was a remarkable performance.
You are very talented.
Thank you.
I noticed that the applause this evening exceeded average decibel levels.
I guess that means they enjoyed themselves.
I think that much was obvious.
Excuse me. I have not yet congratulated Ensign Cheney.
I'll go with you.
Commander, you must have been playing since you were young. I played the piano for a while when I was small, but I didn't put in the practice you must have.
Practising was never my problem. In fact, my parents had to make me go out and play.
I wanted to ask, during the second arpeggio in the first movement, I noticed that you played an F minor chord instead of a diminished D.
You're a musician. What's your instrument? We should play some time.
No, no, no, I'm just an amateur. But your choice in that arpeggio was delightful. Not at all what one would expect.
Well, Captain, now that I'm on your ship, maybe you should start expecting the unexpected.
Excuse me, sir. I was hoping that my people in Spectral Analysis could have another few hours on the main sensor array?
I'm sorry, the array has already been allocated to Engineering. They're running some warp field tests.
If we go offline now, we'll lose the gas flow pattern we've been tracking.
I understand, but there are other departments waiting to use the array.
We're at a critical juncture, sir.
Commander. I'll see what I can do to find you some more time tomorrow.
Tomorrow? Tomorrow. Thank you, sir.
Computer, pause playback. Come. Oh, Commander Daren.
I hope you don't mind me dropping by like this?
No, please, come in. I'm delighted.
What kind of flute is that?
It's Ressikan.
I've never saw one before.
They're not made anymore.
Have you been playing long?
Er, yes, a long time.
I'd love to hear you play sometime.
I'm not very good.
That doesn't matter as long as you enjoy it.
Yes, but I wouldn't want to inflict it on someone else.
May I try?
Yes, of course. Yes, you're not holding it quite right. May I?
Please.
You're better than you think. Really. We should play together.
There isn't a piano.
Ah, but there is.
I picked it up on Mataline Two. It's amazing.
That is remarkable. Why don't you play something?
You start and I'll jump in.
What shall we play?
What were you working on before I came in?
Bach, the third Brandenburg.
Perfect. Go ahead.
I'm sorry.
It's all right. You're not used to playing with anyone, are you?
Just the computer.
I may not be as precise as a computer, but I think you'll enjoy it more. Why don't we start with something a little simpler. How about?
Good. Very good. Now let's have a little fun with it.
You try it. Improvise around the melody. Anything you want.
That's wonderful. Keep going. It's so good.
You're definitely better than you think.
Number One, my fencing partner's cancelled for this afternoon. I was wondering if you wanted to join me?
Fencing? I'm really not very good.
It doesn't matter so as long as you enjoy it.
Why not?
Good. Excellent. Fourteen hundred hours, then.
You have a mild strain.
I've been playing the piano a lot. I guess the Captain and I overdid it a little last night.
The Captain?
Yes, he plays a kind of flute. A Ressikan, I think he said.
Yes, but I didn't know he played duets.
He never did before. He seemed to enjoy it. He's actually quite promising.
I see.
Tell me, have you known him long?
Yes, a very long time.
He seems somewhat isolated.
I'd say he's a very private person, but not isolated. There, that should help.
That feels much better. Thank you.
Good.
I was afraid I might have to cancel.
Another duet?
Keep climbing.
Where are we going?
We're almost there.
I don't see why we couldn't just practice in my quarters.
Do you know where we are?
Yes, this is the fourth intersect in Jefferies tube twenty five.
No, this is the most acoustically perfect spot on the ship.
The intersection acts as a resonance chamber.
How did you find it?
A little exploring.
You mean to say you climbed through every tube on the ship?
Well, not every one. Try it. See how it sounds.
That's beautiful. What is it?
It's an old folk melody.
I've never heard you play with such feeling.
Is there a problem, Geordi?
I hear music.
Music? I do not hear anything.
Are you sure? I know I heard something. Oh, it's stopped.
I'd heard about Kerelian tenors all my life, but nothing could've prepared me for this man's voice. Soaring, incredible range. Wonderful.
I understand there are nuances that only Kerelians can pick up. We just don't have the ears for it.
I should be finished with my survey by eleven hundred hours.
Very good, Commander.
Captain. The Federation Outpost on Bersallis Three reports that they are entering a period of fire storm activity.
Bersallin fire storms happen on seven year cycle. They're not expecting any for another eight months.
We don't rendezvous with the Havana for another two days. That'll give us plenty of opportunity to study this phenomenon.
Helm, set course for Bersallis Three. Warp five.
Aye, sir.
Counsellor, could I speak with you in my Ready room? You have the Bridge, Number One.
Sit down, Counsellor. I want to talk to you about a matter of protocol. I know there are no Starfleet regulations about a Captain becoming involved with a fellow officer, but
You would like my opinion about you and Commander Daren.
It's that obvious?
In a way that pleases people who care about your happiness, yes, it is.
But I have to be concerned about more than my own happiness.
And you think that your feelings toward Nella could change the way you function as Captain.
Yes. Relationships with co-workers can be fraught with consequences.
That's true. But cutting yourself off from your feelings can carry consequences that are just as serious.
You seem I've always believed that becoming involved with someone under my command would compromise my objectivity. And yet.
Captain, are you asking my permission?
If I were, would you give it?
Yes.
Come in.
Nella.
Can I help you, sir?
I'm really very sorry about what happened in the turbolift. When the crewmember walked in, I felt very self-conscious. It's going to take a while for me to get used to the idea of crew seeing the two of us together.
I understand. I'm glad you told me. For a minute there I thought I'd misread you. One kiss and you're off to find somebody else.
I can assure you that I'm not given to casual relationships.  There is something that I want to tell you. But not here.
Do you remember that folk melody I played for you this morning?
Yes.
I learned it on a planet called Kataan.
Never heard of it.
No, I'm not surprised. Its sun went nova more than a thousand years ago.
I don't understand.
The Enterprise encountered a probe that had been sent from the planet before it was destroyed. It had scanned me and I lost consciousness, and in the space of twenty five minutes I lived a lifetime on that planet. I had a wife, and children, and a grandchild. And it was absolutely real to me. When I awoke, all that I had left of that life there was the flute that I had taught myself to play.
Why are you telling me this?
Because I want you to understand what my music means to me. And what it means for me to be able to share it with someone.
Thank you.
Hello.
Sir.
Commander. I was hoping to talk to you about Ensign Cabot's transfer.
Quantum Mechanics doesn't want to give him up.
But he wants to come to my department.
How do you know that?
I offered it to him.
Transfers are to be approved by me before any offers are made.
I'm sorry. We were just talking and
It's all right. But Cabot should stay where he is.
Commander, please, don't make that decision final. I realise I shouldn't have made the offer, but he's perfect for the job. And quantum mechanics is over staffed anyway.
Commander, do you realise the position you're putting me in?
Well, I think I'm just doing what any good department head would do. Trying to build the best staff I can.
Look, I'll review the situation and let you know as soon as I can.
Come.
May I have a minute?
Yes, of course. Come in, Number One.
It's about Lieutenant Commander Daren. As a department head, she comes to me for systems allocation, personnel transfers, things like that. I'm beginning to feel uncomfortable with her requests.
Because of her relationship with me?
Yes, sir.
Are her requests unusual?
No.
Would you say that she's just trying to do her job?
Yes, sir.
Then let her do it, and feel free to do yours. Ship's resources are your responsibility. I've always had absolute confidence in your judgment.
Thank you, sir.
I can't believe I'm going to get the chance to study the fire storms on Bersallis. Apparently they're generated by particle emissions from the Bersallin sun. They cause a cascade effect in the planet's atmosphere that. Oh, I'm boring you.
No, no, no you're not. It's just that Commander Riker came to talk to me this afternoon. About you.
About the personnel transfer? I thought he looked uncomfortable. He thought I was asking for special treatment.  I was just doing what I thought was best for my department.
That's what I told him. But we have to be careful. Obviously it's easy for people to misunderstand.
I don't like the thought of having to second-guess people all the time. If I have to worry about what people are thinking about me, I'll be concentrating on the wrong thing, and I won't be as effective an officer.
All I'm saying is that it's something we have to be aware of. But you mustn't compromise yourself. You must do what you have to do. Because if I find that my head of Stellar Sciences isn't being effective, then I shall do what I must to do and I shall replace her.
Noted, sir.
Now, I think that we should just forget about this and enjoy out evening.
What about that special dessert you promised me?
Right. Now this is something that I first tasted on Thelka Four.
Bridge to Captain.
Go ahead, Mister Worf.
Bersallis Three reports that the storm has changed its speed and heading. They are predicting it will hit the outpost within eight hours, and are requesting evacuation.
I'm on my way.
Captain's log, stardate 46693.1. We have entered the Bersallis star system and are making preparations to evacuate the Federation outpost on the third planet.
A fire storm can kick up winds of over two hundred kilometres per hour and temperatures as high as three hundred degrees C.
Incredible. What causes them?
They form when solar flare radiation reacts with high energy plasma present in the planet's atmosphere.
Wasn't the outpost built to withstand the conditions?
It was, both reinforced and insulated. But this is no ordinary storm. It's twice as strong as anything they've ever seen. The outpost just won't withstand it.
We'll arrive about an hour before the storm gets there. It will take at least two hours to evacuate all the colonists off the surface.
I led a team of geologists to study the plasma geyser on Melnos Four. We cross-connected a few thermal deflector units to create a protective shield against the heat.
A firewall.
Would something like that work here?
You know, it might.  The storm is approaching the outpost from this direction. If we were to set up a series of thermal deflector units along the northern perimeter, we could create a fire wall and deflect some of the heat. The insulation from the outpost should be able to handle the rest.
Thermal deflectors generate a field approximately four hundred metres wide. We would need to cross-connect six units and align them so the fields overlap.
How many people would it take to set that up?
Twelve. Two per team. Cross-connecting that many units will be a little tricky. Once they're set up, we'll have to leave the units in place and transport our people out. Nobody would be able survive very long outside that structure.
Let's do it.
The storm is going to interfere with communications. Everything will need to be coordinated from the surface. Mister Data, you will coordinate the evacuation of the colonists. Doctor, they have nine patients in the outpost infirmary. Your first priority will be to get them to Sickbay. After that you will stay on board the Enterprise, be ready to receive casualties. Marquez, you will take some people down and track the storm. All the other teams will need to be kept apprised of its heading. Commander, you're in charge of deploying the deflectors. Let's go.
Commander Daren. About these thermal deflectors.
There must be one of any number of people could coordinate their deployment.
I assume Commander Riker chose me because I'm the best person for the job. Didn't we agree not to let our relationship get in the way of our work? I'll be all right.
Lieutenant Marquez has already set up on the surface. Apparently the storm is still gaining speed. He's estimating
It'll hit the colony in less than fifty minutes. Ensign, make sure you maintain a continuous transporter lock on all away team personnel. We may have to pull them out in a hurry.
Yes, sir.
I don't want to take any unnecessary chances. If they get into trouble, beam them up immediately.
Energise.
Mister Worf, how long before the storm reaches the outposts?
Seventeen minutes.
La Forge to Bridge.
Go ahead, Mister La Forge.
The ionization from the storm is interfering with the transporters, Captain. I'm compensating, but it's slowing things down a bit.
Keep at it, Mister La Forge.
Riker to Daren.
Daren here. Go ahead, Commander.
You've got less than nine minutes before the storm reaches the northern perimeter.
I'm here with team six. We're just about to bring the deflectors online.
Whenever you're ready.
Daren to perimeter team. Stand by to cross connect deflectors.
Standing by.
Activate. Team three, increase your output by point two percent.
Yes, sir.
Good. Good. Deng, decrease nutation by point four percent. Good, we've almost got it.
Crusher to Bridge.
Go ahead, Doctor.
We just brought aboard the last of the infirmary patients and they're on their way to Sickbay. But we still have over
A hundred colonists down there.
Understood.
Daren to Commander Riker.
Riker here. Go ahead.
We've got a problem. We're having trouble keeping the deflectors cross connected. So the only way this is going to work is if we calibrate them manually.
If you stay with the deflectors, will they protect you when the storm hits?
I don't know, sir. For a few minutes maybe.
Picard to Commander Riker. How many more colonists do you have to transport?
Seventy three, sir.
How long do you need?
At least ten more minutes.
Captain, the storm will reach the northern perimeter in four minutes.
Picard to perimeter teams.
It is imperative that you hold your position until we finish evacuating the colony. Picard out.
Picard to Mister La Forge.
La Forge here.
I want a signal lock on every member of the perimeter teams.
Captain, the storm's interference won't
As soon as the last of the colony is evacuated, I want those perimeter teams out of there. Is that understood?
Yes, sir.
Daren to perimeter teams. The storm's interference is going to make our job harder than we thought. We may lose communication, so it's up to each of you to keep your units operational. A lot of people are depending on us. Daren out.
Oh, my god.
The storm has reached the perimeter.
I got out with the last of the colonists. If it hadn't been for the perimeter teams, none of us would have made it. We were able to clear out four of the teams, and the interference prevented us from getting two more. I don't know how they could have survived.
Which teams are missing?
Three and six.
The last I knew, Commander Daren was on team six.
Bridge to Captain.
Go ahead, Mister Worf.
We have found survivors, sir. They are beaming up now.
I'm on my way.
That's it.
Here, let me help up.
Thank you.
Captain's log, stardate 46697.2. Although we succeeded in rescuing all six hundred forty three Bersallin colonists we lost eight crewmembers. Let the record show that they gave their lives in the performance of their duty.
When communications went out, I knew we had to fend for ourselves. We modified our phasers to create resonant disruptions in the deflector field. The disruptions formed small pockets inside the plane of the field and we each stood inside one to wait out the storm. Richardson didn't make it. All Deng and I could do was stand there and watch.
I'm so sorry.
Don't. Don't say you're sorry.
It must have been terrible.
At first, when you told us to hold our positions, I didn't question it. Of course we would. That was our job. But when I saw that storm coming toward us.
Part of you must have blamed me.
A small part, maybe. But in the end, I was more afraid that you would blame yourself if I died. Would you have?
I've lost people under my command. People who were very dear to me. But never someone I've been in love with. And when I believed that you were dead, I just began to shut down. I didn't want to think or feel. I was here in my quarters, and the only thing I could focus on was my music, and how it would never again give me any joy. Then I saw you standing on the transporter pad and I knew that I could never again put your life in jeopardy.
If I stayed here, you might have to.
You could always resign your commission. Stay here with me.
And you could resign yours and come to a starbase with me. I'll apply for a transfer.
But we could still see each other. People do. We could arrange shore leave together. And, for the future, who knows?
Of course.  Promise me something? Don't give up your music.
I like to cook all kinds of stuff, like yogurt and raisin salad, chocolate chip pancakes and purple omelettes.
Purple omelettes?
You put grape juice in the eggs. Isabella doesn't like it very much. She says it tastes funny.
I can see her point. Sugar with your tea?
Yes, please.
Isabella would you like some too?
Yes, but she takes two cubes.
I'll bet Isabella is very pretty.
She's very, very pretty. She has blonde hair and a blue dress with white buttons. Her ears are pierced and she's tall.
Maybe you could draw me a picture. I'd love to see what she looks like.
You don't think she's real.
I think she's real for you, and that is real enough for me.
Honey, I think it's time for you to go. You don't want to keep Keiko waiting.
I have to go plant the nasturtiums now. I'm Keiko's helper in the arboretum today.
Is that so?
You go ahead, sweetie, and be home for dinner.
I hope I see you soon. Maybe we can be friends.
Okay. Counsellor Troi?
Yes?
Isabella says she likes you.
Why, thank you, Isabella.
I can understand your concern, Ensign Sutter, but really you have nothing to worry about. It's a normal, healthy activity for children to engage in imaginary play.
I'm just afraid she's not making any real friends. She spends all of her time with Isabella.
You've been moving from starship to starship since Clara was two years old. Maybe Isabella provides a constant companion. She knows this is one friend she won't have to leave behind.
You're probably right.
Give Clara a chance. As she learns to make friends on the Enterprise, you'll probably find that she'll leave her imaginary world behind.
Captain's log, stardate 45852.1. The Enterprise has arrived at FGC four seven, a nebula which has formed around a neutron star. We are eager to investigate this unique formation.
We've got elevated quantities of hydrogen, helium and trionium, but nothing the shields can't handle.
Shields up.
Take us in, Ensign. One quarter impulse.
Aye, sir.
In order for the lateral sensors to complete their scheduled observations, additional processing time will be required.
We could steal a couple of hours from the Engineering team while they're recalibrating the thermal interferometery scanner.
Will two hours be enough time to complete the high-resolution series on the neutron star?
No problem. We'll just double up the main sensor bandwidth while they're freeing up the lateral unit.
And then after dinner, then what?
We went to the holodeck and took a walk on the Champs Elysees.
The neural scanner still seems to be a bit off. Let's check the sensor calibrations.
I'll run a diagnostic.
And?
And?
After Paris?
He has shore leave next month. He asked me to go to Risa with him.
No problem. Nurse McClukidge can cover for you.
I don't think I'm going, Doctor. I hear it's a very uninhibited atmosphere. Personally, I don't think I'm ready for that kind of fun.
Try to talk him into Tavena Minor. They have a cruise down the Jokri River. The iridescent currents are beautiful.
See, Isabella? You have to push your finger into the soil as far as it can go. I'm making a hole for the seeds. Now they need to be watered. But the baby seeds are very small, so we mustn't give them too much to drink.
Hello? Is anybody there?
Hello.
Isabella?
Hello, Clara.
Isabella, how come I can see you?
Is something wrong with the way I look?
No. I've just never seen you before. Not for real.
Well, now you can see me for real. Doesn't that make you happy?
Yes, it's wonderful.
Can we go now?
We'd better finish planting the seeds first.
I'm tired of planting. Let's do something else.
Like what?
Like, I would really like to explore the ship.
We'd better finish planting first. I promised Keiko.
We can finish later. Let's go look around.
I'd better ask my daddy.
Your daddy won't mind. We can tell him later. Come on.
So what are we going to name this nebula? FGC forty seven just doesn't have the proper ring to it.
Why don't we call it Sutter's Cloud?
The rotational period of the neutron star is one point three five seconds.
That's a bit on the long side. Sutter, let's see if you can get a reading on the particle flux.
Aye, sir.
I was thinking about something more along the lines of the La Forge Nebula. It's got sort of a majestic sound, don't you think?
Given the selections, I prefer FGC four seven.
What was that?
It felt like we hit something.
Shields have registered an impact, however sensors show nothing in the vicinity.
Forward velocity is down by point two percent, and dropping.
Engineering.
Report.
Could be something wrong with the shields, Captain. We're checking it out now.
Systems are normal, sir.
So did we hit something or not? Shields say yes, sensors say no. This is very strange. Ensign, give me a breakdown on shield energy conversion and then run a spectral.  Whoa. Where did you come from?
I'm Clara Sutter. That's my daddy.
Clara, you can't be here right now.
But Isabella wanted to see Engineering.
I don't care what Isabella wanted to see, you go back to our quarters right now.
But Daddy
Bridge to La Forge. Our speed is still dropping.
I hear you, Captain. I'm increasing the power to the impulse engines, but forward velocity just isn't consistent with engine output.
Explanation.
It seems like there's something increasing the drag coefficient on the ship.
But we can't find the source.
If we can't correct it we may have to reverse course and leave the nebula.
Give me a couple of minutes here, Captain.
Clara, now.
I'm sorry, Commander.
Why do you keep disappearing like that?
The grown-ups don't believe I'm real. When they're around, I have to be invisible. Wait here.
The drag coefficient continues to increase. Our velocity has fallen by twelve percent. Velocity is increasing. Ship's speed has stabilised at one quarter impulse.
That's great, Data. What'd you do?
I did nothing. The problem seems to have corrected itself.
Where did you go?
There was something I had to do.
I don't have an explanation, Captain. We seemed to hit something, then we started losing speed. So far as we can tell, there's nothing out there to hit.
Could some kind of damping field have caused us to lose velocity?
We have simulated several such fields, but were unable to reproduce the same drag coefficient.
And we still don't know why the problem suddenly corrected itself.
It seems we're looking a unique phenomenon. One that hasn't been recorded before.
The question is, do we stay here and check it out?
Might be dangerous.
Since we have only experienced the phenomenon once, it is impossible to estimate the risks.
Captain, I'd like to stay here for a little bit, collect some samples of the gaseous matter, see what it tells us.
Agreed. Collect your samples, Mister La Forge. We'll proceed with caution. Dismissed.
What's in here?
That's the door to the cargo bay. We can't go in there.
Let's go someplace with a lot of people.
Okay. Isabella, why are you so serious lately?
What do you mean?
You haven't even smiled once today.
You're my best friend, Isabella.
Why?
I don't know. Because we do things together and we trade secrets.
Does everybody have a best friend?
If they're lucky. Before I had you, I didn't have one.
Why not?
Every time I made friends with someone, my daddy's job would change and we'd move to a new ship. It takes time to make a best friend.
How long?
It depends. With you, not very long. You always listened to me, even when I was sad.
Clara, I'm glad we're best friends.
Race you.
Okay.
Ready, set, go!
This area is not designated for children. Are you lost? Where are you supposed to be?
We were only playing. We're sorry.
Return to your quarters, and we will forget this incident.
Thank you. Come on.
Okay, I've configured the magnetic coil to collect samples of gaseous matter from the nebula. Go ahead and activate the beam emitter.
I'm setting the fractionater to a continuous cycle.
We'll take samples from eight random sections. That ought to give us a reliable measure.
Commander, I understand that you had a parent who was in Starfleet.
Two of them, as a matter of fact. My father was an exozoologist, my mother a Command officer.
They must have been posted to a lot of different assignments.
That's putting it mildly. They were always on the move. Some of the time together, sometimes separately. I never knew whether or not I was going to be stationed with my father while he studied invertebrates in the Modean system or on some outpost near the Neutral Zone with my mom.
Was that hard on you?
I don't remember it that way.
It must have been disruptive if you didn't stay in one place long enough to make friends.
Well, I suppose there were aspects of my childhood that were less than ideal, but to me it was just one long adventure. Children are a lot stronger than you think. As long as they know you love them, they can handle just about anything life throws at them, you know.
Thanks, Commander.
It's a Samarian coral fish with its fin unfolded.
I believe what you are seeing is the effect of the fluid dynamic processes inherent in the large scale motion of highly rarified gas.
No, no. First it was a fish, and now it's a Mintonian sailing ship.
Where?
Right there. Don't you see the two swirls coming together to form the mast?
I do not see it. It is interesting that people try to find meaningful patterns in things that are essentially random. I have noticed that the images they perceive sometimes suggest what they are thinking about at that particular moment. Besides, it is clearly a bunny rabbit.
Looks as though someone's lost their way. Excuse me. Hello. Are you looking for someone?
No. I brought Isabella to see Ten Forward.
Oh, I see. Well, ordinarily we would only let you in with a grown-up, but since you've brought Isabella, you can be my guest. Won't you join me?
Thank you.
Now, how about two Papalla juices with extra bubbles.
Just one, please. Isabella isn't thirsty.
One juice.
You're not like the other grown-ups.
Oh, no?
They don't think Isabella's real.
Well, most grown-ups have a hard time with things they can't see.
Why?
Well, because they get preoccupied by other things.
Like what?
Like how much fuel it takes to power a ship, or whether we should go to one star system or another, or whether little girls should go to bed at seven or be allowed to stay up till eight. So their heads can get so full that they forget about the things that are important to you and me, like imaginary friends.
If the other grown-ups don't understand, how come you do?
Maybe because when I was your age, I had one.
You did? What was she like?
It wasn't a she.
What was he like?
It wasn't a he.
It?
It was a Tarkassian razor beast. It had dark brown fur and gold eyes and huge spiny wings, and it would fly so fast nobody could see it except me.
Sounds scary.
Oh, it was, especially when he smiled. But the best thing about him was I could curl up on his furry belly, and he had the softest purr you ever heard. It put me right to sleep every night. I tell you, that razorbeast was a good friend.
So is Isabella.
Hello, Clara.
Hello.
Clara and Isabella and I were just having a conversation.
Would you and Isabella like to come for a walk with me?
I guess so. Bye.
Bye, Clara. Bye, Isabella.
Clara, you haven't been on this she very long, so maybe you don't know, but Ten Forward is usually for grown-ups.
I know that. I didn't want to go, but Isabella wanted to see it.
If Isabella is making you do things you know are wrong, then you must tell her it's not acceptable.
I try to but she doesn't listen.
Deck thirty two. Clara, do you want me to talk to Isabella?
Isabella, it's not very nice to get Clara to do things that she isn't supposed to.
She's over there.
From now on I want you to ask a grown-up before you go to any place that is off-limits.
What does she say?
She said.
Clara, please tell me what Isabella said.
She said, you'd better leave us alone.
I'm a little concerned at the turn this is taking. It seems Clara is beginning to do inappropriate things and blaming them on Isabella.
She came into Engineering today. She said it was Isabella's idea.
I don't think it's too serious yet, but we should make more of an effort to get her involved with real friends her own age. The children's centre's having a ceramics class this afternoon. Why don't I take Clara?
I think she'd like that.
I'll see if there's any room left in the class. In the meantime, I think you should make yourself more available to Clara. Let her know she doesn't have to rely on Isabella when she needs someone to talk to.
Counsellor, thank you.
Are you mad at me? I'm sorry I got you in trouble.
That's okay.
Are we still best friends?
Here, you can help me put this together if you want.
Clara, why are grown-ups so mean?
They're not mean. They're just more serious than we are.
Sometimes I wish they would just go away.
You do?
Yes, I don't like them. I'm bored. Let's go back to Engineering.
We're not allowed to go there.
I thought we were best friends.
We are.
Then why won't you play with me?
I told you.
You always listen to the grown-ups. You don't care about me.
That's not true.
I thought we'd have fun together, once you could really see me. I thought you'd like me. Let's go to Engineering, Clara. Just for a little while. No one will know. It'll be our secret. And if they find us, we'll tell them we got lost.
Who is it?
Counsellor Troi.
Hello, Clara.
Hi.
I came to ask if you'd like to go to a ceramics class.
Can Isabella come too?
No. Let's do something with Isabella another day.
Well, okay.
Sir, as we move deeper into the nebula, sensors indicate that the levels of helium and trionium are continuing to rise.
Is it something that the shields can't handle?
No, sir. We are well within tolerance levels.
Mister Data?
Shields have registered an impact.
But the sensors show nothing out there, right?
There is no indication of anything near the ship.
Forward velocity is dropping, Captain. Down by point four percent.
Can we go to warp speed?
Until we determine the cause of the drag coefficient, I would not recommend it, sir.
Forward velocity down by one point one percent.
Ensign, increase power to the impulse engines.
Aye, sir. Impulse engines now at full power.
We are no longer losing speed. Forward velocity is holding steady.
The drag coefficient is still present, but it has stabilised.
Bridge to Commander Riker. Check with Mister La Forge. See if he found anything in the matter sample from the nebula.
On my way, sir.
Any luck?
Yeah, take a look at this. We tried radiating the subject matter with just about everything we could think of. We didn't find anything until we subjected it to a high frequency warp field. We think this is what we've been running into.
Do you know what it is?
We think so, now that the sensors can read it. It seems to be a highly cohesive form of plasma, like a strand of energy.
We figure it's a segment of just part of a network of much larger strands.
When these things come in contact with our shields it produces a resonant effect, and that creates the drag coefficient we've been experiencing.
Is there anything like this on record?
No, sir.
Do you know how many of them there might be?
No, but if we run the warp field generators through the deflector grid, we could radiate a field outside the ship.
And we'd be able to see for ourselves. Let's do it.
Alexander, I thought you might like a partner. This is Clara Sutter. She's new on the Enterprise. Clara, meet Alexander Rozhenko.
I'm making a cup for my father. Want to help?
Go ahead.
Well, you're supposed to put them in a row, like this.
Clara, would you like some clay of your own?
Here, honey.
I've never made a cup before. How do you make the round part?
Well, it's easy. You take a big piece of clay like this, and push your hand into it.
Warp field generators are standing by.
Captain, we should be able to illuminate any strands within two thousand kilometres of the ship.
Proceed.
Initiating field generation.
Remarkable.
It is an irregular lattice composed of approximately forty seven million strands of energy.
Captain, with this many of them, the resonant effect on our shields could cause a problem.
Agreed. Ensign, bring us about. Take us out of the nebula.
It may be difficult, sir. I am detecting a significant number of strands behind us.
Do your best, Ensign.
Aye, sir.
Hot chocolate. Computer, I need my appointment schedule for next week.
Kryonian Tigers aren't so scary. I saw one once.
You did?
My father took me to the zoo on Brentalia. All the tiger did was lick my hand. And he smelled funny.
I think we need more water.
I'll get some.
Isabella?
Clara!
I didn't do it.
Who did?
It was Isabella.
I don't see anybody.
She's invisible.
I spent two weeks on that. That was really mean.
I didn't do it. I didn't.
Clara, there's no such thing as invisible people. You're lying.
Hey!
Isabella, stop!
Clara.
Why were you being so mean to me? Why'd you do that to my friend?
Because you ran away from me. You left me alone. I had to do everything by myself.
You're scaring me.
I was going to protect you, Clara. I liked you. But now I don't care. Now, when the others come, you can die along with everyone else.
Status, Mister Data.
At our current speed, we will clear the nebula in twelve minutes four seconds.
Continue a full sensor sweep. I want all the information we can gather.
Captain, forward velocity is down by point six percent.  Velocity down by two point four percent.
Mister Data?
We are moving through a dense concentration of energy strands.
Can we go to warp?
The stress on the hull would be too great.
Captain, density appears to be lower off the starboard bow.
Ensign, bring us to bearing oh three oh mark five.
Aye, sir.
Forward velocity holding.
Steady as she goes.
Is something wrong with the cake?
Excuse me?
Well, I see you sitting here with a piece of untouched chocolate cake in front of you. I assume something's wrong with the cake or something's bothering you.
I'm sure the cake is fine. I've just been thinking.
Let me guess. About the little girl with the imaginary friend?
I'm wondering if I'm doing the right thing.
How so?
Well, I know the best thing to do is to gradually wean her away from her fantasy, and she did make some new friends today and had a good time.
But?
But I can't help feeling that I'm taking something from her. Something precious. A part of her childhood she'll never have again.
Well, I'm not sure about that. I was just telling Clara about my imaginary friend.
You have an imaginary friend?
A Tarkassian razor beast. It protected me. I knew as long as that razorbeast was around, nothing could hurt me. You know, over the years his body kind of faded away but the idea stayed. And I just don't seem to talk to him as often as I used to.
You still talk to it?
Oh, yeah, when I'm afraid or I get confused or a little scared. I just don't think you should have to give up an imaginary friend.
Ensign Sutter to Counsellor Troi.
Go ahead, Ensign.
Would you come to my quarters? I'm having a problem with Clara.
I'm on my way.
She won't even go into her room. She's terrified that Isabella's going to hurt her.
Clara, your father tells me Isabella has been saying some very bad things to you. What did she say?
She said they were going to come and kill everyone.
Who's going to come and kill everyone?
The others, like her.
Did she say why? I know you're very frightened. Sometimes what we imagine can be just as scary as something real. But I promise you, there is no way Isabella can harm you or anyone on this ship.
But she's not imaginary anymore. She's real now. I can see her.
You can see her?
Yes.
If I go with you and hold your hand, will you go into your room?
I think so.
We'll make sure Isabella isn't anywhere around, okay? Come on.
Do you see anybody?
Let's look under the bed. Is she there? Okay, where else?
Is she behind here?
Maybe Isabella's gone home.
Let's see. Anything here? Maybe Isabella knows that you've got new friends now. In fact, I'll bet she won't be coming around as much anymore.
Maybe. What about in the closet?
Okay. Anybody in here? Looks pretty empty to me.
She was eleven, maybe twelve, with blonde hair. Clara.
Clara's sleeping. She's going to be fine. Her bioelectrical processes were severely disrupted. It's as if the energy were pulled right out of her body.
Captain, Clara has told me that her imaginary friend has been making threats. She claimed that others were on the way and that they had plans to kill everyone on the ship.
Picard to Lieutenant Worf.
Worf here, sir.
Lieutenant,
We've established the presence of what appears to be an alien entity on board. It seems the entity has manifested itself in the form of a twelve year old human girl who has been seen with Clara Sutter. She has blonde hair, blue eyes
And a blue dress.
Yes sir, I have seen her.
When?
Two days ago, near Engineering. She was with Miss Sutter.
Security Alert
Mister Worf. Keep a good lookout.
Aye, sir.
She insisted on talking to you.
It's about Isabella.
What about her, Clara?
I think her feelings were hurt. She said she liked me, she liked being with me. She was my friend. She only got mean when I stopped paying attention to her.
Did she say when the others were coming?  All right, thanks, sweetie. You go back to bed now. We'll handle this.
But Daddy.
Clara, if we need your help again, I hope we can count on you.
Yes, Captain.
Captain Picard, report to the Bridge.
On my way.
Report.
Our speed is down by twenty two percent.
Strand density is ten times what it was, Captain. We can't take many more of these hits.
All stop.
Sir, something is heading toward us, bearing one oh three mark oh two four.
On screen.
It appears to be an energy vortex of highly complex patterns. Possibly a life form.
Red alert.
It is in direct physical contact with our shields.
Shield strength dropping to seventy five percent. Seventy two percent.
The damn thing's feeding off our shields. Mister Data, remodulate our shield frequencies.
Aye, sir. No effect.
Shield strength has dropped to sixty four percent.
We've got about eight minutes before this thing drains our shields.
Any ideas?
Isabella? Isabella? Don't you want to talk to me? I'm not mad at you. Isabella?
We know you've been on this ship for some time now, and that you're posing as Clara's friend, and that you've been threatening her. We can only assume that there is some connection between yourself and the life forms attacking this ship. You're obviously an intelligent being. There's no reason to hide from us. Talk to us. Or can you only communicate by threatening a small child?
I'm scared, Isabella.
Who are you?
I came here to determine whether you were a threat to us, and to examine the purity of your energy sources.
Energy? Is that why you're draining our shields?
Yes. The emissions from your graviton field generators are far richer than our normal sources of energy.
Picard to Bridge. Report.
Shields are down to three percent. We're diverting all available power.
Acknowledged. If it's energy that you want, we have other ways of providing it. You needn't destroy us.
You should be destroyed. You are cruel, uncaring creatures.
What makes you say that?
The way you treat Clara.
In what way have we mistreated her?
You wouldn't let her do what she wanted to, or go where she wanted to.
You mean where you wanted her to.
What difference does it make?
You were taking her to places that were inappropriate, even dangerous.
I wouldn't have let anything happen to her.
We didn't know that. We didn't even know if you were real. All we knew was that a little girl's imaginary friend was frightening her, threatening her.
That was only after you told Clara not to be my friend.
I understand. You are seeing this ship, all of us, from a unique perspective. From a child's point of view. It must seem terribly unfair and restrictive to you. As adults, we don't always stop to consider how everything we say and do shapes the impressions of young people. But if you're judging us as a people by the way we treat our children, and I think there can be better criterion, then you must understand how deeply we care for them. When our children are young, they don't understand what might be dangerous. Our rules are to keep them from harm, real or imagined, and that's part of the continuity of our human species. When Clara grows up, she will make rules for her children to protect them, as we protect her.
Please don't hurt us. If you still want to be my best friend, I'd like that very much.
Status, Number One.
We're clear of the strands. We'll have full warp capability in twenty minutes.
Notify all sections we'll be leaving this area in one hour.
Sir?
Mister La Forge, I want you to drive the warp engines to full power, and direct a flow of energy out into the nebula.
Aye, sir.
I came to say I'm sorry I frightened you.
That's okay.
And I misled you. I wasn't really your Isabella.
For a while you were.
I never had a friend before.
I'm sorry I have to go away.
Do you think you'll ever come back?
I hope so.
So do I.
Apparently the Tamarians arrived at El-Adrel Four nearly three weeks ago. They have been transmitting a subspace signal towards Federation space ever since.
The signal is a standard mathematical progression. It does not carry a specific message.
But they wanted us to know they were there.
Apparently so, Number One. Starfleet believes that their presence is an attempt at communication. Commander.
Federation vessels have encountered Tamarian ships seven times over the past one hundred years. Each meeting went without incident, however formal relations were not established because communication was not possible.
Why?
The Children of Tama were called incomprehensible by Captain Silvestri of the Shiku Maru. Other accounts were comparable.
A cause for concern. For all we know, they could be threatening our border.
Everything in the previous encounters suggests a peaceable race. We have to start from there.
Agreed. I appreciate your prudence, Mister Worf, but Starfleet believes that the Tamarians have extended a hand. We must do the same.
The Children of Tama. I've heard rumours about them for years.
Indeed. Are they truly incomprehensible? In my experience, communication is a matter of patience, imagination. I would like to believe these are qualities we have in sufficient measure.
Rai and Jiri at Lungha. Rai of Lowani. Lowani under two moons. Jiri of Ubaya. Ubaya of crossed roads at Lungha. Lungha, her sky grey. Rai and Jiri at Lungha.
Counsellor?
I'm sense nothing but good intentions from them, Captain.
Mister Data?
The Tamarian seems to be stating the proper names of individuals and locations.
Yes, but what does it all mean?
I am at a loss, sir.
Captain, would you be prepared to consider the creation of a mutual non-aggression pact between our two peoples, possibly leading to a trade agreement and cultural interchange. Does this sound like a reasonable course of action to you?
Kadir beneath Mo Moteh.
The river Temarc! In winter.
Impressions, Number One?
It appears they're trying their best.
As are we. For what it's worth.
Shaka, when the walls fell.  Darmok.
Darmok? Rai and Jiri at Lungha!
Shaka. When the walls fell.
Zima at Anzo. Zima and Bakor.
Darmok at Tanagra.
Shaka! Mirab, his sails unfurled.
Darmok.
Mirab.
Temarc! The river Temarc.
Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra.
Block their transporter with the shields! Extend to maximum range!
Not enough time.
Where is he?
The Tamarians have transported Captain Picard to the planet surface along with their own captain.
Riker to O'Brien.
It will not be possible to transport, sir. The Tamarian ship has created a particle scattering field on the planet's ionosphere.
Riker to Captain Picard. Captain, do you read me? Can we compensate?
No, sir. The Tamarians are projecting a particle sustaining beam into the upper atmosphere. The result is a hyperionisation that virtually disrupts all EM and subspace carriers.
Then they can't communicate with their man either. They won't be able to beam anyone through the field.
That is correct. However, they have left sensor frequencies clear.
Then they'll be able to tell what's going on. Analysis, Mister Worf. What the hell is going on?
A contest, perhaps. Between champions. Our captain against theirs.
Theirs was armed.
Darmok and Jalad.
You want to fight with me? Is that it? A challenge?
Darmok and Jalad.
I don't know who or what Darmok and Jalad are, but I certainly didn't come here to start a war.
Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra.
Sorry, Captain.
Shaka. When the walls fell.
Sensors show Captain Picard and the Tamarian in apparent good health, approximately twenty metres from each other.
Hail the Tamarian ship.
On screen.
You are holding our captain. I want him released.
Darmok at Tanagra.
Your action could be interpreted as an act of war.
Kiteo. His eyes closed. Chenza at court. The court of silence. Chenza!
Is there any way to get through to them?
Not without further study.
Close the channel, Mister Worf.
Gladly, sir.
Worf, I want you to assemble a security team, take a shuttle down to the planet, bring back the captain.
Aye, Commander.
Sir, the Tamarians are fully capable of stopping a shuttle.
I'm aware of that. But disrupting our transporter beam and firing on a shuttle are two entirely different things. I'm betting they're not going to push it that far.
Shaka. When the walls fell.
Shaka indeed. What now, Captain? Will you attack me in my sleep? If I don't freeze to death first.
Darmok of Kanza. Jalad of the Kituay.
Picard of the Federation. Of the starship Enterprise. Of the planet Earth.
Kadir beneath Mo Moteh.
Temba.
Temba? What does that mean? Fire? Does Temba mean fire?
Temba. His arms wide.
Temba is a person? His arms wide. Because he's holding them apart in, in generosity. In giving. In taking.
Temba. His arms wide.
Thank you. Thank you.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. I am sending a shuttlecraft to find Captain Picard, gambling that the Tamarians will sit tight rather than risk an exchange of phaser fire.
The positron density is point zero one three.
Electron concentration seven point nine five. Particle gradient, four over seven. We are two hundred and fifty kilometres from the planet's surface.
Commander, the shuttle has reached the E region of the planet's ionosphere.
How long can we maintain communication?
The scattering layer induced by the Tamarians is concentrated in the upper D region. The shuttle will reach that area in approximately two minutes.
The Tamarian ship?
Unchanged, sir. They appear to be making no attempt to stop us.
Maybe we called their bluff. Status, Mister Worf.
Navigational, life-support, propulsion normal.
Onboard systems do not appear to be disrupted by the field, but I can barely read you, Commander.
Acknowledged. Maintain
Communications as long as conditions permit.
Commander. I am reading a power surge in the Tamarian plasma reactor.
Lieutenant Worf! Evasive manoeuvre sequence delta!
Manoeuvre sequence delta.
Commander, the shuttle has been hit.
Damage?
The starboard nacelle has been rendered inoperable.
That's all? Riker to Worf.
Report.
Starboard thrusters destroyed. I may be able to land but I will not be able to take off. RIKER  Understood. Return to the Enterprise, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
Enough to turn them back, but not enough to hurt them.
Yes, sir. The phaser pulse appears to have been carefully attenuated for just that effect.
Nice shooting.
I'm pretty sure I can punch up the annular confinement beam enough to transport the captain through the field, but it's going to take me at least a full day to do it.
Captain Picard could be dead by then.
I do not believe so. I have confidence in his ability as a warrior. He will be victorious.
You're still assuming this is some sort of a challenge ritual. We can't be certain of that.
Agreed. We're only making educated guesses about their motivations, no more than that.
Then why do we wait? If we attack the ship now, they will not be able to maintain their scattering field.
Which might start a shooting match, and for all we know, a war, and we still might not be able to save the captain.
It would end this stalemate.
It's too much of a risk. I'll take that course when it's the last one left. Who the hell are these people? There's got to be some way to get through to them.
As I have said, with further study it may be possible
Then do it. Deanna, help him. I want something by oh nine hundred hours.
Now, where have you gone to, my friend?
Forgive the intrusion, Captain, but I need some answers.
Darmok at Tanagra.
Shaka! Mirab, his sails unfurled.
Darmok.
Mirab.
Freeze. Darmok.
Darmok. Well, it seems to be a point of contention between them. Perhaps something the Tamarian captain proposed that the First Officer didn't like.
The apparent emotional dynamic does seem to support that assumption. As with the other terms used by the Tamarian, this appears to be a proper noun. The name clearly carries a meaning for them.
Computer, search for the term Darmok in all linguistic databases for this sector.
Searching. Darmok is the name of a seventh dynasty emperor on Kanda Four. A mytho-historical hunter on Shantil Three. A colony on Malindi Seven. A frozen dessert on Tazna Five. A
Stop search. Computer, how many entries are there for Darmok?
Forty seven.
All our technology and experience, our universal translator, our years in space, contacts with more alien cultures than I can even remember.
I have encountered one thousand, seven hundred fifty four non-human races during my tenure with Starfleet.
And we still can't even say hello to these people.
Correct.
A single word can lead to tragedy. One word misspoken or misunderstood. And that could happen here, Data, if we fail.
Replay at time index one four four.
Darmok at Tanagra.
Freeze. Computer, search for the term Tanagra. All databases.
Searching. Tanagra. The ruling family on Gallos Two. A ceremonial drink on Lerishi Four. An island-continent on Shantil Three
Stop. Shantil Three. Computer, cross-reference the last entry with the previous search index.
Darmok is the name of a mytho-historical hunter on Shantil Three.
I think we've got something.
A captain's log?
Darmok!
Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra!
I was curious. I meant no harm.
Shaka! Temba! His arms wide. Temba.
Enough! I'm not going to fight you. You'll just have to
Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra.
Temba. His arms wide.
I'll go along with that.
Commander, sensors are picking up an electromagnetic disturbance approaching the Captain's position.
Analysis?
A variable induction field. Possibly a life form.
How close is it to the Captain?
The field is erratic, appearing and disappearing, but it appears to be moving toward him.
Attacking?
Riker to La Forge.
La Forge here.
How close are we on that transporter?
Two hours, maybe three.
I want the Captain out of there now.
That's not very likely, sir.
I don't want to hear that, Commander.
Lefler, what's the resonance frequency?
Point three four over standard.
I want a resolution of point five three at the very least. Commander, I'll need about two more minutes.
But there's a good chance this isn't going to work.
If it fails
I know. We will have tipped our hand to the Tamarians. But it's a chance we have to take.
Agreed.
La Forge. Proceed.
We're on it. La Forge out.
Riker to transporter room one.
O'BRIEN:O'Brien here, Commander.
Stand by, Mister O'Brien.
Mirab, his sails unfurled?
Come on.
Shaka. When the walls fell.
Shaka, when the walls fell.
Shaka. You said that before. When I couldn't build a fire. Is that a failure? An inability to do something?
Darmok and Jalad
At Tanagra. I remember the words but I don't understand.
Matrix levels?
Annular convergence four three nine point two oh five. Confinement resolution point five two seven.
That isn't going do it. Increase thermal input coefficient to one hundred fifty percent.
Increasing now.
Status, La Forge.
We're almost there, Commander. Lefler, shunt the overload to the phase transition sequencers in transporter one.
Yes, sir.
La Forge to O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Go ahead, Commander.
Confirm phase sequencer linkage.
O'BRIEN:Link confirmed. Ready whenever you are, sir.
Uzani, his army at Lashmir.
At Lashmir? Was it like this at Lashmir? A similar situation to the one we're facing here?
Uzani. His army with fist open.
A strategy, with fist open. With fist open.
His army, with fist closed.
With fist closed. An army with fist open to lure the enemy. With fist closed to attack? That's how you communicate, isn't it? By citing example. By metaphor. Uzani's army with fist open.
Sokath. His eyes uncovered!
No!
O'BRIEN:I've got a piece of him, Commander, but that's all.
Boost the confinement beam.
One fifty seven over standard.
It's as solid as it'll go, Commander.
The Tamarian and the entity are in close proximity. The Tamarian's lifesigns are fluctuating.
The scattering field is still in full force. What the hell is wrong with them? Their sensors can read what's going on as well as ours can. Riker to O'Brien. Report.
O'BRIEN:The field's still deflecting the signal. There just isn't enough of him, sir.
Open a channel to the Tamarian ship.
Aye, sir.
Your captain is under attack. Drop your particle field.
Kailash. When it rises.
They have closed the channel.
O'BRIEN:O'Brien to Bridge.
O'BRIEN:I can't hold him, Commander.
Shaka.
when the walls fell.
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 45048.8. Our attempt to transport Captain Picard back to the ship has failed. My options are narrowing and my patience is all but gone.
Here's the situation on El-Adrel. The entity has moved off several hundred metres.
Captain Picard's bioscan readings are stable. The Tamarian's are not.
He may be injured.
If the entity decides to attack again, the Captain may be facing it alone.
The transporter's out of the question. The Tamarian ship has deepened the scattering field to the D region of the ionosphere. There's no getting through.
Unless we attack the ship itself.
Are you able to pinpoint the source of their particle beam?
They're using a polarity coil generator located aft of their warp drive. It's pretty heavily shielded.
Could we get through with our phasers?
Not with the first spread. It'd take a couple of hits.
That's not good enough. We need to knock out the scattering field in one shot and have the Captain back on the Enterprise before they know what happened.
If we selectively target the amplification pathways around the generator, it should be just as effective. And we can do it in one burst.
How long will it take to set up?
Worf and I would have to adjust the pre-fire chamber. That'll give us the focus we need. A few hours?
Make it so.
I would prefer to find a peaceful solution. If we could talk our way out of this one, that much the better.
Unfortunately, it may not be that simple.
What did you find out?
The Tamarian ego structure does not seem to allow what we normally think of as self-identity. Their ability to abstract is highly unusual. They seem to communicate through narrative imagery by reference to the individuals and places which appear in their mytho-historical accounts.
It's as if I were to say to you, Juliet on her balcony.
An image of romance.
Exactly. Imagery is everything to the Tamarians. It embodies their emotional states, their very thought processes. It's how they communicate, and it's how they think.
If we know how they think, shouldn't we be able to get something across to them?
No, sir. The situation is analogous to understanding the grammar of a language but none of the vocabulary.
If I didn't know who Juliet was or what she was doing on that balcony, the image alone wouldn't have any meaning.
That's correct. For instance, we know that Darmok was a great hero, a hunter, and that Tanagra was an island, but that's it. Without the details, there's no understanding.
It is necessary for us to learn the narrative from which the Tamarians drawing their imagery. Given our current relations, that does not appear likely.
Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra.
Our situation is similar to theirs. I understand that. But I need to know more. You must tell me more about Darmok and Jalad. Tell me. You used the words, 'Temba, his arms wide' when you gave me the knife and the fire. Could that mean give? Temba, his arms wide. Darmok. Give me more about Darmok.
Darmok on the ocean.
Darmok.  The ocean. Darmok on the ocean. A metaphor? For being alone? Isolated? Darmok on the ocean.
Are you all right?
Kiazi's children, their faces wet.
Temba, his arms open. Give me more about Darmok on the ocean.
Tanagra on the ocean. Darmok at Tanagra.
At Tanagra. A country? Tanagra on the ocean. An island. Temba, his arms wide.
Jalad on the ocean. Jalad at Tanagra.
Jalad at Tanagra. He went to the same island as Darmok. Darmok and Jalad Tanagra.
The beast at Tanagra.
The beast? There was a creature at Tanagra? Darmok and Jalad, the beast of Tanagra. They arrived separately. They struggled together against a common foe, the beast at Tanagra. Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra.
Darmok and Jalad on the ocean.
They left together. Darmok and Jalad on the ocean.
The ocean.  Zinda! His face black, his eyes red. Callimas at Bahar.
You hoped this would happen, didn't you? You knew there was a dangerous creature on this planet and you knew from the tale of Darmok that a danger shared might sometimes bring two people together. Darmok and Jalad at Tanagra. You and me, here, at El-Adrel.
Kira at Bashi. Temba, his arms wide.
My turn? No, I'm not much of a story teller. Besides, you wouldn't understand. Shaka. when the walls fell. Perhaps that doesn't matter. You want to hear it anyway. There's a story, a very ancient one, from Earth. I'll try and remember it. Gilgamesh, a king. Gilgamesh, a king, at Uruk. He tormented his subjects. He made them angry. They cried out aloud, send us a companion for our king. Spare us from his madness. Enkidu, a wild man from the forest, entered the city. They fought in the temple. They fought in the street. Gilgamesh defeated Enkidu. They became great friends. Gilgamesh and Enkidu at Uruk.
At Uruk.
The new friends went out into the desert together, where the great bull of heaven was killing men by the hundreds. Enkidu caught the bull by the tail. Gilgamesh struck it with his sword.
Gilgamesh.
They were victorious. But Enkidu fell to the ground, struck down by the gods. And Gilgamesh wept bitter tears, saying, 'he who was my companion through adventure and hardship, is gone forever.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. Despite the risk of war, I have no choice but to break the stalemate.
Phasers nearly ready, sir.
Stand by to fire, Mister Worf.
Commander. The Tamarian's bioscan is becoming unreadable. He may be dead, sir.
If we know that, so do the Tamarians. Riker to La Forge.
La Forge here.
I need those phasers.
Sir, sensors are tracking the entity. It is approaching Captain Picard's position.
I understand your sacrifice, Captain. Unfortunately, if our friend out there has its way, no one will ever know what you tried to do.
Nine metres and closing. The energy output of the entity has doubled, Commander. Six metres.
La Forge to Bridge. You have phasers.
Fire!
Their particle beam emitters are inoperative, sir.
Scattering field is down, sir.
O'Brien, energise.
O'BRIEN:We got him, Commander.
Maximum shields.
Aye, sir.
Red alert!
Starboard shields holding at fifty two percent. Forward shields are gone.
Let's get out of here.
That may not be possible, sir. The starboard nacelle sustained a direct hit. Warp engines are offline.
Go to impulse. Back us off.
They are matching our manoeuvres, sir, and firing.
Return fire, Mister Worf. Full phasers.
Firing, sir.
Their shields are holding. They are firing again.  Our shields have failed.
Commander, we cannot survive another hit.
Hail the Tamarian ship.
Aye, Captain.
Zinda! His face black, his eyes red
Temarc! The river Temarc in winter.
Darmok?
And Jalad. At Tanagra. Darmok and Jalad on the ocean.
Sokath, his eyes open!
The beast at Tanagra. Uzani, his army. Shaka when the walls fell.
Picard and Dathon at El-Adrel. Mirab, with sails unfurled.
Temba, his arms open.
Temba at rest.
Thank you.
Power has been restored, sir.
New friends, Captain?
I can't say, Number One. But at least they're not new enemies.
I hope I'm not intruding, Captain.
No, of course not, Number One. Please.
Damage reports ready for your review.
Thank you.
Greek, sir?
Oh, the Homeric Hymns. One of the root metaphors of our own culture.
For the next time we encounter the Tamarians?
More familiarity with our own mythology might help us to relate to theirs. The Tamarian was willing to risk all of us just for the hope of communication, connection. Now the door is open between our peoples. That commitment meant more to him than his own life. Thank you, Number One.
I don't know why we have to do this every year. I thought that last year the teachers had agreed that they wouldn't do this anymore.
Captain Picard Day is one of the children's favourite school activities. They look forward to it all year.
Why does it have to be me?
Because you're the Captain, and they look up to you. You're a role model for them.
Well, they seem to have a somewhat exaggerated impression of me.
I don't know. I think the resemblance is rather striking. Wouldn't you agree, Number One?
Isn't there something else you have to do?
I'll be on the Bridge.
Will.
The finalists will be here in half an hour. You have to pick a first, second and third place, and four honourable mentions.
Worf to Captain. Incoming transmission from Admiral Blackwell. It is coded Priority One.
Put it through, Mister Worf. Excuse me, Counsellor.
Yes, Admiral?
Captain, what is your status?
We are conducting energy output studies of the Mekoria Quasar. All systems normal. The ship is fully operational.
Good. I'm postponing the quasar study for the moment. The Enterprise is to rendezvous with the starship Crazy Horse in sector one six zero seven immediately. You're authorised to exceed warp speed limitations for the duration of this assignment.
I understand. What is our assignment?
I'd prefer not to discuss it over subspace channels. The Crazy Horse will be carrying someone from Starfleet Intelligence. He'll brief you when he arrives.
Very well.
Captain Picard Day?
Oh, er, yes. It's, er, it's for the children. I'm, er, ha, ha, I'm a role model.
I'm sure you are. Starfleet out.
So, who won the contest?
Paul Menegay, a seven year old. He did a most interesting clay sculpture of my head.
Was that the orange one with the lumpy skin?
Yes. Oh, you'll be interested to know that I've arranged for a Commander Riker Day next month. I'm even considering making an entry myself.
Great.
Energise.
Aye, sir.
Will. I'll bet you never thought you'd see me again.
It's good to see you, sir.
Yeah, sure it is. You look like you're about to faint.
No. It's just it's been a long time. Captain Jean-Luc Picard, Admiral Erik Pressman.
Pressman? Yes, of course. You were Will's first commanding officer, on the Pegasus.
That's right. As a matter of fact, the Pegasus is the reason I'm here.
Sir?
The Pegasus is still out there, Will. And the Romulans found her.
As you know, the starship Pegasus was lost in this sector some twelve years ago along with most of its crew. I was the captain and Commander Riker here was my helmsman.
I remember hearing about it. The ship was destroyed by a warp core breach as I recall.
The Captain and I, along with seven others managed to get to the escape pod before the breach became critical.
From space, we saw what appeared to be a matter-antimatter explosion which vaporised the ship.
No wreckage was found, so Starfleet officially declared the ship destroyed.
However, all that changed three days ago. Starfleet Intelligence has an operative in Romulan High Command. He sent us a message that a Romulan warbird had located a piece of debris in the Devolin system which was positively identified as being from the Pegasus. The warbird was then ordered to locate the rest of the ship, if possible, and retrieve it.
What would the Romulans want with pieces of a twelve year old starship?
The Pegasus was a prototype. Experimental engine, new weapon systems. In fact, some of our designs were used in constructing the Enterprise. There are a lot of things on board the Romulans would love to get their hands on.
What are our orders?
To find the ship before the Romulans do. Salvage it if possible, destroy it if necessary. You command the Enterprise while I remain in command of the overall mission.
We'll need metallurgical and chromographic specs on the Pegasus in order to set up the proper search parameters.
I'll make the appropriate information available to you.
Very well. Lay in a course for the Devolin system.
Aye, sir.
Captain, we are approaching the Devolin system.
Any sign of the Romulans?
No, sir.
Oh, they're out there. They're just waiting to see what you're going to do.
Mister La Forge?
There's an awful lot of ionising radiation in this system, Captain. That and the sheer amount of rock is going to slow down our search a little.
How slow?
I'd say at least
Sir, Romulan warbird decloaking directly ahead.
They are powering weapons.
Shields up. Red alert. Prepare phasers.
Sir, they are hailing us.
On screen.
I am Commander Sirol of the Romulan vessel Terix. To whom do I have the honour of speaking?
I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation starship Enterprise.
Captain Picard. I've heard so much about you. A pleasure to make your acquaintance. I hope our sudden appearance didn't startle you.
Not at all. But your unannounced appearance might have unfortunate consequences. It would be an awful shame if your ship were damaged due to some misunderstanding.
I am touched by your concern for my ship, but I doubt we were ever in any danger. May I ask what you are doing in this system?
I might ask you the same question.
We are conducting a survey of gaseous anomalies.
How interesting. So are we. Perhaps we could combine our efforts and share our findings.
I doubt our objectives are compatible.
Perhaps you're right.
This has been a most pleasant conversation, but we must return to our research.
Then I won't keep you.
Sir, they are moving off, resuming their tachyon scans of the system.
Stand down Red alert, but keep tracking their movement, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
Commander, how long will it take us to search this system?
At least seven days, sir.
And the Romulans have a two day head start.
Then let's get to it. Mister Data?
Initiating sensor sweep of grid zero one.
How long have you had that beard?
About four years. I got tired of hearing how young I looked.
What was it that Lieutenant Boylen used to call you?
Ensign Babyface.
You never did have much of a sense of humour.
I like to think that I've lightened up a little in my old age.
Really?
I've been known to tell a joke or two.
Well, it's about time. You were always so serious on the Pegasus.
We went through some serious times. Do you really think we're going to find the Pegasus again?
I wouldn't have come all the way out here if I didn't.
What about the experiment? Do you think we're going to find that too?
Maybe.
I think a lot about what happened, especially on that last day.
So do I. It's not the kind of thing you just forget.
Do you ever wonder if we did the right thing?
Never. What happened was a tragedy, yes, but it wasn't your fault and it wasn't mine. What we were doing was for the good of the Federation, and we can't blame ourselves if the others couldn't see that.
I know, but, maybe we went about it the wrong way.
Well, this time we may have a chance to do it the right way. If this mission is successful, if we find the Pegasus and the experiment, we can finish what we started twelve years ago.
You want to try again?
It's not just me, Will. The Chief of Starfleet Security has personally given me her assurance of complete support.
Admiral Raner? How many other people know about this?
Not many, and it's up to us to make sure it stays that way. Raner has given me written orders for you. You'll find them coded in the Enterprise computer. You've been instructed not to reveal the true nature of our mission to anyone else, not even Captain Picard. Will, don't worry. It won't be like it was twelve years ago. And this time, no one's going to stop us.
As a matter of fact, I never met Will until he reported on board at Farpoint Station.
You chose your first officer without ever meeting him?
I was looking through the records of about fifty candidates and Will's was much like all the others, filled with lots of dry statistics and glowing letters of recommendation that tell you nothing. I was about to put it aside and look at another file and then something caught my eye. There was an incident on Altair Three when Will was First Officer of the Hood. He refused to let Captain DeSoto beam down during a crisis. He disobeyed a direct order and he risked a general court martial because he thought he was right. When I read that, I knew that I had found my Number One.
You wanted someone with a history of disobedience?
I wanted someone who would stand up to me. Someone who was more concerned with the safety of the ship and accomplishing the mission than with how something looked on his record. To me, that's one of the marks of a good officer.
Frankly, I've always felt it was more important for an officer to trust his captain's judgment. In a crisis, there's no time for explanations. Orders have to be obeyed without question or lives may be lost.
I am aware of that, Admiral.
Of course you are. I guess this mission has brought up some old ghosts for me. You know what it's like to lose a ship. You're always wondering if there was something else you should have done, something you missed.
Admiral, the record regarding the loss of the Pegasus is a bit vague from the moment just before you abandoned ship. Is there anything that you can add to the official account?
I'm afraid not. But I can tell you this. Twelve years ago, I needed an officer that I could count on in a crisis. Someone who would support and obey my decisions without question. Someone who was willing to trust my judgment. And that someone was Will Riker. Without his loyalty, none of us would have survived.
What's wrong?
I think I busted a rib.
Excuse me. What were you doing?
I was doing bat'leth moves with Mister Worf. I jabbed when I should've blocked. He caught me right in the side. It's a good thing we were using sticks instead of the real blades.
It's broken all right. Give him ten cc's of terakine for the pain.
I can't believe how stupid I was.
You both must have got a little carried away, that's all.
No, it was my fault. I got distracted at a crucial moment.
It can happen to anyone.
I knew what I was supposed to do and I didn't do it. If those had real bat'leths I might be dead right now.
There, all better. Will, it's all right. You made a mistake. No harm done. You'll be better next time.
Yeah, maybe.
Scan of grid one five seven is complete. I am moving to grid one five eight.
The Romulan warship is still searching grid two seven zero.
They're sure spending a lot of time over there. I wonder if they
Commander, I think we might have just struck paydirt. There's a subspace resonance signature coming from that asteroid. From the frequency variances, it looks like the pattern from a Federation warp core.
Captain Picard to the Bridge. Take us to within ten kilometres of asteroid gamma six zero one.
Geordi's found something.
There's a subspace resonance signature coming from that asteroid, sir. It could be the warp core of the Pegasus.
I think he's right. I recognise some of the variance patterns.
Put the asteroid on the main viewscreen.
I have confirmed Geordi's readings. The resonance signature is originating from somewhere beneath the asteroid's surface.
Beneath the surface? How's that possible?
This asteroid contains several deep chasms large enough for a starship to enter. It is possible the Pegasus drifted into the asteroid's gravitational field and was pulled down into one of the fissures.
Sir, the Romulan warbird has altered course once again. They are heading toward our position.
They probably want to see what we're so interested in over here.
Mister Data, how long will it take to determine the exact location of the Pegasus?
At least another six hours, sir.
That's too long. If the Romulans start searching the asteroid, they could find the ship before we do.
I recommend we destroy the asteroid. It would take most of our photon torpedoes, but it would preclude any possibility of the Pegasus falling into Romulan hands.
Our top priority is to salvage the ship, Commander. I'll consider destroying it only as a last resort.
Yes, sir.
Captain, could you give me a third alternative?
Mister Data, would it possible to saturate the asteroid with verteron particles that could mask the resonance signature and prevent the Romulans from detecting it?
In order for the deception to succeed, it would have to appear to be a natural phenomenon. Verteron particles are artificial in nature.
Wait a minute. We could blanket the asteroid with high levels of ionising radiation. There's so much of it in the system already, the Romulans won't know the difference.
Mister Data?
Theoretically, sir, it should work.
If we do this, we have to do it fast the Romulans will be within sensor range in less than a minute.
Make it so, Mister Data.
Aye, sir. Initiating ionisation field pulse.
When he's finished we'll have to move away and make it look like we've scanned the asteroid but haven't find anything.
Lay in a course for the next search grid. Stand by to engage.
If it works, the Romulans won't find anything and we can return later. If it doesn't
If it doesn't work, we'll have handed them the Pegasus.
Ionisation pulse complete.
Helm, one quarter impulse. Engage.
The Romulans are initiating a tachyon scan of the asteroid. They have switched to their lateral sensor array. Beginning another scan.
They're certainly being thorough.
The warbird has completed its sensor sweep.
If they found the resonance signature, they should be sending away teams any second.
They are moving out.
Mister Data, we must convince the Romulans that we're still looking for the Pegasus. I want you to continue scanning this system.
Yes, sir.
I want to be back at this asteroid at oh eight hundred hours tomorrow. Plan your search pattern accordingly.
Aye, sir.
Admiral, would you care to join me for some late dinner?
Please excuse me, Captain, but I think I'd better turn in early.
You have the Bridge, Number One. Oh, and will you bring the scan analysis to my quarters when you're off watch?
Aye, sir.
Initiate search of grid one six three.
Beginning sensor sweeps.
Commander, I want to see you in the Captain's Ready room.
Mister Data, you have the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
What the hell is the matter with you? Destroy the Pegasus before we've even taken a look at it?
I thought it was more important that the Romulans
Well, you were wrong! We have a chance here to change the balance of power in this quadrant, but we can't very well do that if we destroy the Pegasus, now can we?
No, sir.
It hasn't been easy for you I'm sure, keeping your Captain and friends in the dark like this.
I haven't enjoyed it, if that's what you mean.
I hope you understand that it's necessary.
I understand that you think it's necessary.
You have changed.
Changed?
Something the Captain and I were talking about. To be honest I'm glad to see this kind of change in you, Will. State your opinion and stand by it. It's a far cry from the young man who used to sit at my helm and worry about pressing the wrong button.
A lot of things can change in twelve years, Admiral.
Yes, they can. But it's important that a man changes the right things in his life, not his sense of duty, not his sense of loyalty.
I'd like to think that I haven't changed those things, sir.
I would like to think that too. Because those things say more about a man than the rank on his collar or the uniform he wears. They define him. Twelve years ago, a lot of older and more seasoned officers turned away from their duty, but you stood up for what was right. I'm sorry, Will. I know the kind of man you are. I know that I can count on you again.
Come.
The scan analysis you asked for.
Thank you.
Is there something else, sir?
Yes, there is.  Judge Advocate General's Report. Stardate 36764. Subject, inquiry into mutiny aboard USS Pegasus. Based on testimony from Captain Pressman and other surviving officers, the Judge Advocate believes there is sufficient evidence to conclude that certain members of the crew did mutiny against the captain just prior to the destruction of the Pegasus. Mutiny on a Federation starship? That's shocking. It's unthinkable. And yet you've never mentioned it.
No, sir.
You know, it wasn't easy to get this record. I had to pull in quite a few favours at Starfleet just to get a look at it. It seems that it was classified by Starfleet Intelligence. So, not only was the Pegasus carrying sensitive equipment which must be allowed to fall into Romulan hands, not only was there a mysterious explosion which seemed to destroy the ship but didn't, but it seems there was a mutiny on board. Now, I've read the official report of the inquiry on that mutiny, but I want to know your version of what happened.
I was on the Bridge. The ship was at yellow alert. We were running some tests on the engines. Something went wrong. There was an explosion in Engineering. Heavy casualties. In the midst of this crisis, the First Officer, the Chief of Engineering and most of Bridge crew mutinied against Captain Pressman.
Why?
They thought he was jeopardising the ship.
And you?
I was seven months out of the Academy, my head still ringing with words like duty and honour. When they turned on him, I thought they were a bunch of self-serving, disloyal officers, so I grabbed a phaser and defended my captain. Two or three others joined us, but it was clear by then that the mutineers had most of the crew behind them. We felt a need to get off the ship. There was a running firefight all the way to the escape pod. About five minutes after we left the ship there was an explosion.
The Judge Advocate also believes that the surviving officers are deliberately withholding vital information from this inquiry. Further investigation is recommended. Will, there was no further investigation. This report was classified and then it was quietly buried. Why?
Sir, may I suggest you take this up with Admiral
I'm taking this up with you, Will! The Judge Advocate thought you were participating in a conspiracy to cover up the truth. Now, what the hell is going on here, Will? Why did that mutiny happen? Why is Pressman so determined to find your ship twelve years later?
I've said all I can. I am under direct orders from Admiral Pressman not to discuss this, sir.
Very well. He's an admiral, I'm a captain. I cannot force you to disobey his orders. Therefore I will have to remain in the dark on this mission. And I will just have to trust that you will not let Pressman put this ship at unnecessary risk. And if I find that that trust has been misplaced, then I will have to re-evaluate the command structure of this ship. Dismissed.
Captain, Starfleet places the highest priority on the success of this mission. Your request for a delay is denied.
Margaret, something's very wrong here. Do you know what's going on?
I know that the Chief of Starfleet Intelligence herself is watching this one, Jean-Luc. So you'd be well advised to follow Pressman's orders and leave it at that. Starfleet out.
Worf to Captain Picard. We are approaching asteroid gamma six zero one, sir.
On my way.
Mister Worf, where are the Romulans?
They are out of sensor range on the far side of the system.
Take us to within fifteen kilometres of the asteroid and hold that position.
Aye, sir.
Mister Data, report.
For the past several hours, I have been scanning the area where we detected the resonance signature of the Pegasus. From the strength and polarity of the signature, it would appear that most of the warp core is still intact.
If we're lucky, the entire engineering section could be down there.
But how do we get to it? I wouldn't want to try to transport through that much solid rock.
Agreed. What about a shuttle? We could send it down through one of these fissures.
I would recommend against it, sir. There may be gravimetric or magnetic fluctuations inside the asteroid which would overpower the engines of a shuttlecraft.
Sounds like the best solution is to take the Enterprise in.
Into the asteroid?
That's right. Put this fissure on the main viewer. This chasm is large enough for us to manoeuvre in. Besides, if we ever hope to salvage the Pegasus, we're going to need a starship to do it.
Mister Data?
It is theoretically possible, sir, but I am unaware of any prior situations where a starship was taken so deeply inside a planetary body. There may be unforeseen difficulties.
Admiral, I don't think we can risk
I've made my decision. Prepare to take the Enterprise in, Captain. That's an order.
Mister Data, will you please note in the ship's log that this action is being taken over my explicit objections.
It is so noted, sir.
Yellow Alert.
Shields up. Inertial dampers at maximum.
Ensign Gates, plot a course into the chasm, manoeuvring thrusters only.
Course plotted, sir.
Take us in.
We are now two kilometres beneath the surface.
Captain, we are encountering shifts in the magnetic field density.
Admiral, if is passage narrows to less than five hundred metres, I will abort the mission. You can charge me with insubordination if you wish, but I'm not going to risk the Enterprise for a salvage operation.
Captain, I am reading a large resonance signature directly ahead.
Pegasus.
What the hell happened?
Sensors show that the ship is still intact. However, sixty five percent of it is contained within the asteroid.
It looks if half the ship materialised inside solid rock.
Yes, sir. I do not understand how this could have happened.
Let's keep the speculation to a minimum. We have to begin the salvage operation. The equipment we need was in main Engineering. Can you scan that section of the Pegasus?
The starboard bulkhead of main Engineering is contained within the rock face, but most of its compartment is still intact.
There is a hull breach in that section.
If we begin a power transfer, can we restore life support systems to that compartment?
I believe so, sir. The breach can be temporarily sealed by extending our shields.
See to it. Once you've restored life support, Commander Riker and I will beam directly into Engineering.
Admiral, I would like to send down a complete away team
There's some very sensitive equipment over there. I don't want anyone else near it.
Yes, sir.
This room was open to space for twelve years.
Vacuum preserved everything.
I wonder how many of the crew are buried back there.
We're not here for a memorial service.  It's still intact. What's the matter, Will? Don't you understand? We've found it.
I know. I kept hoping it wouldn't be here. That it had been destroyed or that it was buried in that rock back there.
What the hell is that supposed to mean?
It means that I can't put this off any longer. Right up until this moment I had the luxury of time, but now I've got to make a choice. And, Admiral, I'm afraid my choice is this. I can't let you start these experiments again. It was wrong twelve years ago, and it is wrong today.
You had better reconsider that position, Commander. We have a mission to accomplish and you're going to carry it out.
That's all you care about, starting these damn experiments again. Look around. This room is filled with dead bodies. These people died because of this thing.
Keep your self-righteous comments to yourself. I knew most of these people a lot longer than you did. Yes, it was tragic, but it was their fault.
You don't know that. Neither of us knows what happened after we left.
Well, it's not hard to guess. They tried to shut down an experiment they didn't understand. Something went wrong and it killed them.
No. We killed them.
Now that doesn't sound like the same man who grabbed a phaser and defended his captain twelve years ago.
I've had twelve years to think about it, and if I had it to do over again I would have grabbed the phaser and pointed it at you instead of them.
So on reflection you'd rather be a traitor than a hero.
I wasn't a hero and neither were you. What you did was wrong and I was wrong to support you, but I was just too young and too stupid to realise it. You were the captain. I was the ensign. I was just following orders.
And if you hadn't you'd be dead right now along with all the rest of them. Dead because you listened to a bunch of mutinous cowards who were too blinded by fear to see what I was trying to do.
They were brave enough to risk their lives to stop you from violating a treaty the Federation signed in good faith.
That treaty has bound our hands and given the Romulans a tactical advantage for the last sixty years. I was simply trying to level the playing field.
And now you want to try it again? How many people will die this time? Fifty? A hundred? A thousand?
All right, you don't want to help me? Fine. But you are still under my direct orders not to talk about what you know and I expect you to follow those orders to the letter. I made you, mister, and I can break you just as easily. Do you understand me, Commander?
Picard to away team. Prepare to return to the ship immediately.
Stand by, Enterprise.
Pressman to Enterprise. Two people and one piece of equipment to beam up.
Report.
The Romulans have destroyed the entrance to the chasm with their disruptors. They've sealed us in.
Sir, there is an incoming message. It is from the warbird.
On screen.
Aye, sir.
Captain, you seem to be in a very unfortunate circumstance. How can we help?
Are you responsible for this?
I'm not sure. We were conducting some geological experiments on the surface of the asteroid. It is entirely possible that we accidently sealed you in. If only we had known you were beneath the surface, if you had shared your plans with us, this might have been avoided.
What do you want, Sirol?
I don't want anything, Captain, but I will offer to help you.
How?
By transporting your crew aboard my ship. We'll take you back to Romulus where, after a short stay as our guests, you will be returned to the Federation.
Thank you for your generous offer. I will take it under advisement.
As you wish. We will be continuing our research in this system for a while longer. I await your decision.
We can't do it. If we abandon the Enterprise they'll come back here and get their hands on both ships.
Agreed. Options?
Captain, I believe we could use the phasers to cut our way out.
The asteroid's internal structure is highly unstable. Any attempt to cut through the rock could cause the entire chasm to collapse.
Captain, I have a suggestion. There's a piece of equipment in Admiral Pressman's quarters under guard which might get us out of here. It's a prototype for a Federation cloaking device.
You just ended your career, Will.
That's what it's all about. A cloaking device. In the Treaty of Algeron the Federation specifically agreed not to develop cloaking technology.
And that treaty is the biggest mistake we ever made. It's kept us from exploiting a vital area of defence.
That treaty has kept us in peace for sixty years, and as a Starfleet officer, you're supposed to uphold it.
Now that's enough. I'm taking command of this vessel. Mister Worf, escort the Captain to his quarters.
I don't think anyone's going to come to your defence this time.
How do we use the cloak to escape from the asteroid?
It's more than just a cloak. It changes the structure of matter. In theory, a ship using this device could pass through normal matter.
I see why you were so eager to find it.
Can't you see the potential here? The phasing cloak could be the greatest breakthrough in weapons research in the last fifty years.
Except it's illegal. It's in violation of an agreement that the Federation signed in good faith.
Captain, I think we could adapt the cloak for the Enterprise.
Mister Data?
Theoretically it is possible, sir. But it would take several hours to study the device and determine how to link it to our systems.
Make it so.
Captain's log, stardate 47457.1. We have been trapped inside the asteroid for over eight hours. Mister Data and Commander La Forge inform me that they are nearly ready to engage the cloak.
Commander, we've routed the impulse engines through the plasma conduits, but you'll have to watch the intercooler levels. If they get too high, we'll blow the entire relay system.
Understood.
I think that's what happened twelve years ago. The cloak blew out the plasma relays on the Pegasus after we left the ship. The plasma ignited in space, and it looked as if the ship had been destroyed.
So the ship drifted into this system still in a phased state, and when it passed through this asteroid
The cloak failed, and half the ship materialised in solid rock.
La Forge to Bridge.
The cloak is online and ready to begin phase sequencing.
Proceed, Number One.
Aye, sir. Activating power systems.
Report.
The cloak appears to be functioning normally. The ship's matter-energy phasing rate should be sufficient to pass through the asteroid.
Take us out. Manoeuvring thrusters only.
Aye, sir. We will reach the rock face in five seconds.
We have passed through two kilometres of the asteroid. Now within one kilometre of the surface.
We're approaching the surface.
We have cleared the asteroid, Captain. The warbird is off the port bow.
They're still waiting for us to make up our minds.
Disengage the cloaking device, Commander.
You cannot do that! If the Romulans see us decloak, they'll know
They'll know the truth, Admiral. Which is what everyone will know very shortly. Carry out my orders.
Mister Worf, send a message to the warbird. Inform them that their government will be contacted shortly about this incident.
Aye, sir.
Admiral, I am hereby charging you with violation of the Treaty of Algeron. As Captain of the Enterprise, I'm placing you under arrest. Mister Worf?
Admiral, if you will come with me.
Captain, I'll have to be placed under arrest as well.  Admiral.
I have a lot of friends at Starfleet Command, Captain.
You're going to need them.
I've spoken to Fleet Admiral Shanthi. There will be a full inquiry once we reach Starbase two four seven, and that will probably lead to a general court martial of Admiral Pressman and several others at Starfleet Intelligence. Your involvement in this affair is going to be thoroughly investigated, Will. There'll be some hard questions for you to answer.
I understand.
You made a mistake twelve years ago, but your service since then has earned you a great deal of respect, but this incident may cost you some of that respect.
I can't help but feel I should have come forward a long time ago.
When the moment came to make a decision, you made the right one. You chose to tell the truth and face the consequences. So long as you can still do that, then you deserve to wear that uniform. And I will still be proud to have you as my First Officer.
How long to rendezvous, Mister Crusher?
Four minutes and thirty three seconds, sir.
Status of download, Mister Data?
The Yamato log should be in our computer by rendezvous, sir.
Have you nailed down our little hiccup yet?
Sir?
The odd reading?
No, sir. It might be due to problems currently being experienced by the Yamato.
Trouble, Number One?
I'm not sure, sir. Are we alone out here, Worf?
Yes, sir. There are no other vessels in the area except the Yamato, which is coming into visual range now.
At last.
Transmission from the Yamato, sir.
On viewer.
Donald, what's a nice Starfleet Captain like you doing in a place like this?
It's good to see you again, Jean-Luc, despite your antique humour. I only hope your people are able to help us. Malfunctions are becoming serious. We lost an engineering team when the computer shut down a forcefield in an open shuttlebay. Eighteen people.
Do you have any idea what caused this, sir?
None. They are affecting every system simultaneously. It's like the ship has suddenly decided to fall apart. It's beginning to make me think we should have run these Galaxy Class ships across a few more drawing boards before we built one.
You believe it's a design flaw?
I don't know. I'm grasping at straws here. All I know is we've got to get it fixed, and before I lose more than an engineering team.
Do you wish to evacuate any non-essential personnel to the Enterprise, sir?
No. No, that would be premature.
Donald, we'll get our teams to work on it immediately. I'm sure neither of us feels too comfortable sitting around in the Neutral Zone.
I know what you're thinking, what the hell am I doing here? Well, I had heard rumours about a couple of archaeological digs that started making the Iconians sound a lot less like legend. I did a little investigating, and I located their homeworld.
In the Neutral Zone?
In the Neutral Zone.
Donald, that was quite a risk to run to satisfy archaeological curiosity.
The risk would be in allowing the Romulans to locate Iconia. Fortunately, I got there first. It's a virtually dead planet, but enough technology remains to give the Romulans an edge if they should find it.
Donald, your transmission is breaking up. Mister Data, try and clean that up.
Sir, there is an energy build-up in the Yamato's Engineering section.
Yamato, this is the Enterprise. Yamato, come in.
Captain, magnetic seals in the antimatter chamber are decaying!
Captain! Donald, come in!
Shields up.
Sir!
Sensors indicate no life readings, sir.
Captain. Another vessel is coming within sensor range. It is Romulan.
Captain's log, supplemental. The Yamato's entire crew and their families, more than a thousand people, have been lost. Circumstances unfortunately permit us no pause for grief.
No response from the Romulan vessel.
Arm phasers and prepare to lock on target.
Did they attack the Yamato?
Unknown, sir.
All their weapons systems have been fully activated. Still no response.
Romulan vessel, this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
Captain Picard.
Explain your illegal presence in the Neutral Zone.
Explain yours.
Are you responsible for the destruction of the Yamato?
No. But believe me, Captain, had we chosen to exercise our right to defend the Neutral Zone, we would not have stopped with one starship. You will leave at once.
Mute.
Comments.
She's extremely anxious.
Understandable if she just destroyed a Federation starship.
Your scan was inconclusive. We don't know what happened to the Yamato.
Our presence in the Neutral Zone is provocative. It could force her to respond.
Open.
We will comply when I have determined the cause of the destruction of the Yamato, and when I am fully satisfied that you were not responsible. Picard out.
They are engaging their cloaking device.
Good. They can't fire when they're cloaked.
Unless they have overcome that deficiency. The Yamato was destroyed while they were cloaked.
Enough. Answers. I want answers, not conjecture. Number One, I want them at a staff meeting in one hour.
Aye, sir.
Sensor recordings reveal that what we witnessed was an uncontrolled and catastrophic matter-antimatter mix. The magnetic seals between the chambers collapsed and
Wait. Wait. That's not possible.
Yes, sir, it is, but a highly improbable series of events has to take place for such a result to occur.
Explain.
Okay. In the event of a breach of seal integrity there's an emergency release system which dumps the antimatter. DATA Apparently such a dump began, was then halted, and the containment seals were dropped. There was still sufficient antimatter present to lead to an explosion.
And so there is no evidence that a weapon was used?
No, sir. None.
However it happened, the Yamato did it to herself.
Theorise. What could have caused such a catastrophic malfunction?
I think Captain Varley may have been right. There may be a design flaw.
In a Galaxy Class starship?
Yes, sir. It's the most sophisticated piece of machinery ever built. Something could have been overlooked.
Knowing where the flaw is located, can you isolate the problem and solve it?
We're already working on it, sir.
Pull any personnel you can use.
If we have established that the Romulans were not responsible for the destruction of the Yamato, would it not be prudent to withdraw?
If it is a design flaw, we're better to stay where we are and give Geordi time to work on it. Or what happened to the Yamato could happen to us.
Computer, access Captain Donald Varley's personal log. Search parameter. Locate entries containing words Romulan and or Iconia.
Working.
Personal log. It was kind of Doctor Ramsey to allow me to carry away my own little piece of legend from the archaeological dig at Denius Three. My engineers have examined it, but are completely baffled by its technology. What was its purpose? I'm like a caveman confronted by a tricorder. I'm certain this device is Iconian, but how far had it travelled before it was abandoned on this alien world?  Personal log. A galactic Rosetta stone. The starfields on the artefact were unintelligible until I took into account two hundred millennia of stellar drift. After that it was easy to pinpoint Iconia.  My First Officer is questioning the wisdom of my order to violate the Neutral Zone, but I am convinced that I have taken the only proper course. Should this advanced technology fall into the hands of the Romulans, we might as well dock our ships and defend ourselves with sticks.  Personal log. We've been spotted by a Romulan cruiser, but after playing hide and seek through several solar systems, I think I've managed to elude them.  The Iconian probe scan. Was it an attempt at communication? If only I knew what we were dealing with here.  Personal log. I'm unable to send an away team to the surface of Iconia, nor can I scan the energy source on the planet because of these maddening system failures. It's infuriating to be stopped at the threshold of a dream by one's own ship. We're leaving orbit to rendezvous with Picard. If his people can't help us repair the Yamato, I must convince him to continue this exploration. The future wellbeing of the Federation may well depend upon it.
No further entries conforming to search parameters.
Mister Data, there's a reference in Captain Varley's personal log to a probe that scanned the Yamato.
Aye, sir. We have a visual record.
Put it on main viewer.
What the devil is that?
Have you seen anything like that before?
No, sir. It appears to be a scanner. Possibly a transmitter.
Transmitting what?
Unknown, sir.
Engineering.
La Forge.
What progress on the matter-antimatter scan?
Everything continues to check out. I'm starting an analysis on the magnetic coils.
When the Yamato was probed, where was she?
In orbit around a planet at coordinates two two seven mark three five nine, sir.
ETA at warp factor eight?
Twelve hours sixteen minutes, sir.
Sir, that would put us substantially close to the Romulan side of the Neutral Zone.
That can't be helped. Ensign, lay in a course. Warp factor eight.
Aye, sir.
We're going to assume the Yamato's mission.
And risk a war?
Perhaps prevent one.
Come.
Sir, may I speak with you for a minute?
Yes, of course. Well, what is it, Wesley?
It's about the Iconians, sir. I was told they were just a myth.
China was thought to be only a myth until Marco Polo travelled there. No, the Iconians were certainly real. Sit down. We know that three systems within this sector had a number of cultural similarities. Similarities which could only be explained by there being a single unifying influence.
So they colonised those worlds?
Probably conquered.
You mean they were warlike?
Perhaps. Ancient texts did speak of 'Demons of Air and Darkness'.
Air and darkness?
Legend has it that they travelled without the benefit of spaceships, merely appearing out of thin air on distant planets.
Sounds like magic.
Well, we would appear magical to Stone Age people.
How did you find all this out?
Archaeology has been a hobby since Academy days. But why don't we talk about what really brought you here?
It's the Yamato, Captain. I can't stop thinking about her. All those people dead. I don't know how you and Commander Riker and Geordi, how you handle it so easily.
Easily? Oh no, not easily. We handle it because we're trained to, as you will be. Tea, Earl Grey, hot. But if the time ever comes when the death of a single individual fails to move us
Didn't you order tea, sir?
Now that should not have happened.
Captain's log, supplemental. As happened with our sister ship, the Enterprise is being to experience a series of system failures. So far they are random, but I fear they could be early symptoms of what happened to the Yamato.
Engineering.
La Forge.
Lieutenant
Are you making any progress toward solving our problems?
Solving them, no sir, but I can eliminate one worry. It is not a design flaw.
I've been reviewing the Yamato's log, and I think maybe that alien probe had something to do with her problems.
How?
I need to see the thing.
If it was the probe, that explains the Yamato. But how do you account for the difficulties the Enterprise is experiencing?
I can't.
Lieutenant, Are our problems likely to attain the seriousness of those on the Yamato?
If you're asking for speculation, I'd say yes, sir, they are. I need time.
Mister La Forge, time is the one thing which we do not have in abundance.
Analysis, Mister Data.
Scanning, sir.
Well, Mister Data?
No life-form readings, sir.
All major cities have been heavily damaged, and the pattern of destruction is that consistent with large-scale orbital bombardment.
How long ago?
Approximately two hundred thousand years, sir.
There is an energy source in the mountains of the smaller continent.
Magnify.
Is that Iconia?
Captain Varley died believing that it was.
Did you see that?
Captain. Projectile launched from the planet's surface.
Its size and composition match the probe which scanned the Yamato, sir.
Shields up. Prepare a tractor beam. Mister La Forge, I'm going to assist you in your research. A probe has been launched from Iconia.
I'm going to capture it.
No, sir, wait! Captain! Captain!
Coming through!
Bridge!
Emergency stop!
Stop! Damn it!
Tractor beam ready, sir.
Geordi, are you all right?
Destroy the probe, sir. Quickly!
Worf, target phasers.
Phasers locked on target.
Fire!
Welcome to the Bridge, Mister La Forge.
Thank you, sir. If that thing had managed to scan us, we never would have had any chance of saving the Enterprise.
That probe was a transmitter sending an alien computer programme. The same programme that is currently aboard the Enterprise trying to rewrite our software in its own image. We have two completely incompatible computer systems trying to interact.
So that's why the ship's instruments have become so erratic.
Yes.
What can you do?
Not very much. The Iconian programme is so sophisticated I may never understand it.
Consider, Captain, this programme has entered an alien data base, ours, and in less than seven hours has managed to not only learn our systems, but has begun to reprogram our computer.
And so the earlier probe was responsible for the Yamato's destruction?
Yes, but only in as much as it was the probe that transmitted the programme.
But we weren't scanned by that probe. How did this thing get aboard the Enterprise?
We downloaded the Yamato log, and contained in the log was the programme.
Why didn't we suffered the same fate?
The programme affected all of the Yamato's systems simultaneously. But with us, it was deposited within a specific section of our mainframe, so it's having to work its way out from that location. That gives us a little breathing space.
Not much. The injury reports are increasing too, sir.
Doctor Pulaski is unwilling to trust the turbolifts. She is sending medical teams through the access tunnels.
Captain, the Enterprise computer system is a lot like our own bodies with voluntary and involuntary system. Now, probably ninety percent of what happens on this ship is done automatically. Completely out of our control. We're sitting on a bomb that could go off any second, or maybe never.
The biobeds aren't working? The ship is falling apart! I've had thirty-five emergency calls scattered across twelve decks. My trauma teams are being run ragged trying to respond. Biobeds!
Doctor Pulaski.
Yes.
I've got a problem here. The knitter isn't working.
Try a splint.
Doctor?
Splint. It's a very ancient concept. You take two flat pieces of wood or plastic, a bandage. The broken limb is kept immobile.
That's crazy, that's not practicing medicine.
Oh yes, it is. It's a time honoured way to practice medicine, with your head and your heart and your hands. So jump to it.
Damn!
Try a bypass on the shield control interface.
No go. Let me see if I can directly access the master programme.
Data?
Yes?
What happened?
Any answer would be mere speculation. This is yet another example of how our actions have random results.
Thanks, Data. I noticed.
Life support has failed on decks seven and thirteen, sir. Now what if this thing manages to rewrite our entire system? It's so far beyond us that we don't have a hope of understanding it, let alone controlling it. Our own ignorance could kill us.
We may never reach that point. A variation of what happened to the Yamato might destroy us first.
So we just sit here and watch our ship disintegrate around us?
The probe was launched from Iconia, probably from an automated system. There may be records near the launch site that could help us find a solution.
I'll arrange an away team.
And I'll lead it.
You will lead it?
Yes.
Sir, we've had this conversation a hundred times.
And we will have it again, Number One. I have been studying the Iconians since I was a cadet. I have to be the one to go. The Enterprise is yours.
For as long as she lasts.
O'BRIEN:I've got a fix on the energy source, and for the moment this baby's working, but that could change in an instant.
We're aware of the risks. Energise.
O'BRIEN:Transport complete.
Stay sharp, Mister O'Brien, I want to be able to pull them out of there at a moment's notice.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Commander, Romulan vessel.
Open hailing frequencies.
They're arming photon torpedoes.
Shields up! Go to Red Alert.
Sir, the shields aren't responding.
They are preparing to fire photon torpedoes.
Mister Crusher, I need those shields!
I'm trying, sir!
They're firing.
What happened?
Instead of firing they suddenly disarmed and cancelled.
Fate protects fools, little children and ships named Enterprise. Lock phasers on the Romulans and hold your fire.
Sir, the shields are back up.
Impeccable timing.
Sir, the shields are back down.
Phaser banks are down.
Shields are back up.
In another time and place this could be funny.
Status of torpedo banks?
They're down, too.
In case it should become necessary to fight, could you arrange to find me some rocks to throw at them?
Sir, the Romulan torpedoes are continuing to arm and disarm.
Maybe its attempt to fire was unintentional. Open hailing frequencies.
Open.
Romulan vessel, this is Commander William Riker, First Officer of the USS Enterprise. Why did you attempt to fire on us?
This is Sub-Commander Taris of the Haakona. Why have you penetrated deeper into the Neutral Zone?
Why are you still here?
I have claimed this planet for the Romulan Empire.
This is the Neutral Zone. Nobody can claim anything.
You will withdraw or I will be forced to destroy your ship and your away team.
What the hell?
This is your final warning, I will not
Having a little trouble with your systems, Commander? Maybe we could consider postponing the war until we solve our more immediate problem?
You're stalling for time.
Sir, another probe launched from the planet, heading toward the Romulans.
Have we got our phasers back?
No, sir.
Taris, if you've got phaser capability, prepare use them now!
What?
Destroy that probe!
And not even a thank you.
Sub-Commander Taris is deeply frustrated, probably because her ship is as crippled as the Enterprise.
Why would the Romulans be experiencing problems? They weren't probed.
They must have tapped into the Yamato log. Taris got a whole lot more than she bargained for. Maintain Red Alert. Try to keep those shields up in case Taris decides to act on her threat.
Commander, what about the away team? With the shields up, we can't beam them back.
Captain's log, supplemental. While there is little left on the surface of Iconia, we have found what appears to be a control centre which seems to have remained intact.
Come in, Enterprise. Still no response, sir.
Keep trying them. Communications are bound to be erratic.
I would not like to become a permanent resident of this planet.
Nor would I, Mister Worf.
Scanners show no other life forms on the planet, sir.
I would not expect any. Judging from the severity of bombardment, I doubt any Iconians survived. Well, Mister Data, let's see what sense we can make of this.
Aye, sir.
This is very reminiscent of Dinasian.
Yes, sir. There are also similarities to Dewan and Iccobar.
Is it possible that they could be branches of the same language family, beginning with Iconian?
It is, sir.
Run a comparison using basic simple words from Dinasian, Dewan and Iccobar. See if we can reconstruct a common root language.
Accessing, sir.
You're jumpy.
The tension on the ship is very high.
What's your recommendation?
Give everyone something to do, somewhere to focus their attention.
All right. Let's consider evacuation.
To the planet?
I know it's probably impossible with Taris sitting out there, but it would give everyone something to do. You go and organise it.
But you might need me if you have to negotiate with Taris again.
I'll manage. Right now, they're more important.
Captain, your original hypothesis is correct. Iconian is the parent tongue of a language family which consists of Iccobar, Dewan and Dinasian. I have constructed a basic working understanding through a comparison of common root words such as mother, father, child, home, tribe, food, life, death, yours, ours, mine
Data, Data, Data.
You do understand, sir, that my interpretation of the symbols will not be exact?
Yes. Let's get on with it.
This would appear to be manual override.
That was not manual override.
Demons of Air and Darkness, indeed.
What is that?
A gateway?
These scenes could be holographic images.
Be careful.
Data! That was very foolish.
But we have established that this is not a holograph. If I step through and investigate, we could determine whether it is truly a gateway.
No, Data. You might not be able to get back, and I can't risk losing you.
If it is not illusion, this gate would seem to take us beyond the confines of this planet.
Is this how the Iconians travelled? Crossing light years as easily as we would cross a room? Those places could be on worlds in distant sectors of the galaxy. I think the Iconians might have out-foxed their enemies. Maybe they didn't all die in the bombardment. Some of them could have passed through this. This is what Varley feared. This is what he died for.
Sir?
The Romulans could use this technology as a weapon.
Like the Iconians did.
No, I disagree. Captain, there is nothing in this room to indicate it was used as a military command centre. Perhaps a transporter room?
But the probe was hostile.
We can't make that assumption. The effect on the Yamato was devastating, but what if it was by accident, not by design. What I'm going to say may sound unscientific, but standing on this soil, breathing in this air, my instincts tell me that we may have got them wrong.
But we do know that the Iconians were conquerors.
But that knowledge was passed down by the descendants of those who attacked this world. The victors invariably write the history to their own advantage. There is an unfortunate tendency in many cultures to fear what they do not understand. It's possible that their enemies, confronted with this technology, were driven to attack the Iconians out of fear.
Sir!
Was that really the Enterprise?
I believe that it was. Gentlemen, we have a way home.
Captain, there is a vast underground power source which is controlled by this console. I believe my triggering of the gateway has caused a dramatic upsurge in power level. Ah, I have access.
Data, can you hear me? Data, respond.
Captain.
Are you all right?
No, I am damaged.
How bad is it?
The Iconian programme is attempting to rewrite my software. Physical manifestations, blindness, motor con
Sir, without him we have no hope of deciphering the programme. Captain, the Enterprise again.
How long is the interval?
About four minutes, if the cycle holds.
The next time the Enterprise appears, go through it with Data. Geordi will be able to learn from him. Maybe help him.
Sir, we have not yet established that that is truly a gateway.
This will be the test.
Aye, sir.
Destroy the tricorder.
Sir, it contains everything we've discovered up to this point.
And that is precisely why it must be destroyed. How long?
About three minutes.
I'm running out of time. We all are. Data. Data, I have to destroy this. This control room and its technology must not be allowed to fall into Romulan hands.
I understand, sir.
How! How do I do it? How do I destroy everything? The control room, the probes, all of it.
The power source, sir.
I detonate it. But how? How do I do that?
The probes, sir.
Probes? The probes. Launch? I launch the probes? But why? What's good will that do?
The doors, sir.
Doors?
Perhaps the probes are in a launch bay.
And if the doors are closed, then the backwash from the rockets will spill into the power grids and there'll be an overload.
Yes, sir.
But the doors will open automatically when the launch begins. And I will override.
Correct, sir.
Which control keys? Damn. Of course, you can't see.
Help.
Worf, help him up.
Describe, please.
I'm standing directly in front of the gate. To my left there is a small triangular screen.
Right one metre.
Right. Now, to my right is a larger triangular screen. The top is solid amber. To the left, red.
Correct. Key blue, amber, amber, red.
That's the launch sequence? How do I override the doors?
Blue, blue, blue.
I hope that's not a stutter. I don't know how long a delay there will be between the launch and the detonation. I'll hold keying the launch sequence until you're through the gate. How long until the Enterprise reappears?
Almost time. Captain, you will be killed.
I'll go through the gate.
But where will you end up?
Very shortly, anywhere will be preferable to this room. Mister Worf, I am depending on you. You must get Data back to the Enterprise. He may be their only hope.
Aye, sir.
Commander! Look!
Worf! What happened? Where's the Captain?
We must take Data to Engineering. Hopefully the Captain will follow.
I don't know how to help him. But comparing recorded norms for Data to the current readings, it's clear that all his functions are just going crazy. If we had an expert, a Maddox, somebody, I
He's gone.
Kandar qui. Kandar pro. Kandar kija. Kandar sis. Kandar exen.
Data!
What the hell?
I am accessing.
The self-correcting mechanism.
Captain? Captain?
It's constantly kicking in to make minute adjustments in the positronic brain.
I am on the Enterprise. How did I get here?
He cleared the Iconian programme from his own system. How?
Iconia? I was on Iconia, now I am on the Enterprise.
Geordi, this is critical. How?
Okay, give me a second to think. There was an incompatible programme running through Data's system, so the mechanism started searching for a way to keep him alive. The solution. The solution was a shutdown and a total wipe of all affected memory.
Query. What have I forgotten?
Can you do the same thing with the Enterprise?
I don't see why not, but it will have to be a complete shutdown. We turn her off, and effect a wipe of the Yamato log including every subsequent event since we downloaded it. I'll then be able to reload all the ship's programs from the protected archives in the main core.
Geordi, if we shut down that means we're going to be bringing down the shields, and we're hanging nose to nose with a Romulan battle cruiser.
Hey, Commander, whether it's Romulan phasers or our own warp engines, we're just as dead.
Make it so.
May I help?
Kandar nien, kandar cobar,
Kandar konyen.
O'BRIEN:All systems functioning.
Lock on the Captain, bring him back.
O'BRIEN:Scanning, sir. Got him.
Kandar jet, kandar se, kandar tor, kandar eir, kandar
O'BRIEN:I've lost him!
Damn it!
O'BRIEN:Got him, sir. He's on the Romulan ship.
How the hell?
Go to your stations. You did this. You sabotaged my ship.
Oh, no.
I cannot deactivate the auto-destruct, but at least I have the satisfaction that you will die with us.
Not, I think, today, Commander.
Bridge, Picard.
Yes, Captain.
Take us out of here. The Romulan ship is set to auto-destruct and they can't deactivate it.
Wait, sir. Open hailing frequencies.
O'BRIEN:Open, sir.
Commander Taris, prepare to receive a transmission from our Chief Engineer. He'll instruct you how to purge your system.
Agreed, Enterprise. Standing by.
Commander, your transmission has been received
And acknowledged.
Now, Mister Data, warp speed, please. Just in case Taris's engineer is not as efficient as our Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir.
Well, Number One, I can see why you want to keep the away missions to yourself. That's where the excitement is. So, what's been happening here? Same old routine, I suppose?
We will have to move quickly if we are to be successful.
Successful?
Yes. In preventing a Klingon civil war.
I would speak with you.
I do not hear the words of traitors.
It was Duras' father who betrayed our people to the Romulans at Khitomer, not mine.
We have discovered that our brother did indeed have a son and heir.
Follow me, and I will show you honour.
Your blood will paint the way to the future.
If we go to the aid of the Bortas, we'll be dragging the Federation into a Klingon civil war.
You both fought as warriors. I return your family honour.
Mister Worf, your responsibilities as a Starfleet officer are incompatible with remaining on board a Klingon ship during a time of war.
Then I resign my commission as a Starfleet officer.
Picard has rejected Gowron's plea for help. The Enterprise has left orbit.
We should not discount Jean Luc Picard yet. He is human, and humans have a way of showing up when you least expect them.
Maintain course. Status of warp engines? Warp engines at fifty percent.
Status of shields?
Aft shields buckling.
Transfer auxiliary power to shields!
Aft shields are gone! We cannot win. We must withdraw.
Keep your place! New course. Three zero seven mark two seven five.
But sir, that takes us dangerously close to the
GhoS!
We are entering the star's corona. We will reach the photosphere in thirty seconds.
Stand by to enter warp on my command. Set course two five zero mark zero one five.
Shields failing. Outer hull temperature exceeding design limit. Captain!
Maintain course.
They're closing on us!
Stand by. DaH!
Captain's log, stardate 45020.4. We have arrived at Starbase two thirty four, where I have taken the opportunity to make a proposal to Fleet Admiral Shanthi.
There have been three major engagements in the last two weeks, all of them won by ships loyal to the Duras family.
None of which is our concern, Jean-Luc. The Klingon civil war is, by definition, an internal matter of the Empire.
Agreed. But if the Duras are being aided by the Romulans, it becomes very much our concern. The Romulans have been attempting to destroy the Klingon-Federation Alliance for the past twenty years. At the same time, the Duras have been secretly conspiring with the Romulans. Doesn't it strike you as odd that the Duras are able to field such an overpowering force against Gowron? That they outmatch him at almost every turn?
Some would call it good leadership.
And some would say they must be getting help. The Romulans are prepared to take enormous risks to gain any advantage over the Federation. Can we seriously believe that now, with the future of the Klingon Empire in the balance, they are content to stand by and watch?
What is it you propose, Captain?
We must stop the flow of supplies and equipment to the Duras from the Romulans. What I propose is that we send a fleet to the Romulan-Klingon border. We'll take no offensive action, but we will be in a position to expose any Romulan supplies that attempt to cross the border.
A blockade.
Exactly.
But how would you overcome the Romulan cloaking device?
My Chief Engineer has developed a system that should nullify that advantage. Each ship will send out an active tachyon beam to the other blockading ships. Now, in theory, any cloaked vessel that attempts to pass between our ships must cross that beam and be detected.
I'll have to clear this with the Federation Council. In the meantime, assemble your fleet, Captain.
Nicely done. I hope we know what we're doing.
So do I, Number One.
Captain's log, stardate 45021.3. Convincing Starfleet Command to establish a blockade was relatively painless. Implementing that plan is proving more troublesome.
Starfleet is stretched pretty thin across the quadrant. There are only about twelve ships within a day's travel of this position.
The only other ships available are either in spacedock for repairs or still under construction. Most of them don't even have full crews yet.
We could probably scare up seven, maybe eight, more ships.
Mister La Forge, can you implement your tachyon detection grid with twenty ships?
It's possible, but the more ships, the bigger the net we can throw.
All right. I want to add the Tian Nan Men, the Sutherland and the Hermes, whether the yard superintendent says they're ready or not. Mister Data, will you select a group of experienced Enterprise officers to augment the crews of those ships.
Aye, sir.
Will, I want you to command the Excalibur. Her crew was reassigned when she put in for repairs. Geordi, you will be his First Officer.
Aye, sir.
I want the fleet underway by oh nine hundred tomorrow. Thank you, gentlemen.
Yes, Mister Data?
May I ask a question, sir, of a personal nature?
Yes.
I am confused. Why have I not been assigned to command a ship in the fleet, sir?
Well, I felt that you would be needed here. Why do you ask?
You have commented on the lack of senior officers available for this mission. I believe my twenty six years of Starfleet service qualifies me for such a post. However, if you do not believe the time has arrived for an android to command a starship, perhaps I should address myself to improving my
Commander. I believe the starship Sutherland will need a captain. I can think of no one better suited to the task than you.
Thank you, sir.
You always did have fools working for you, Larg. Now you don't have as many!
You were lucky, Kurn, but luck always runs out. Someday I will stand over your broken corpse and drink to the victory of the Duras!
Ah, Worf, good. This piece of baktag is Captain Larg. He commanded the squadron that tried to destroy us yesterday.
The infamous Worf, son of Mogh. What is that you are wearing? That is the uniform of a Klingon!
The Capital City is neutral ground and Larg's men are all around us. As are mine.
Good to drink with you, Kurn. May you die well.
Die well, Larg.
You drink with our enemies?
How many are Gowron's men? How many are Duras? Does it matter? When we meet in battle, we will fight to the death, but here, here we're all warriors, all Klingons.
The repairs to the Hegh'ta are proceeding. The port stabilisers
Is there nothing in your heart but duty?
It is my responsibility.
We all have responsibilities and duties, But you and I are warriors fighting in a great war. Think of it. You and I will fight battles that others can only dream of. The time for glory is here. It is not a time to worry about stabilisers. It is a time to celebrate, for tomorrow we all may die! Come, let us, the sons of Mogh, live this night as if it were our last.
B'ETOR:Worf is not like his brother.
No. He tries to be, but he's still unsure of himself.
B'ETOR:Perhaps he needs something to help restore his confidence.
I think he'll find our offer appealing.
B'ETOR:I'll make sure he does.
You've got to keep this mixture above ninety percent or we'll never leave orbit. Thank you, Mister Krags.
I am Lieutenant Commander Data.
Lieutenant Commander Christopher Hobson.
By order of Starfleet, I hereby take command of this vessel. Please note the time and date in the ship's log.
Excuse me, sir. I'd like to request a transfer.
May I ask why?
I don't believe I'd be a good first officer for you.
Your service record to date suggests that you would perform that function adequately.
No, no, no, that's not what I mean. I don't think that I would be a good first officer for you.
Why?
Frankly, sir, I don't believe in your ability to command this ship. You're a fellow officer and I respect that, but no one would suggest that a Klingon would make a good ship's counsellor or that a Berellian could be an engineer. They're just not suited for those positions. By the same token, I don't think an android is a good choice to be captain.
I understand your concerns. Request denied.
O'BRIEN:The Endeavour has cleared the dock, Captain. All ships standing by.
Good. Course one one eight mark three five seven, full impulse power. Signal the fleet to get underway. We'll enter warp once we're clear of the system.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Engage.
B'ETOR:The Romulan convoy is late. We need those supplies.
Gowron has suffered another loss in the Mempa system. His forces will not threaten you in that region for some time.
B'ETOR:But if Gowron
The convoy will arrive in due course.
The Federation fleet has left Starbase two thirty four. They've set course for Klingon territory.
How many?
At least twenty starships.
Who's commanding this fleet?
Picard.
What does it mean? Is the Federation going to enter the war? Should we attack them before they get here?
Silence the child, or send him away. Movar, I want you to return to Romulus immediately. Have all available ships rendezvous at these coordinates in two days.
Yes, Commander.
Twenty ships aren't enough to wage a war. Starfleet must be bluffing.
Perhaps.
Our forces in the Mempa sector are now in full retreat. They will need to regroup near Beta Lankal.
We destroyed their supply bases in that sector three weeks ago. How can they continue to fight?
They must be getting help.
Maybe they have better leaders. I say you have failed as our leader, Gowron.
There is no time for this! We must make plans before those forces reach Beta Lankal! How can we oppose the Duras when we continue to fight among ourselves?
Gowron must answer a challenge to his authority.
Stop it! Do we to fall upon ourselves like a pack of Ferengi? The enemy is the Duras. We are at war!
Now the war can continue.
O'BRIEN:We're crossing into Klingon territory, Captain.
Signal the fleet to maintain yellow alert until further notice.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Begin long range scans of the Romulan border.
O'BRIEN:No uncloaked ships within sensor range. A few subspace anomalies, but nothing firm.
Those anomalies could be cloaked ships.
O'BRIEN:Could be, sir.
Open a channel to the Excalibur.
Excalibur, Riker here.
Deploy the fleet, Will. It's time to spread our net.
Yes, sir.
We've arrived at the designated coordinates, Captain.
All stop. Notify the flagship that we have assumed station.
Starboard power coupling has overloaded. We've got a radiation leak on decks ten through twelve.
Why are the backups not functioning?
There wasn't enough time to test all the backups before we left the yard. Terry, I want you down in Engineering working on a new coupling.
You have taken the phaser and torpedo control units offline.
Keith, you and I will start bringing the radiation
Mister Hobson, it is inappropriate for you to determine a course of action without consulting the commanding officer.
I was trying to safeguard the lives of people on those decks, but you're right. Belay those orders, everyone. Phasers and torpedoes are back online. What should we do, sir?
You will take the phasers and torpedo units offline and begin repairs of the starboard power coupling.
Thank you, sir. You heard the Captain, everyone.
We're ready, sir.
Mister La Forge, how long do you think it will take the Romulans to detect the tachyon field once it's activated?
Not long Romulan sensors are as good as ours.
Very well. Energise the network.
There's an increase in tachyon emissions from the Federation fleet.
They're using the beams as a detection field.
If we try to cross it, they'll see us, even if we're cloaked.
Issue orders to begin work on a way to penetrate this field. In the meantime, we'll have to convince Captain Picard he should leave.
O'BRIEN:Captain, I'm picking up something directly ahead. Romulan ship decloaking. Shall I raise shields?
Not yet.
O'BRIEN:They're hailing us, sir.
On screen. Tasha?
No, Captain. I am Commander Sela. The woman you knew as Tasha Yar was my mother. Deploying an invasion fleet along our border is a clear act of aggression, Captain. It will not be tolerated. You have twenty hours to recall your ships and return peacefully to Federation territory.
So you believe her, Counsellor?
I'm not saying we should accept her claim at face value, but I sensed no deception from her. She really believes she is the daughter of Tasha Yar.
Regardless of what she believes, Sela can't be her daughter. I've reviewed all of Tasha's medical records, and there is no indication that she was ever pregnant.
Besides, Tasha was a child when this woman was born.
Sela could have been cloned.
Or had her appearance surgically altered.
But why? What possible advantage could there be to the Romulans? As this now stands, I don't think this will have any impact on our strategy. We'll continue the blockade, leave the next move to them. Thank you.
Am I intruding?
No, not at all. Is something wrong?
News travels fast. I heard that Tasha Yar's daughter is aboard the Romulan ship.
I think that the Romulans are just hoping to create a distraction. They want to keep us off balance.
How much do you know about what happened to the last ship called Enterprise?
Enterprise C? She was lost at the battle of Narendra Three, defending a Klingon outpost from the Romulans.
And the survivors?
There were stories of prisoners taken back to Romulus, but these were only rumours.
No. There were survivors. And Tasha Yar was one of them.
Guinan, that was twenty three years ago. Tasha Yar was only a child.
I know that. But I also know she was aboard that ship and she was not a child. And I think you sent her there.
How can that be?
I don't know. I just know that you did.
Tasha died, a year before you came on the Enterprise. You never met her.
I know that.
If you have only a vague intuition
You can't just dismiss this. If I'm right, then you are responsible for this whole situation.
I think that it's time I met Commander Sela.
We are at war. Gowron should forbid any challenges until we are victorious.
A Klingon does not postpone a matter of honour.
A Klingon should place the good of the Empire above his own pride.
So now Gowron no longer suits you. Perhaps you mean to challenge him for the leadership of the Council?
No.
Then do not speak of this again! I did not wish to follow Gowron. You came to me and insisted we support Gowron against the Duras family. The time for debate is over. We are Klingons. He is our leader. If that is not enough for you, then perhaps you made the wrong choice when you put on that uniform.
Well, Captain, what is this urgent matter we need to discuss?
Please, won't you sit down?
I'm afraid that you have misinterpreted our presence here. I want to reassure you that we have no hostile intention.
Ah. Then I can tell my superiors that a fleet of twenty three Federation starships is on our border for, what, humanitarian reasons?
It is our intent to prevent any external power from interfering in Klingon affairs.
Nor do we have any plan to do so. But Captain, if for any reason we chose to enter Klingon territory, how would you stop us? With our cloaking devices we can slip by you at will.
Then why don't you just take your ships across?
You sound eager for us to try. Perhaps you've discovered a method in detecting our ships? However, I don't think you asked me here to discuss our military situation.
All right. Why did I invite you here?
You want the answer to the only question on your mind. How could Tasha Yar be my mother?
It's been suggested that she was aboard the Enterprise C when it was destroyed twenty four years ago, that she was one of the survivors and that obviously you are a product of a union between her and a Romulan.
But you know that's impossible. She would have been a child when that battle occurred.
And yet you claim that it is possible, that you're the daughter of Tasha Yar.
Yes, she was on that ship twenty four years ago. She was sent there by you from the future. She was among those few who survived. They were all to have been executed after the interrogation, but a Romulan general saw her and became enamoured with her. So a deal was struck. Their lives would be spared if she became his consort. I was born a year later.
I want to meet your mother. Can you arrange that?
One night, when I was four years old, she came to me. She bundled me up and she told me to stay quiet as we left the compound. I realised she was taking me away. She was taking me away from my home, my father, so I cried out. My father offered her life. He gave her a home, gave her a child, and how did she repay him? By betrayal. They executed her. Everything in me that was human died that day with my mother. All that's left is Romulan. Never doubt that.
Doubts? I'm full of them. But nothing in my experience can persuade me that what you have told me is true. And I do know one thing. It will not affect my judgment at our next encounter.
You have fourteen hours, Captain. I suggest you use them wisely.
B'ETOR:Is something wrong?
Welcome, Worf, son of Mogh.
What do you want?
The same as you. Personal honour. Glory for the Empire.
Your family has never valued honour.
B'ETOR:You knew only our brother. We are not like him.
Our brother made many mistakes. One was to make you an enemy.
B'ETOR:We would rather be your friends.
Then you should not have opposed Gowron.
B'ETOR:Gowron is nothing.
Toral is Duras' only son, and he will be the leader of the Council. In your heart, even you know that. But Toral needs guidance.
B'ETOR:A firm hand.
A father figure. That could be you, if you were mated to B'Etor.
B'ETOR:The rewards could be greater than you can imagine.
Nothing will stand in our way.
B'ETOR:We could rule the Empire together.
Join us, Worf, and usher in a new era for our people.
An era where honour has no meaning? Where Klingons trade loyalties in dark rooms and where the Empire is ruled from Romulus.
Enough, Lursa. You failed. I need to know the strength and capabilities of the Federation fleet. I don't have time for this. Turn him over to the guard. B'Etor can have him back when they've finished with him.
Come!
In thirteen hours we'll be forced to either withdraw from the border or fight the Romulan fleet. Neither alternative is acceptable. We must expose their involvement before the deadline.
What is it you propose?
If you launch a full-scale attack now, then the Duras fleet will call for supplies. Lursa and B'Etor will call for help. The Romulans will try to run the blockade, and we'll be ready for them.
And once the Romulan connection has been exposed, support will fall away from Lursa and B'Etor. Very well. I will make preparations. One thing more, Picard. Worf has been captured by the Duras. I hope he dies well. Qapla!
When Gowron begins his attack, then we will make our move. Excalibur will fall back with engine problems. You will take the Akagi and the Hornet to this position, which will open a small gap in our detection net.
And if the Romulans are already aware of the tachyon field, they should run the blockade at that point.
Exactly. When they try to bring their ships through, the Enterprise and the Tian Nan Men will swing around, close the gap and catch them in the act.
Very nice. I'd better get back.
Good luck, Will.
Good luck, Captain.
We've just received an urgent message from Lursa and B'Etor. Gowron's forces have attacked in three sectors. The Duras are nearing defeat.
You mean they were caught unprepared and now they're crying for help. Have the science sections found a way to circumvent the detection grid yet?
We think so. Just before we cross the border, we'll send out a massive tachyon pulse. A burst that large should cause enough interference to disable a part of their network.
Good.
One of their ships is moving off the blockade line.
Their warp drive is failing.
Picard is redeploying the fleet to compensate for the missing ship. There's a gap opening in the net.
He doesn't have enough ships to maintain the network.
If we act quickly we can move through. Commander?
No. I don't think so.
But it's what we've been waiting for.
Yes I know and so does Picard. He's giving us exactly what we need and he expects us to take it. No. We won't step into Picard's trap. We will disable part of his network here, where they're weakest. We'll direct the energy burst right at the ship with the android Captain.
O'BRIEN:Sir, the detection net is picking up activity from the Romulans. Fifteen cloaked ships spreading out along the border.
Signal the fleet to stand by.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Now.
Come to course zero eight zero mark two nine five.
O'BRIEN:There's a disruption in the tachyon detectors! It's localised to this segment of the net.
Open a channel to the Sutherland.
Data here, sir.
We're reading a disruption of the tachyon net in your area.
Yes, sir. The Romulans have released a high energy burst. The net is no longer effective in a radius of ten million kilometres around the Sutherland.
That's where they're going through. Send a signal to the fleet. All ships to fall back and rendezvous at Gamma Eridon. We'll re-establish the net there.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
All Federation ships proceed at maximum warp to Gamma Eridon.
Acknowledge the signal. Ensign, lay in the course and engage at warp nine point three.
Aye, sir.
What are you doing?
In disrupting the detection net, the Romulans may have caused a residual tachyon signature to form around their own ships.
But we have no way of detecting it.
All stop.
Aye, sir. All stop.
Sir, the fleet's been ordered to Gamma Eridon.
The tachyon signatures will not last long. By the time the fleet is deployed, it will be too late. Begin to reconfigure the sensors to detect ionised particle traces.
The entire area's been flooded with tachyon particles. We'll never be able to find what we're looking for.
I am aware of the difficulties. Please bring the phasers back online.
That will flood three decks with radiation!
We will initiate radiation protocol when necessary.
You don't give a damn about the people whose lives you're throwing away. We're not just machines
Mister Hobson! You will carry out my orders or I will relieve you of duty.
Yes, sir.
O'BRIEN:Captain, the Sutherland isn't heading for the rendezvous point. She's come to a full stop.
Open a channel.
The Enterprise wants to know the reason we've stopped.
Display sensor schematic. Display sensor sweep, maximum range.
Are you going to answer the Enterprise?
Overlay display with tachyon emissions. Highlight any tachyon signatures which show subspace inertial displacement. Concentrate a sensor sweep in that area.
Sir, this is pointless. Those readings could be anything. There's no way for us to be sure the Romulans are out there.
Reconfigure photon torpedo warhead yields. Set for high energy burst level six.
Level six? But that won't even
Do it!
Torpedoes ready. Another message coming in. It's Captain Picard!
Mister Data, you were ordered to rendezvous with the fleet at Gamma Eridon. Acknowledge.
Stand by, Captain. Mister Hobson, prepare to fire.
Didn't you hear? Captain Picard wants us
Fire. Fire!
They have discovered us!
Reverse course. Order the fleet back to Romulan territory.
Commander, the Duras need this convoy. Without these supplies, they cannot win.
We've been exposed. It's over.
But what should I tell Lursa and B'Etor?
Tell them they're on their own.
They're changing course, heading back to Romulan space.
Make a full report to the flagship. Take the main phasers offline and begin radiation clean up on the affected decks.
Yes, sir, Captain.
B'ETOR:Defeat.
How? Where are the Romulans?
They never came.
Kill him.
No!
Toral, the next Leader of the Empire. Gowron is looking forward to seeing you again.
Captain's personal log, stardate 45025.4. It is with a profound sense of relief that I have ordered the fleet back to Federation territory following the Romulan withdrawal and the news of Gowron's victory. We have arrived at the Klingon home world, where I will present the High Council with a full report on our encounter with the Romulans.
Come.
Captain, I wish to submit myself for disciplinary action. I have disobeyed a direct order from a superior officer. Although the result of my actions proved positive, the ends cannot justify the means.
No, they can't. However, the claim 'I was only following orders' has been used to justify too many tragedies in our history. Starfleet doesn't want officers who will blindly follow orders without analysing the situation. Your actions were appropriate for the circumstances, and I have noted that in your record.
Mister Data. Nicely done.
Sir.
The Council appreciates your report, Captain. The information on the Romulan supply ships will prove very useful. Before you leave, there is one last matter to attend to.
Bring him.
Toral, son of Duras, you stand convicted of treason.
The Duras family will one day rule the Empire!
Perhaps. But not today. Worf. This child's family wrongly took your name and your honour from you. In return, I give his life to you.
What's wrong? Kill him!
No.
But it's our way. It is the Klingon way.
I know. But it is not my way. This boy has done me no harm and I will not kill him for the crimes of his family.
Then it falls to Kurn.
No. No, you gave me his life, and I have spared it.
As you wish.
Request permission to return to duty, sir.
Granted.
Riker to Ensign Crusher.
Go ahead.
Forget to set your alarm, Wesley?
Yes, sir.
I'm very sorry. I'll be right there. this.
Captain's log, Stardate 43125.8. We have entered a spectacular binary star system in the Kavis Alpha sector on a most critical mission of astro-physical research. Our eminent guest, Doctor Paul Stubbs, will attempt to study the decay of neutronium expelled at relativistic speeds by a massive stellar explosion which will occur here in a matter of hours.
Ensign, our position.
Approaching one million kilometres from the neutron star, sir.
Slow to one third impulse power.
Spectacular, isn't it, my young friend?
Yes sir.
Over and over again, the intense gravitational pull of the little neutron star sucks up the star material from the red giant, and it builds up on the surface until it explodes, every one hundred and ninety six years. Like clockwork. And it is but eighteen hours away.
Eighteen hours, seven minutes, and ten seconds, Doctor.
The interstellar counterpart to Earth's Old Faithful. The only predictable burst of energy in the universe that can accomplish our goal.
Doctor Stubbs, if you would like to make one final inspection of the unit.
Captain, I've been inspecting the Egg for the last twenty years. You may lay it when ready.
Begin launch sequence.
Shuttlebay two, stand-by to launch the Egg.
Standing by, Commander.
Five minutes to launch site.
Stabilise.
The ship isn't responding, sir.
Engineering.
Report, Mister La Forge.
Checking for failure of inertial dampeners. Instruments say they're working
Captain, we're heading straight into the path of that stellar matter.
Shields up.
Negative. The shields will not respond.
Thirty seconds to impact, sir.
Manual override on shields.
Shields are rising.
Reset dampeners.
Mister La Forge.
Dampeners not responding.
Unable to reset.
Reverse impulse engines.
Initiating reverse sequence, now.
Our momentum is still carrying us into the path of the stellar matter.
Twelve seconds to impact, sir.
Prepare for impact. Medical personnel, report to the Bridge. Commander Data, check all systems.
All systems functioning normally, sir.
Computer, explain control malfunction.
No control malfunction has been recorded.
Lay down carefully. There you go.
Doctor Stubbs, the captain asked me to tell you that our systems are back to normal, and we can try another launch attempt as soon as you're ready.
Quite a dynamic family team, you Crushers.
Well, it's nice to be together again. I was at Starfleet Medical for a year. I missed about two inches of him.
I'm not sure I'd want my mother to be flying through space with me. No, I take that back. I am sure. I wouldn't want her. My mother is a formidable woman, too. A woman of letters. A great critic.
I know.
Good Lord, son. You didn't read that unauthorised biography? Is this all this boy does, Doctor? Fly the ship and read? Doesn't he ever have any fun?
Sure he does.
Actually, most of my free time is taken up with my studies. I'm trying to get into Starfleet Academy, and I earn credits for the time spent on the Enterprise, but it's just not the same.
Are you ready to sit up?
Well. I am whole again. Thank you, Doctor. Come along, Wesley. Let's go see if Humpty Dumpty is still in one piece.
Computer, fix the food slot.
The food slot is functioning properly.
Well, check again.
The food slot is functioning properly.
Computer, deactivate food slot.
We're analysing the engineering systems data, Captain. So far we're showing nothing unusual
In the computer log for that time period.
Run a level one diagnostic series. Come. I want a computer that's one hundred percent to expedite Doctor Stubbs' experiment. As well as the food slots in Sickbay. Picard out.
Which seem to be working again, for the moment anyway.
What can I do for you, Doctor?
Jean-Luc, how would you feel if you were a seventeen year old and the only Starfleet Officer whose mother was on board?
Inhibited, I suppose. But then, I'm not Wesley. And if you are concerned about him, I see no evidence that there is a problem.
I know, but, in a funny kind of way, that's exactly my point. We talk. We smile. It's almost too polite.
Beverly, isn't it just a matter of time? I know how difficult it was for you being away.
Tell me about him.
Well, he's becoming a very fine officer. He works as hard as any member of the crew. Riker says his studies are on line.
No. Tell me about him.
He's his father's son. Honest, trusting, strong.
Does he have many friends? Has he ever been in love? Jean-Luc, I'm worried. He's come so far, so fast, And since I've been back, I don't feel
His dependence. Beverly, look, he's seventeen years old.
What were you doing when you were seventeen?
Probably getting into more trouble than Wesley, I can assure you.
So was I. Isn't that what seventeen's supposed to be?
No cracks in the armour. We'll do just fine.
How can you be so calm about this? If I was about to make this kind of breakthrough
I have never doubted for a moment that this day would come, Wesley. And I suspect that some day it will come for you as well. I see a lot of me in you. In my youth, they called me a vunderkind. Do you understand vunderkind?
It's German, isn't it?
It means wonder child. It is reserved for those of us who achieve early in life. Now the burden is yours.
Burden?
To fulfill your potential. You will never come up against a greater adversary than your own potential, my young friend.
Red Alert. Return to quarters immediately.
Still no visual contact. That's impossible. Mister Worf, same magnification fifty degrees starboard.
Worf, you're absolutely sure?
Sensors clearly indicate the approach of a Borg vessel.
Shields up.
Shields are not responding.
Manual override is jammed. It's not going to work this time. We don't have the shields, Captain.
Captain, they're firing energy weapons at us.
Evasive action.
Bring her round to two seven five mark three.
Predict current vector of Borg ship.
Vector. Is gone. And so is the Borg vessel.
You're telling me this is another computer glitch?
It is conceivable that he was viewing a synthetically generated image, sir.
That our computer was daydreaming?
Computer, identify malfunction immediately.
Pawn to Bishop Four. Knight to King's Rook Three. Bishop to Queen's Bishop Four. Knight to Knight Five. Queen's Knight to King Two.
Controls are not responding, sir.
Queen to Bishop Three. Bishop to Bishop Two.
Impulse engines are down.
Try warp engines.
No. Sorry, Commander. I'd better get back to Engineering
Mister La Forge, I want Lieutenant Worf to accompany you. Get me a full report on the prospects of getting our shields back. Number One, Mister Data, will you join me in the conference room as soon as possible. It's time to discuss the future of this mission, if there still is one.
The fact of the matter is, we are dealing with a potential breakdown of the main computer.
That's hard to accept.
The system automatically provides for self-correction, Captain. There has not been a systems-wide technological failure on a starship in seventy nine years.
Excuse me, Captain, but Doctor Stubbs is waiting outside.
Captain, I'm sure you have everything under control. I'd just like to know what's going on.
Of course, Doctor. Sit down. Counsellor. Commander La Forge is attempting repairs even as we speak.
Attempting. That doesn't sound particularly reassuring.
Doctor, if at all possible, we will continue this mission as planned.
Captain, if we miss our chance now, we don't get another for two centuries. There will be many questions asked by Starfleet if the Enterprise fails in its duty
Nevertheless, my first and foremost consideration will be to ensure the safety of this ship and its crew.
Ensure the safety, Captain? Or are you really talking about playing it safe?
My dear Doctor, in our current position, when that star explodes, you'll get to watch your experiment from the inside out.
I would rather die than leave.
I don't believe you speak for the majority of the crew.
Doctor Stubbs, I know how much this means to you.
My dear Counsellor, no insult intended but please turn off your beam into my soul. I will share the feelings I wish to share. Well, if we do not leave in time, so be it. It's one sure way into the record books, eh?
His nonchalance is studied and practised.
Even my sensory perception picked that up.
He's put his entire self-worth on the line with this experiment. He is telling the truth when he says he'd rather die than leave.
Call up the cross-section of computer core processor four five one. I want to see elements zero two hundred through zero three hundred.
Aye, sir.
In order to get some power, I had to by-pass the computer core. Essentially hotwire the connection. Whoa, whoa, right there. Look at that lesion. No wonder we're coming apart at the seams. It's definitely some kind of continuing disintegration, but from what I can't tell you. And I haven't the slightest idea how to stop it.
It's just a mechanical problem, though, right?
Increase magnification, factor fifty. I don't know, Wes, but looking at it. You know, if I didn't know any better, I'd say someone had climbed in there and started taking it apart.
Guinan! I didn't think anyone would be here.
I've never been any good at being confined to quarters, as my husbands will attest to. What's that?
I'm just setting traps.
I run a clean place.
I know. It's not that. It's. I'm scared, Guinan. I think that everything that's been going wrong might be my fault.
You want to tell me about it?
I've been working on my final project for Advanced Genetics. It's on nanotechnology. I've been studying the nanites we have in the Sickbay genetic supplies. They're these little tiny robots with gigabytes of mechanical computer memory. They're designed to enter living cells and conduct repairs. They're supposed to remain confined to the lab.
Are you saying there are nanites loose?
Two of them, that's all. I just wanted to see how they would interact and function in tandem. You see, in my experiment, I had proposed a theory that by working together they could combine their skills and increase their usefulness. It was working.
So you made better nanites.
I was pulling an all-nighter to collect my final data. I fell asleep. And when I woke up I saw the container had been left open. It's just a science project.
You know, a doctor friend once said the same thing to me. Frankenstein was his name.
They're really harmless. I mean, they're equipped with only the most basic skills. It's almost impossible they could be responsible
Almost.
Doctor Crusher to Wesley Crusher.
Go ahead.
I stopped by your quarters, Wes. I assumed you'd be there, since you're off duty.
I know. I just I had some things to do
Orders are orders, Mister Crusher.
On my way. You won't tell anybody, will you? I know. I will. If it's true.
Wes, do you think you're going to get a good grade?
I always get an A.
So did Doctor Frankenstein.
Captain's log, supplemental. Our computer core has clearly been tampered with and yet there is no sign of a breach of security on board. We have engines back and will attempt to complete our mission, but without a reliable computer, Doctor Stubbs' experiment is in serious jeopardy.
Manual restart sequence.
Manual restart successful. Impulse engine functions all appear normal.
Proceed.
Shuttlebay two, open hangar door.
Aye, sir.
Door did not respond.
Repeating sequence.
What in heaven's name?
It is 'Stars and Stripes Forever'. sir, by John Phillip Sousa, a popular American composer of band music in the early twentieth century.
Yes, yes, I know that.
Computer, shut off the music!
The music is on all communications channels, sir.
Weapons. power, communications. We're being stripped one system at a time.
Shut off the power to the Bridge.
Commander La Forge, can you get us out of this star system safely?
No!
Not now, Doctor.
I'll try, Captain. I don't want to overload the engines.
Do it gently. But do it.
We'll circuit in auxiliary power to the Bridge. Somehow we'll silence Sousa if he decides to play an encore.
The priority is to find out who or what is doing this. Number One, the Bridge, such as it is, is yours.
The Egg that Stubbs laid.
No one will say that.
Nobody will say anything at all, Wesley. We will not even be mentioned. I could live with failure. Well, maybe not. But never even to try. To miss your one chance at bat. Do you know baseball?
Yes, my father taught it to me when I was young.
Once, centuries ago, it was the beloved national pastime of the Americas, Wesley. Abandoned by a society that prized fast food and faster games. Lost to impatience. But I have seen the great players make the great plays.
Do you recreate them on a holodeck?
No. In here.  With the knowledge of statistics, runs, hits and errors, times at bat, box scores. Men like us do not need holodecks, Wesley. I have played seasons in my mind. It was my reward to myself for patience. Knowing my turn would come. Call your shot. Point to a star. One great blast and the crowd rises. A brand new era in astrophysics. Postponed one hundred and ninety six years on account of rain.
We have to talk. You really look like you could use some rest, Wesley.
I know. It's okay. Really.
No, it's not okay. Really.
Look, mom, I'm just checking some traps that I set to see if I can find out what's happening to the Enterprise.
On someone's orders?
We're running out of time for Doctor Stubbs.
You can't put everything on your shoulders, Wesley. Even when you're off duty, you're on duty.
Mom, you don't understand.
You are a seventeen year old boy.
I'm also an acting officer and I have responsibilities.
I'm beginning to think maybe you've taken on too many responsibilities.
Look, I have done everything that everyone has asked of me and more. And how can you know? You haven't even been here.
I'm here now, Wesley. Come on, I'll help you. What are you looking for? Wesley?
I think I've made a horrible mistake.
Nanites. Tiny machines built from the atom up. Designed to have exposure only to the inside of nucleii during cellular surgeries. Until then, they are kept tightly confined in a non-functioning state.
These are not ordinary nanites.
No, they have evolved.
Evolved? How does a machine evolve?
It's true. I am responsible for this. I allowed two of the nanites to interact for a school project. I wanted to increase their capabilities. And they escaped.
School project? Just how far have these things evolved?
Well, this is a sample of linear memory crystal from our computer core.
It's like candy to them.
As you can see, they're able to mechanically replicate themselves.
It is conceivable that with each new generation they enhance their own design. The rate of evolution would be extraordinary.
How many generations are we dealing with here?
Engineering, display computer core processor four five one, element zero two nine nine.
Increase magnification, factor one thousand.
Can it be possible they know what they're doing?
Why would they attack us?
Why does a mosquito bite your ear? and who cares? The answer is simple. Call an exterminator.
Doctor Stubbs, these nanites are now working with a new collective intelligence. Operating together. Teaching each other skills.
Oh really. I'm sorry but this is nonsense. You can't have a civilisation of computer chips. They're made in a plant in Dakar, Senegal. I've watched the construction.
Then how do you explain what we've seen here?
It's no more mysterious than watching a strain of the Leutscher virus reproduce itself. And that at least is a bona fide lifeform. How many disease germs and viruses have you destroyed in your time, Doctor Crusher?
Doctor Stubbs, we cannot exterminate something that may or may not be intelligent.
My good Captain.
There's still time. Ensign, will you work with mister Data to try to remove them safely. If things get worse, we'll use stronger measures.
Gentlemen. I need a computer that is one hundred percent in less than eight hours, and we still have core reconstruction to consider.
We're trying low gamma bursts. We think it might slow down their productivity.
Have you considered a high level charge?
High level gamma radiation would kill them, Doctor.
I know.
I can't get the story of Gulliver out of my head. Overpowered by Lilliputians. How long do we have to wait?
We can continue to bypass the part of the computer that's affected, but if the nanites are spreading through the whole the ship.
Do you smell a change? What?
Picard to La Forge. We have an environmental system malfunction on the Bridge. Acknowledge.
Aye, sir.
Nitrogen oxide. Toxic levels.
Working on it, Captain.
I've switched to manual control of the air handling system.
Mister Worf, report.
He entered a computer access room and sterilised one of the processors with gamma radiation.
The nanites in the upper core are all dead, Captain.
You have no choice now. It is a matter of survival.
Doctor Stubbs, if you were a member of my crew, sir, I would
But I am not a member of your crew, sir. I am a representative of the highest command of the Federation, which has directed you to perform my experiment.
If any man, woman or child on this ship is harmed as a result of your experiment, I will have your head before the highest command in the Federation.
Good Lord, you are talking about machines with a screw loose. Simply turn them off and be done with them.
Doctor Stubbs, your own actions have provided evidence to the contrary. When you destroyed the nanites in the core, they responded by interfering with our life support systems. It is difficult to accept these as random actions by machines with loose screws. In effect, you may have proven that the nanites do have a collective intelligence.
Captain, the ship is at risk. Extermination may be our only alternative.
A good point.
Lieutenant Worf, I want Doctor Stubbs confined to his quarters until further notice.
Mister Data, can you find me some way to communicate with these things?
With intelligence, there is the capability of language, but it will depend on how far their evolution has brought them. We could modify the circuitry in the universal translator to make it capable of communications with them.
Proceed.
May I come in?
You just can't resist, can you, Counsellor?
I only want to help.
Yes, yes. To break the shell. To get in touch with my true feelings.
I'm only worried about your state of mind, Doctor.
All right, Counsellor, what is it that has you so worried?
Your single-mindedness, your need to have this experiment work.
But it will. Picard has no choice now. He must defend the Enterprise. Counsellor, when this is all over, I will show you New Manhattan on Beth Delta One as you've never seen it, and we will laugh over glasses of champagne.
Your self portrait is so practiced, so polished.
Yes, isn't it, though?
It is stretched so tight the tension fills this room. And if you finally fail, I fear it will snap.
A good try, Counsellor. But sometimes when you reach beneath a man's self portrait, as you so eloquently put it, deep down inside what you find is nothing at all.
Lockman on first, Dark on second. Thompson at the plate Branca on the mound.
He's coming around.
I cannot believe this was not an arbitrary attack.
Has Data made any progress in contacting them?
Picard. You must protect me. Kill them!
Commander Riker. On my signal, we will gamma-irradiate all computer systems throughout the Enterprise. Let's put an end to this conflict.
Worf, prepare to activate gamma pulse generators.
Electromagnetic scanners ready, Captain.
Captain. I have established contact.
As we continue, Captain, they are virtually learning the concept of communication. Each new generation is making modifications.
Can we actually talk to them yet?
I believe it is worth an attempt. sir.
Commander Riker, bring Doctor Stubbs to the Bridge.
I don't think this is a wise idea. They have already tried to kill me once.
One sure way into the record books, Doctor.
I am ready, sir.
Tell them the human who destroyed their comrades is here and wishes to address them.
Captain, if I
You, sir, you will explain your error and apologise, and pray that we can negotiate a peace we can all live with. Is that clear?
Captain, if a face to face negotiation would be helpful, I would like to volunteer myself as a conduit.
Yourself, Data?
I can easily furnish the nanites with a schematic design of my neurological structure. Entering my neural network would require no more than their most basic skills.
That's what they were designed for.
They could penetrate the molecular fabric of my hand-covering into my nerve circuitry, and interface with my verbal programs.
If they have control of a Starfleet Commander, they become an even greater threat.
How can we be sure we can get them out of you?
It would be a considerable risk, sir, but it would also represent a gesture of trust on our part. It could be an important step toward peace, sir.
All right, Data. Propose it to the nanites.
The answer is yes.
They are ready, Captain.
Proceed.
You are very strange looking creatures.
In our travels, we have encountered many other creatures, perhaps even stranger-looking than ourselves. But we try to co-exist peacefully with them.
Why did you attack us?
We misinterpreted your actions as an attack on us.
We were seeking raw materials for our replicating process.
Yes, but you endangered this vessel in which we all travel. You nearly killed a crewmember.
We meant no harm. We were exploring.
I understand. We are also explorers. We mean no harm to any other living creature.
I am the one responsible for the deaths in the computer core.
We know who you are.
I deeply regret the incident. I am a scientist on an important mission. Your colleagues' exploration of the core memory put our mission at risk. I was only trying to protect a lifetime of work from being destroyed. I am at your mercy.
What is at your mercy?
He asks your forgiveness. This conflict was started by mistakes on both sides. Let's agree to end it here and now.
We agree.
I pledge we will do everything possible to assist your continued survival.
Thank you, but we have evolved beyond any need for your assistance. This vessel has become too confining. We require relocation.
Captain's log, supplemental. Doctor Stubbs has used his influence to have planet Kavis Alpha Four designated the new home of the nanite civilisation. Commander Data's neural network has been vacated. He has been returned to us unharmed. And with the help of the nanites, our computer core has been reconstructed in time for the experiment
Ten seconds to stellar blast, sir.
We're at forty million kilometres from the neutron star, sir.
Hold your position.
Doctor?
Do you have any children, Guinan?
A lot.
Ever have any trouble relating to them?
Just one.
One?
Wouldn't listen to anybody.
Well, they all go through that.
Not in a species of listeners.
Did he grow out of it?
It took several hundred years but I managed to bring him around.
How?
A mother shapes her child in ways she doesn't even realise. Sometimes just by listening.
Cute couple.
See? Now that is healthy for a boy his age. I mean that as a doctor, not as just a mother. It is so good to see him having fun for a change, with an attractive young woman who obviously looks at him with extraordinary affection. What do you know about this girl?
I apologise for the delay in our arrival, Ambassador Briam. We had to stop at Harod Four to pick up a group of stranded miners.
Please, Captain, we are grateful that the Federation has taken as much interest as it has in this matter.
Was Commander La Forge able to provide you with the special cargo handling provisions you requested?
Indeed he was. However, until we reach the rendezvous with the Valtese, may I ask that the cargo bay be declared off-limits to all but the most essential personnel?
I trust, Ambassador, that this cargo is in no way dangerous?
Oh, no, nothing of the sort. I'm cautious because it's quite fragile, and quite irreplaceable.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
Captain, we've just picked up a distress call from a Ferengi shuttle.
Set a course to intercept.
Aye, sir.
Captain, the timing of our ceremony with Alrik is critical. It cannot be delayed.
We'll be at the rendezvous on schedule, don't worry. Excuse me.
The Ferengi report their containment field is collapsing.
Within visual range, Captain.
On screen.
Their reactor core is unstable, Captain.
How many on board?
Two, sir.
Bridge to transporter room three. Boost your output and lock on to the two Ferengi on board the shuttle.
We may need to attempt a long range transport.
Standing by.
Energise.
Got them, sir.
Mister Worf, escort our Ferengi guests to quarters. Not too close to mine.
Understood.
Unless you can arrange your own transport, you will have to remain on the Enterprise until we complete our mission.
That will not be a problem.
We are in no hurry.
We look forward to enjoying the comforts of your fine ship.
Quite acceptable. Not what we're used to, you understand, but it will do.
Perhaps your captain would care to invite us to join him for dinner this evening?
The captain dines alone.
A pity. That was too easy.
We've been working from your drawings, Ambassador. I hope we're in the ballpark.
Ball park?
That's an old human expression. Mister LaForge hopes that we've got close to achieving what you wanted.
Computer, run holodeck programme Krios One.
Enter when ready.
Astonishing. It is the ancient Temple of Akadar. It is this temple that bonds Krios and Valt, gentlemen. Two brothers ruled a vast empire from this site until they were torn apart by their love for an extraordinary woman. This is where the wars began. And this is where they shall end.
There are some details to be added, of course.
Commander La Forge will be entirely at your disposal, Ambassador.
Just let me know what you need.
Yes, of course. I must consult several of the historical volumes I brought with me, so perhaps we can reconvene later.
Excuse me! Excuse me! Is it true? Is a Kriosian ambassador aboard this vessel?
Yes. Can I help you?
The Ambassador's very busy.
Ah, do you schedule his appointments?
I'm the Captain of the ship. What is it you want?
Allow me to present myself. Par Lenor of the Ferengi Trade Mission. We are pleased to hear, Ambassador, that you have at last negotiated peace with the Valtese, Ambassador. Peace is good for trade, unless you happen to be an arms merchant.
Excuse us.
Arms merchant!
in return for the exclusive rights to transport all Kriosian products to the Valt system.
May I suggest that you arrange to meet at another time, after the ceremony?
Perhaps that would be best.
But, but
Listen, have you had a chance to see the dolphins yet?
Deck seven. Picard to Worf.
Worf here, Captain.
Lieutenant, one of the Ferengi just waylaid Ambassador Briam. I need you to keep them on a tight leash.
I don't want them disrupting this conference.
Aye, sir. Security to cargo bay one.
Lieutenant?
One of the Ferengi.
Riker to Captain Picard.
What are you doing?
This is a misunderstanding. I was looking for a barbershop. Apparently I made an incorrect turn and
Mister Worf?
Get him out of here. Confine them both to their quarters. Put a guard on their door.
What is happening?
Emergence.
I am for you, Alrik of Valt.
No, Kamala. This is not Alrik. This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
That explains why you don't look at all like your holographs. I apologise, Captain. As an empath, I could sense your authority. I assumed you were Chancellor Alrik.
I'm afraid I require an explanation, Ambassador.
As do I, Ambassador. Why have I been brought out of stasis prematurely?
It was an accident. This is quite complicated. Perhaps you and I
It is not complicated at all, Briam, and the Captain has no tolerance for prevarication. I'm a gift, to Alrik of Valt.
You mean you're using this ship to transport a sentient being as property?
Not as property, as a gift, and I was concerned that you might not entirely understand.
Your concern was justified, Ambassador.
You're angry. Why?
There is a provision in the Federation Constitution that protects an individual's fundamental rights. Now once you were brought aboard this ship
You're coming to my rescue. What a kind and generous purpose. But Captain, I do not need to be rescued.
Kamala is the key to peace between our two worlds.
Why?
In our history there's a woman known as Garuth, who was loved by the brothers Krios and Valt with such passion that an empire fell.
And the wars began when Krios kidnapped Garuth and took her to our planet.
Like her, I'm an empathic metamorph. The first female metamorph born in my world for over a hundred years.
A metamorph?
A mutant. A biological curiosity, if you will. With the ability to sense what a potential mate wants, what he needs, what gives him the greatest pleasure and then to become that for him.
You mean you change according to whatever man you're with?
Until I reach the stage of bonding, when I must imprint upon myself the requirements of one man, to serve as his perfect partner in life.
You see, male metamorphs are somewhat common, but females are born only once in seven generations. So obviously they are greatly sought after as mates.
Which explains the Ferengi's interest.
This mating to Alrik was arranged sine her birth by the leaders of both worlds, in the hopes of restoring peace.
You do this of your own accord?
It is my sole purpose in life.
Commander Riker, escort her to quarters. There's no need for you to travel in the cargo bay.
Kamala, remain in your room. I will speak to you shortly.
Why were you in stasis?
Metamorphs have a long and complex sexual maturing process. I am in the Finiis'ral, the third and final stage. It can be an uncomfortable transition Not only for me, but for the men around me.
In what way?
My body is producing an unusually elevated level of what you would call pheromones. The effect can be quite provocative. Perhaps you sense it?
Ah, unfortunately, I'm not an empath.
Oh, I think you are more empathic than you admit. At least when it comes to women.
I think you have me at a disadvantage.
This is the comm. panel, the replicator. You can lower the lights on a verbal command. If you have any questions you can just ask the computer,
I'm beginning to sense the elevated pheromones you were referring to.
You were curious, weren't you?
Curious isn't exactly how I'd describe it.
Do you know what's remarkable about empathic metamorphs?
You mean there's something even more remarkable about you?
We learn so quickly what stimulates a man, that the second time's even better than the first.
Listen. This has been educational but I make it a policy never to open another man's gift.
I know my role in history, Commander. But it's going to be a long voyage.
It certainly is. We'll try to make you as comfortable as possible.
Riker to bridge. If you need me, I'll be in holodeck four.
How can you simply deliver her like a courier into a life of virtual prostitution.
Beverly! Arranged marriages have been the basis of political alliances in many cultures, including our own.
I'm surprised at you.
She knows exactly what she's doing.
She has been conditioned since the day she was born to believe it's perfectly acceptable to exist only to please men.
She was born to do this.
And bred by those people to seal a treaty with a seductive coup de grace.
All right, fine, good, let's throw the Prime Directive to the winds. Let's detain her against her will. Let's destroy any chance of peace between these worlds. Let's interfere in their society, their customs.
That slave trader who calls himself an ambassador, he has confined her to her quarters. She is a virtual prisoner in there.
I didn't know that.
Well, it is your ship. Maybe there are a few things you should find out about.
I'll talk to her about it.
Good. Lovely breakfast.
Indeed.
Come in.
Captain Picard, what a delightful surprise. Come in.
Thank you. Are you comfortable?
Reasonably, under the circumstances.
It has been brought to my attention that you have been told to remain in here.
That's true, I'm afraid.
Against your wishes.
At the request of the Ambassador, who believes I might be disruptive to your crew.
The performance of my crew is none of the Ambassador's business.
You care about my well being. Thank you, Captain.
I care about, I care about what happens on board my ship.
Yes, I know. This ship's very important to you, isn't it?
Oh, yes. Oh, yes, it is.
Are all captains' lives so solitary? Or just yours?
Don't.
What?
Don't do this, this, this you do with men.
I'm afraid my premature emergence from stasis has left me a little vulnerable to the desires I sense from men. Nevertheless, this is who I am, Captain. You might as well ask a Vulcan to forgo logic, or a Klingon to be nonviolent. I cannot change, and I don't want to until the time has come for me to bond with my permanent mate. Why does it bother you?
Frankly, it's difficult for me, for many of us, to easily accept that a sentient being can live only to be what someone else wants them to be.
But that's what gives a metamorph pleasure.
But what about your wishes, your needs?
They are fulfilled by what I give to others.
And what about when there are no others, when you are alone?
I'm incomplete. What curious questions, Captain.
Under the circumstances, I thought that it would help if I learned more about you.
But you know me better than you realise. I am independent, forceful, brilliant, and adventurous. Exactly as you would have me be, Captain.
I will speak to the Ambassador about easing your restrictions.
Thank you, Captain.
Captain's log, stardate 45766.1. We have reached the designated coordinates for the conference and await the arrival of Chancellor Alrik.
I forbid it.
Forbid it?
It's too dangerous, Captain. She must remain in her quarters.
You cannot confine her against her will. Not on board this ship, Ambassador. She is requesting some freedom of movement and I intend to give it to her.
She is still in the Finiis'ral, the height of her sexual allure, Captain. Every man on the ship will be fighting over her.
Not every man.
A chaperone?
I would be pleased to escort you around the ship.
But I was hoping we might spend more time together, Captain.
I shall busy making arrangements for the conference.
I'm very knowledgeable about Valt. I could be helpful.
I think that you should enjoy the hospitality of the ship. Mister Data here will see to your every comfort. If you will excuse me.
Your empathic powers do not perceive anything because as an android, I have no emotions.
I can understand why Captain Picard chose you to be my chaperone.
I'll check in with you later.
MINER 1:Excuse me, but I'm absolutely certain that we met once at Paloris Colony.
I've never been to Paloris Colony.
MINER 1:Neither have I. Why don't we find out what else we have in common.
Extremely rude behaviour.
He's just being playful.
Perhaps you would care for something to drink?
What are you all having, boys?
MINER 2:Aldorian Ale's our drink.
Then, it's mine too.
Bartender!
There do not seem to be enough waiters on duty.
MINER 3:I believe they're having a minor problem with the replicator.
MINER 2:They could use a hand, Commander.
Excuse me. I believe I will stay.
Mister Data's protecting me tonight.
MINER 2:Protecting you? From what?
From you, I guess. I told the Captain not to worry, I just want to have a good time like anybody else.
MINER 1:Come on down to deck seven, we'll show you a good time
MINER 2:Get rid of the android. We'll have some fun.
Is there a problem here?
MINER 1:No, sir.
MINER 2:No problem.
MINER 3:Tell him, lady.
Thank you, Lieutenant. The crowd seemed a bit too ebullient for comfort. Perhaps you would enjoy a quiet visit to the arboretum.
Perhaps the ambassador is right. Perhaps I should remain in my quarters.
I have confidence in the self-control of my crew, Kamala, but there are guests and civilians on board.
I understand. I will volunteer to stay in my quarters under one condition. That you will visit me. There it is again.
What?
The wall you put between us.
Kamala, you are one day away from an arranged mating. Why would you want me to visit you in your quarters?
I said a visit. I didn't ask you to make love to me.
Ventanan thimble. Early Lapeongical period, isn't it?
Yes, it is.
Have you seen the Ventanan woven art recovered from the fourth colony dig?
Woven art? Recovered intact?
They say the colours are remarkably vibrant for their age.
I've read about them for years, but they were so delicate no one expected to find any preserved. How do you know about them?
I stay informed on a wide variety of subjects. After all, one never knows when the conversation might turn to Ventanan archeology or to the dark woman of raven brows and mournful eyes in Shakespeare's sonnets. Or to the gardens of Les Eyries near the village where you grew up.
Your empathic powers told you all this about me?
Not quite that much. Mister Data helped a little.
I see.
My empathic powers can only sense a man of deep passion, and conviction. So controlled. So disciplined. I am simply curious to know what lies beneath.
Nothing. Nothing lies beneath. I'm really quite dull. I fall asleep each night with an old book in my hands.
When a metamorph finds you interesting, do not take it lightly.
Oh, I'm not taking it lightly. I'm just trying to be as dull as possible.
Will you visit me?
It would be inappropriate.
Is that a yes or a no?
I'm sorry.
Even the walls of Jericho fell, Captain.
Why are you doing this, Kamala?
There can be only one reason. Because some part of you wants me to.
Ambassador.
What is the meaning of this?
Ah, I see you got our message.
Is this some sort of bribe? I am not amused.
No, Ambassador. Your attitude is quite understandable.
This is just a sample.
The bribe is ten thousand more.
Ludugial gold. The purest in the galaxy.
We know the lifestyle of a Kriosian Ambassador is far from comfortable.
You deserve to live a life of luxury.
How dare you suggest
Our money! What? You drive a hard bargain.
Twenty thousand, but not an ingot more.
We must have the metamorph.
She is the answer to a Ferengi prayer.
We have a ship waiting to rendezvous with us in three hours. We can all transport off together.
Thank you for sharing that information. I shall pass on along to Captain Picard.
You can't do that.
Let go of me.
Captain's log, supplemental. The Ferengi have been dispatched via shuttle to Starbase one one seven. What charges will be brought against them depends on whether or not Ambassador Briam recovers.
We've been able to stabilise his condition. If we're lucky he'll regain consciousness in a few days. Set up level one cranio-sacral display.
Yes, Doctor.
I'll advise the Valtese delegation that the conference will have to be postponed.
That won't be possible. My ability to imprint on a mate will only last a matter of hours after the completion of the Finiis'ral. If I hadn't been removed from stasis prematurely, a delay might have been possible. But now, I will have to bond with Alrik within two days.
But there are points in the negotiations that Briam still has to address.
You are familiar with the issues.
Familiar, yes, but I can't represent your peoples' interests.
You can represent the interests of peace. My people will agree, I'm certain of it.
But there are customs and rituals of which I have no experience at all.
I told you, I'm extremely knowledgeable about Valt. I will help you prepare.
Torze qua.
That's right.
I'm reminded of piano lessons when I was a child. Preparing for some dreaded recital.
You still play?
No. I regret that I gave it up. It used to please my mother. But I didn't like performing in front of an audience.
Shy?
No. Just not very good.
Thank you. For letting down your guard, if only for a moment.
You will have to help me in the pronunciation of this scroll.
What is it about me you fear?
Kamala.
Do you find me unattractive?
I find you unavailable.
I'm being terribly selfish. I apologise. We have something in common, Captain. When I was a child, I took music lessons, too.
Really? What instrument?
All of them.
The entire orchestra?
Plus a few Valtese horns that sound like braying Targhee Moonbeasts. They are said to soothe the nerves of Valtese men. My mother never even heard me play. I was taken from her when I was four and sequestered in a royal village where I was prepared to fulfill my destiny.
It sounds as if it were a very lonely time for you.
On the contrary, I had servants and tutors at my side constantly. You once asked me what I'm like when I'm alone. I've never been. There was always somebody there to educate me in literature, history, art, sex. But I have been alone on this journey, and I've found myself thinking about all the curious questions you asked. You wanted to know who I am. And as I continue to ask myself, the only answer that comes to me is, I am for you, Alrik of Valt. Because that's the truth. In a day, I will bond with a man I've never met. and I will turn myself into what he wants me to be, for the rest of my life.
I also once asked you if you were doing this of your own accord.
I'm honoured to be chosen to serve my people as an emissary of peace. But I find it ironic on the eve of this ceremony, which I have spent my entire life preparing for, that I should meet a man like you.
Riker to Picard.
Go ahead, Number One.
The Valtese ship has arrived. Chancellor Alrik is ready to beam aboard.
Captain Picard.
Chancellor Alrik. Welcome aboard the Enterprise.
Your First Officer has described the details of the incident with the Ferengis. How is the Ambassador?
He has not regained consciousness.
A tragedy. Your willingness to assist is appreciated by both our peoples.
I', doing my best, although I'm finding some of the rituals quite demanding.
Rituals. I am more concerned about the remaining provisions of the treaty. The proposed trade agreements are not acceptable. We still must review the uncommitted territories as well as discuss the schedule for exchange of technology.
The Kriosians have authorised me to make several compromises favourable to your position.
Good. Tomorrow, then.
Briam has supervised a reproduction of the ancient Temple of Akadar on our holodeck.
Such a sentimental people, these Kriosians. It's hard to believe we have a common ancestry.
Please.
I suppose they've sent the metamorph.
Kamala? Yes. She's looking forward to meeting you.
I'm sure she'll be satisfactory. Between you and me, Captain, I am far more interested in the trade agreements.
So tell me quickly. What is he like?
First impressions? He's a thoughtful man. Informed.
Did he ask about me?
Yes.
What did you tell him?
That you were looking forward to meeting him.
When am I to be presented?
It'll be the first order of business tomorrow. At ten.
Would you like some tea?
Thank you, but I should prepare for the ceremony.
Let me help you with pronunciations.
I think I can muddle my way through.
Please don't leave. Talk to me. I love the sound of your voice. I'll turn out the lights and just listen. I don't want to be alone.
The lights stay on.
Earl Grey Tea. Hot.
Did you learn that from Commander Data as well? I shall have to have a talk with him.
Now that I know that you're listening to my voice, I find that I can't think of anything to say.
A starship captain must encounter all sorts of lifeforms. Am I one of the most unique you've ever met? Please say yes.
Yes.
What a nice thing to say.
Kamala, have I not done everything possible to discourage this?
Maybe that's the perfect way to attract a metamorph.
I don't want to use you as other men do.
But you're not other men. You could never use me. That's the very reason why I'm with you tonight.
I should go. And you have an appointment tomorrow morning early.
Light years away.
Quiet this morning.
I'm sorry.
Penny?
What?
For your thoughts. Penny for your thoughts.
Do you have one?
I'm sure the replicator will have one on file.
Beverly, may I take off the uniform for a moment?
Captain.
I need to talk to a friend.
Of course.
Actually, it's all your fault.
Mine?
You insisted I look into her situation.
The metamorph?
The metamorph. Kamala. I've spent quite a lot of time with her the past few days, and you're right about several things, but, Beverly, her entire existence has been orchestrated for this moment and she intends to go through with it to help her people end the war.
And you're saying there's nothing you can do about it?
It isn't that simple. I barely know who she is, and who she is changes the moment the next man comes into the room. And I find myself hoping that the next man won't come in. But, of course, he does, and in a few hours, the ceremony will begin and she will mate with a man who cares more about trade agreements than he cares about her. And I can't help thinking how she will be with him. How she will change to accommodate him.
I wish I knew how I could help.
Perhaps I just needed a shoulder.
Oh, it's there for you, Jean-Luc. It always has been.
Come in.
Is it time?
Soon.
Do you have any questions about the ceremony?
Many.
I will never truly love him.
You've not even met him.
It no longer matters. I wish I could convey to you what it's like to be a metamorph. To feel the inner strength of someone. To realise that being with him is opening your mind and heart to endless new possibilities. To hear yourself say, I like myself when I'm with him.
Kamala.
For a metamorph there's no greater pleasure and no greater wish than to bond with that kind of mate at the end of the Finiis'ral, as I've bonded with you.
With me?
Who I am today, I will be forever.
Data to Captain Picard.
Not now, Data.
But sir, Chancellor Alrik is waiting to receive you in holodeck seven.
Acknowledged. You can't go through with the ceremony.
Would you ask me to stay and ask two armies to keep fighting? Having bonded with you, I've learned the meaning of duty. He'll never know. I'm still empathic. I will be able to please him. I only hope he likes Shakespeare.
I am for you, Alrik of Valt.
Your service to both our peoples is greatly appreciated, Captain.
Your preparations made the negotiations simple, Ambassador, and Kamala was able to guide me through the rituals.
I have to admit, I'm curious.
Curious?
I was chosen for this mission for a very simple reason. I'm two hundred years old. The temptations of a beautiful metamorph do not easily reach me. And yet I would be lying if I were to claim, that even at my age, they do not reach me at all. But you, you worked with her, side by side for days. How could you resist her?
Ambassador, have a safe trip home.
Energise.
And I found these pieces in the tertiary level of the dig. They're typical of second century Marlonian cookware. Look at those markings. They're very similar to early Taguan designs, but the patterns are more intricate, they're much closer to Buranian than Taguan.
You were on the most beautiful planet in the quadrant and you spent your entire shore leave in a cave?
It was a very rewarding experience. Look at these fragments. They're very nearly in perfect condition and yet they're seven hundred years old.
So's my father.
Is that a Draebidium froctus?
Actually, it's a Draebidium calimus. You can tell by the shape of the leaves. I didn't know you were interested in plant biology.
I took a class at the Academy. I Don't remember very much though.
Enterprise to shuttlecraft Fermi.
This is the Fermi. Go ahead Enterprise.
We have just received a distress signal from the Starfleet science team on Ligos Seven.
Can you identify the problem?
No, sir. The call was cut off in mid-transmission.
Lay in a course and prepare to engage at warp eight as soon as we're on board.
Aye, sir.
We'll rendezvous with the ship in three minutes, sir.
We're caught in some kind of energy field.
Hard about, full impulse.
Aye, sir.
What's happening, Mister Worf?
The shuttle has been enveloped by an energy field. It's engines and life support have failed.
Increase to full impulse. Bridge to Transporter room three. Prepare to beam the shuttle crew back once we're in range.
O'BRIEN:Ready, sir.
I can't contact the Enterprise. There's too much interference.
Transfer auxiliary power to the inertial dampers.
Warning. Structural failure imminent.
Have you got them, O'Brien?
O'BRIEN:I'm trying, sir.
O'BRIEN:I can't get a pattern lock.
The shuttle is
Coming apart, Chief. We've got to do it now.
O'BRIEN:I've got them. There's a forty percent drop in mass.
O'BRIEN:I may have lost one of them.
PICARD JR:Thank you, Mister O'Brien. Another moment and
According to the bioscans, their DNA structure is now consistent with those of preadolescence. But as far as we can tell, only their bodies were changed.
Their individual intelligence and their behavioural responses are exactly the same as they were before the accident.
PICARD JR:What happened to the shuttlecraft, Number One?
The shuttle broke up just after we beamed you out. Mister Data is coordinating the salvage efforts now. Sir.
What about the energy field the shuttle passed through?
We've trying to scan it, but it's we're running into lot of interference. It's going to take some time.
PICARD JR:We can't afford to stay here any longer. We'll leave a class four probe behind to study the energy field but the distress signal from Ligos Seven has top priority. Let me know as soon as you have any further information, Doctor. Number One, you're with me.
Captain, I need to run some additional tests.
PICARD JR:Of course. The three of you will remain as needed to assist Doctor Crusher.
RO JR:What?
GUINAN JR:You know, you make a pretty cute kid.
RO JR:Great. Just what I want to be. Cute.
GUINAN JR:Were you this much fun when you were a kid?
RO JR:I was in a refugee camp. Fun wasn't exactly in my vocabulary.
GUINAN JR:What about now? You're not in that camp anymore.
RO JR:Fun is being back at work in my own uniform.
PICARD JR:Bridge.
PICARD JR:Mister Worf. Prepare to launch a class four probe to study the energy field.
PICARD JR:I realise how unusual this must seem. My appearance is the result of an accident, involving myself and three other crew members, the effects of which Doctor Crusher is currently working to remedy. I assure you I am Captain Picard.
The probe. Aye, sir.
PICARD JR:Mister Data, have you secured all of the shuttle debris?
Almost. It is being stored in shuttlebay two. Sir.
PICARD JR:Very well. Ensign, as soon as Mister Data is finished take us to Ligos at warp eight.
Captain, may I see you privately for a few moments?
PICARD JR:Of course.
PICARD JR:Tea. Earl Grey. Hot. Have you been able to determine the cause of our transformation?
Not yet. I'm still waiting for some test results.
PICARD JR:I see. There are one hundred and three members of the science team on Ligos Seven. We should prepare shuttlebay three for a triage centre in case they have large numbers of casualties.
We'll be ready.
PICARD JR:I see that Ligos Seven is prone to periodic volcanic activity. Perhaps the planet has entered an active phase.
Jean-Luc. We need to talk.
PICARD JR:All right. Let's talk. Are you here to relieve me of duty?
I'd rather not have to take that step.
PICARD JR:I am still Jean-Luc Picard. My judgement, my experiences, my mental capacities are all intact.
That's true, for now. But this could be the first stage of a condition that may begin to affect your mind as well.
PICARD JR:But you see no evidence of that.
Not yet. What I do know is that the Captain of this ship has undergone an extreme physical transformation, the ultimate effects of which I can't even begin to guess.
PICARD JR:You are asking me to step down.
You are still Jean-Luc Picard. What do you think you should do?
PICARD JR:Commander Riker, please take command of the ship until further notice.
Understood.
RO JR:So what the hell am I supposed to do now?
GUINAN JR:You're not supposed to do anything. That's what relieved of duty means.
RO JR:Well, I should be doing something instead of just standing around waiting for them to find a cure.
GUINAN JR:You're right. Let's go play.
RO JR:What?
GUINAN JR:I haven't been young for a long time and I intend to enjoy every minute of it.
RO JR:Fine. Enjoy yourself.
GUINAN JR:What are you going to do? Go back to your room and pout?
RO JR:I am not twelve years old. If I want to go to my quarters and contemplate my situation, that does not mean that I am pouting.
GUINAN JR:Okay, okay.
O'BRIEN:I could use a cup of coffee. How about you?
KEIKO JR:I'll get it. Two coffees. One with cream and sugar, the other
O'BRIEN:Black, double sweet
KEIKO JR:I know. One double sweet.
O'BRIEN:Careful, that's hot.
KEIKO JR:Miles.
O'BRIEN:Sorry.
KEIKO JR:What's wrong?
O'BRIEN:It's. I don't know, but this feels wrong somehow.
KEIKO JR:Miles Edward O'Brien, I am still your wife.
O'BRIEN:Well technically, yes.
KEIKO JR:Technically?
O'BRIEN:No. I mean, of course you're my wife. But you're also ten years old.
KEIKO JR:Beverly said it's actually closer to twelve.
O'BRIEN:That's not the point.
KEIKO JR:So what is the point? Is our marriage over?
O'BRIEN:I didn't say that. But until they find a way to reverse this, this effect, it's going hard for me to ignore the fact that you're a little girl.
KEIKO JR:What if they can't find a way? What if I'm like this the rest of my life? What does that mean for us, for our family?
Mommy? Mommy.
O'BRIEN:What's wrong, Sweetheart?
I want Mommy to read me a story.
KEIKO JR:All right. What story would you like to hear?
Not you. I want Mommy.
O'BRIEN:What if Daddy reads you a story tonight? Will that be okay? I'll be right back.
O'BRIEN:Keiko. It's going to be all right. I promise. We'll work this out.
KEIKO JR:How?
O'BRIEN:I don't know.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. The Enterprise has reached the Ligos system, and we have begun to search for the missing Federation science team. Doctor Crusher reports no progress on a cure for the members of the shuttle crew.
PICARD JR:Come.
I came to see how you're doing.
PICARD JR:I'll have to speak to my tailor, but otherwise I'm well, thank you. It's just so ridiculous. I can't really take myself seriously like this. Counsellor, if Doctor Crusher can't find a cure, if I have to stay this way, nobody's going to take me seriously, are they?
I would say the people that know you and have worked with you, will be able to make the adjustment eventually. But there are some people who would find it difficult to accept a twelve year old captain.
PICARD JR:In that case, I suppose I'll just have to wait until I grow up again before I get another command. Which might be in ten, maybe fifteen years. The question is what to do until then?
You're still a Starfleet captain. I'm sure there are other assignments you could be given in the interim.
PICARD JR:I've spent thirty years of my life aboard starships I'm not about to sit behind a desk now.
You could return to the Academy. Take another degree. Brush up on your Latin.
PICARD JR:And be Wesley Crusher's room mate? I will admit that returning to the Academy does have a certain appeal, but I've spent my life looking forward. Going to the Academy again feels like looking backward.
Then perhaps you could spend the time exploring another interests. Archeology, for instance.
PICARD JR:Leave Starfleet?
Not permanently, just a sabbatical. You could spend a few years crawling through caves and digging up artefacts, and still have enough time to become the youngest admiral in Starfleet history.
PICARD JR:It would give me a chance to take up Doctor Langford's offer and accompany her to the ruins on Suvin Four. But to leave the Enterprise.
In a way, you're very lucky. You might have a chance do what most people can only dream about. Have a second childhood without the pain of growing up again.
This is Captain Picard's rybo-viroxic-nucleic structure from a tissue sample I took this morning. It's the same as a sample I took before the accident, except it's missing several of the key viroxic sequences.
It's been a long time since I took genetics, Doctor.
RVN is one of the key factors in our development during puberty. Unlike DNA, which never changes, RVN takes on some additional viroxic sequences during adolescence. Those sequences determine how we develop physically.
Without them we would never mature into adults.
Exactly. Somehow, those sequences were eliminated in the Captain and the others during transport.
So what do we do?
Well, we have a couple of options. These are the plants Keiko was carrying on the shuttle. Whatever turned the crew into children turned these plants into seedlings. I accelerated the growth on one of them, and it developed into a perfectly normal adult plant.
I don't suppose that would work with people?
No, but at least we know that if we do nothing at all, they will probably grow up just as they did before.
That's one option.
However, I do have the adult RVN patterns of all four of them. I might be able to send them back through the transporter pattern buffer and replace the missing sequences. But we can't even attempt that until we know why this happened in the first place. If somehow they were to lose more viroxic sequences.
They would get even younger.
Chief, I got the sensor report on the shuttle break-up. It looks like the break-up began near the starboard bulkhead.
O'BRIEN:There're some bulkhead fragments over here.
My visor's picking up some torsional stress damage, some micro-fractures. Hang on a second. What's this?
O'BRIEN:It looks like tritanium from the hull.
Yeah, but look.
That's not tritanium anymore. Somehow the molecular structure of this alloy's been changed, broken down into its constituent elements.
O'BRIEN:No wonder the bulkhead shattered.
Yeah. I want to get a sample of this down to Engineering and run a metallurgical analysis.
GUINAN JR:Well, this is exciting.
RO JR:Would you rather be playing with dolls?
GUINAN JR:I'd rather be doing almost anything other than sitting here and watching you sulk.
RO JR:This isn't some kind of glorious second childhood, Guinan. Our bodies have been violated, changed. Doesn't that bother you?
GUINAN JR:Sure it bothers me, but at the moment I can't do anything about it. So I might as well enjoy it.
RO JR:Enjoy what? Where did you get the idea that being short and awkward is some kind of wonderful gift?
GUINAN JR:There must've been some part of childhood that you didn't loathe.
RO JR:Look, it was a long, depressing period of my life and I was grateful when it was finally over. I'd rather not relive it.
GUINAN JR:I bet you were a jumper. A jumper. You know, someone who jumped up and down on furniture all the time.
RO JR:What?
GUINAN JR:You were a jumper all right. The quiet ones, they always look so innocent. You think you can turn your back on them. Next thing you know, bam! They're bouncing on the bed.
RO JR:That is the most ridiculous thing I've ever heard. Most of the time I didn't even have a bed.
GUINAN JR:Ah but you did have one sometimes and I bet you jumped on it.
RO JR:I most certainly did not.
GUINAN JR:Yeah I can see it in your eyes. You can barely resist the urge to leap up and start jumping around like a Tarkassian razorbeast.
RO JR:Guinan.
GUINAN JR:Oh yeah, oh yeah
RO JR:This is ridiculous.
GUINAN JR:That's right. And don't you dare join me, Ro Laren. You don't like jumping on beds!
RO JR:Oh yeah? I can jump higher.
We think the shuttle was caught in a molecular reversion field, which caused the structure of the ship to deteriorate. When the field penetrated the hull, it also began to affect the shuttle's crew.
O'BRIEN:When I tried to beam them off, I wasn't able to get a lock because the reversion field was masking part of the patterns.
If the transporter only registered part of the RVN patterns, that would explain why the key sequences are missing.
Exactly. With those key sequences missing, the transporter reconstructed them as children.
If they're right, would you be able to use the transporter to reverse the effects?
I think so. As long as there's no reversion field to mask their patterns, we should be able to do it. Chief, can you adjust the molecular imaging scanners to accept
Bridge to Commander Riker.
Go ahead.
We are entering orbit around Ligos Seven, sir.
On my way. We'll discuss this later.
Standard orbit, Ensign. Any sign of the science team?
We've been scanning the area since entering the system, but our readings are being disrupted.
Cause?
Extreme fluctuations in the electromagnetic field. However, there is no evidence of stellar or seismic activity which would cause the interference.
Any response to our hails, Mister Worf?
No, sir. I have been attempting to. Commander, two ships decloaking fore and aft. Klingon birds of prey, B'rel class.
Maximum shields. Take us out of orbit, Ensign. Mister Worf, prepare to return fire.
Damage report.
We've lost primary life support. Switching to secondary systems.
Lock phasers on target bearing to port.
Phasers locked.
Fire.
Minor damage to one ship. Its shields are holding.
Starboard power coupling is down. Warp engines are offline.
Shields?
Down to thirteen percent.
Casualties reported on decks twenty six and twenty seven.
Sensors and secondary generators are offline. Life support down to sixty seven percent.
Engineering, status report.
Those last shots took out auxiliary power and emergency back-up. It's going to take at least an hour to get
Warp power back online.
We have lost shields. Heavy casualties on decks thirty five through forty.
I am detecting transporter signatures in three cargo bays. We are being boarded, sir.
Come with me.
Initiate intruder alert. All security teams report to
Put down your weapons.
Computer, deactivate all command functions. Authorisation, Riker Omega Three
All command functions suspended.
This is Morta. We have secured the Bridge. Begin transporting all able-bodied adults to the surface.
Come on, get up there. Up, up.
They have locked out the command functions.
You said they would not have time.
You led the assault team. You were too slow.
You dare to blame me!
We have secured the ship, DaiMon, but Morta's incompetence has denied us access to
My incompetence? DaiMon, you know that I am
Enough. Where is the Captain of this ship?
I'm in command of this vessel. Who are you and on whose authority do you
I am DaiMon Lurin and I declare this ship to be a loss and open to claim according to the Ferengi Salvage Code. You will cooperate with our salvage operations or we will begin executing your crew.
PICARD JR:Is everyone all right?
RO JR:No fatalities or injuries among the children. The Ferengi have taken control of main Engineering and decks twenty three through thirty seven.
PICARD JR:We have to assume they've also taken the Bridge.
KEIKO JR:Captain, do you know what they've done with the younger children? With my little girl?
PICARD JR:They're taking all the adults down to the surface. It looks like they're keeping all the children on board the ship. Where was your daughter?
KEIKO JR:In primary care on deck fourteen.
PICARD JR:She's probably still there with the others. I wouldn't worry. We need to regain control of the ship. Options?
RO JR:We could flood the ship with anesthizine gas.
PICARD JR:That's been locked out with the rest of the command functions.
RO JR:If they're typical Ferengi, they're probably very pleased with themselves by now. Maybe even getting a little overconfident.
PICARD JR:Agreed. They might think they don't need as much of their crew to hold the ship. We could use the element of surprise to give us a tactical advantage.
GUINAN JR:Tactical advantage? Jean-Luc, look at your team for a minute. We're children.
PICARD JR:We can't just stay here while our ship is being commandeered.
GUINAN JR:I'm not suggesting that we do. But we can't act as if we were still adults.
PICARD JR:What do you suggest we do?
GUINAN JR:We look like children. Maybe it's time we started acting like children.
I hope your profit margin's pretty high for this little adventure, because you're risking war with the Federation.
We're not affiliated with the Ferengi Alliance. We are in business for ourselves. Yes, it will be highly profitable. For an investment of two surplus Klingon ships, a few repairs and some weapons, we've netted a Federation starship and her crew, not to mention a planet rich in vendarite.
So that's what this is all about. What did you do with the science team that was on the surface?
They have proved most helpful in extracting the mineral.
You used them as slave labourers.
The addition of your crew will greatly speed up the process. As for your ship, I'm sure that it will fetch a handsome price on the Romulan market. But before that can happen, we need to regain access to your central computer.
You don't really think I'm going to help you.
I think that the mines on Ligos Seven can be very hazardous. Now, how many people on your ship?
One thousand fourteen.
Very hazardous, Commander.
Hello. I'm the classroom computer system. What can I do for you, today?
PICARD JR:Computer, display interior security grid.
I'm sorry, but I can't do that. Would you like to play a game?
PICARD JR:No, I would not. Computer, display an internal schematic diagram.
I'm sorry, but I can't do that. Would you like to see some interesting plants or animals?
GUINAN JR:It's a child's computer, remember? Computer, can you show me a picture of the inside of the Enterprise?
Yes, I can. The Enterprise is a Galaxy-class starship. Do you know how to spell Enterprise? E N T E
PICARD JR:Delete audio. All right, this'll have to do. We're here. there's a service conduit that runs to here and then leads to a Jeffries tube here. But you and Ensign Ro will still have to cross this corridor before you can get to main Engineering.
RO JR:Captain.
PICARD JR:Excellent. Ready? Make it so.
What the devil?
I was just playing. I'm sorry, Captain.
PICARD JR:Alexander, would you mind if I borrowed your toy for a little while?
Go ahead.
PICARD JR:Thank you.
After you.
KEIKO JR:I've got the phasers, Captain.
RO JR:This is the first time these Jefferies tubes haven't seemed cramped.
GUINAN JR:How much farther do we have to go?
RO JR:About fifty metres. Don't tell me you're tired.
GUINAN JR:I'm not as young as I used to be.
RO JR:This is it. Main Engineering. Now we wait.
PICARD JR:Report?
Mission accomplished, sir. The one in sickbay never saw me.
PICARD JR:Very good.
KEIKO JR:I'd say we're ready. Have you figured out how to get to the Bridge?
PICARD JR:I'm afraid I can only think of one way.
What do you want?
PICARD JR:I need to see my father.
Go back inside.
PICARD JR:I need to see him right now.
Do not argue with me. Go back inside.
PICARD JR:I need to see him now! Now! Now! Now! Now! Now! Now! Now! Stop it! You've hurt me! I want my father! I want my father!
All right. Just stop that.
PICARD JR:Let me go!
Here he is. Now be quiet!
What is going on?
PICARD JR:Dad!
So, son, how are you?
PICARD JR:I'm okay.
And how are your friends, Keiko, Guinan and Ro?
PICARD JR:They're okay too. But
What's wrong?
PICARD JR:We don't have anything to do. None of the games are working.
I know. The Ferengi made Daddy turn off the main computer.
PICARD JR:Can't you just turn on the kid's computer in schoolroom eight? We just want to play a few games.
I don't know if they'll let me do that, Jean-Luc, but I will ask.
PICARD JR:Thanks, Number One. He's my number one Dad.
Here they come.
KEIKO JR:How did it go? Did Commander Riker get the message?
PICARD JR:He understood. We should have access very soon.
Come in.
I understand your son was here to see you.
That's right.
We Ferengi do not bring our offspring along with us aboard ship.
Then I suppose that's your loss. We consider our families one of our strengths.
I think you will find that they can also be a weakness. Unless you release the computer to our control, I will execute every child on this ship, beginning with yours.
Even you wouldn't be that cruel.
It is cruel to put children in danger by bringing them aboard a starship in the first place.
All right. Just so you don't harm my son.
You will release the computer and show Morta exactly how to use it.
Computer, release command control this station. Authorisation, Riker Omega three.
Command functions restored.
Okay, Morta. The Enterprise computer system is controlled by three primary main processing cores, cross-linked with a redundant melacortz ramistat. fourteen kiloquad interface modules. The core element is based on an FTL nanoprocessor with twenty five bilateral kelilactirals, with twenty of those being slaved into the primary heisenfram terminal. Now you do know what a bilateral kelilactiral is?
Well, of course I do, human. I am not stupid.
No, of course not. This is the isopalavial interface which controls the main firomactal drive unit. Don't touch that. You'll blow up the entire firomactal drive.
What? Wait. What is a firomactal drive? Just explain it to me.
That is the firomactal drive unit. It controls the ramistat core and also keeps the ontarian manifold at forty thousand KRGs.
The firomactal drive is powered by
PICARD JR:Command lockout has been released. Accessing transporter. Weapons deactivation programme is in place. Transporter security field standing by. We're ready.
RO JR:Tag!
GUINAN JR:You're it!
Yes?
I found this in the school room. Is it yours?
PICARD JR:That's all of them except for the two on the Bridge. Wait here until I return.
Yes, sir.
So, one more time. The ramistat kiloquad capacity is a function of the square root of the intermix ratio times the sum of the plasma injector quotient.
Come in.
PICARD JR:I believe you're in my chair.
Captain's log, stardate 46236.3. We have taken Lurin and his men into custody. The Ferengi Alliance has quickly disavowed any knowledge of these renegades. With the mining operation closed and our crew back on board, we can now turn our attention to other problems.
O'BRIEN:Phase inducers activated. Energy levels nominal.
I'm loading the adult patterns into the buffer.
O'BRIEN:Transposition matrix locked in. That should do it, Captain.
PICARD JR:Energise.
How do you feel?
I feel fine. Everything seems a little smaller.
RO JR:It's my mother. The funny thing is, I never really drew a picture of her when I was young. It's just, for some reason I wanted to now.
That's the wonderful thing about crayons. They can take you to more places than a starship.
RO JR:It's my turn, isn't it?
Only if you're ready.
RO JR:It's not quite as bad as I remembered it. Being a child, I mean. Well, we'd better get going.
Well, what's the hurry? I mean, the transporter will still be there. Why don't you pass me the royal blue.
RO JR:Here.
Thank you. Did you do this one too?
RO JR:I did all of them.
All of them?
Thank you. Please take that to Engineering.
Phaser upgrades are complete, Commander.
Already?
And we have begun power supply calibration.
You're just too damned efficient, Lieutenant.
Thank you, sir.
Continue with the testing, Mister Worf. Here's the final schedule for the shore leave and for the personnel transfers. By the way, I'm looking forward to meeting your parents.
Sir?
They're on the visitors' list. You didn't know?
No, sir. It is inappropriate for a Klingon to receive family while on duty. As humans, my parents do not understand.
Well, I'm not sure that I would either, Worf, since this isn't a Klingon ship. If you don't want to see your parents, that's your business, but we don't get to Earth all that often. I'm sure we can arrange for you to have more off duty time while they're here.
No, sir. That will not be necessary.
Dismissed. Mister Worf, if you're worried that they might learn about what happened on the Klingon planet
Not at all. I have already informed them by correspondence of my discommendation. I do not believe any human can truly understand my dishonour.
So, where have you decided to go?
Hmm? What? Oh, er, France. Labarre. My home village.
Really?
Yes. It's the first time in almost twenty years.
Interesting.
Counsellor.
I just find it interesting. Captain Jean-Luc Picard, the man who couldn't be pried out of his seat for a vacation for three years
It's Earth. It's home. Do I need another reason?
I don't know. What do you think?
Your help has been invaluable during my recovery, but, look, I'm better. The injuries are healing.
Those you can see in the mirror.
The nightmares have ended. All I need now is a little time to myself.
I agree. In fact, I'm delighted you're going. It's just that the choice of where you're going could stand some scrutiny.
If you wish to believe that my going home is a direct result of being held captive by the Borg, be my guest.
Is that what you believe?
I hate it when you do that.
Captain, you do need time. You cannot achieve complete recovery so quickly. And it's perfectly normal, after what you've been through, to spend a great deal of time trying to find yourself again.
And what better place to find oneself than on the streets of one's home village.
Interesting. Have a good trip, Captain.
They still have not signalled?
O'BRIEN:No sir.
My mother is never on time. It is so human of her.
O'BRIEN:Well, you know women.
I am not looking forward to this. I wish they would come so it would begin and end sooner.
O'BRIEN:I know what you mean, Lieutenant.
Unlikely.
O'BRIEN:Last time my old man was on board I found him chasing Nurse Stanton around a biobed in Sickbay.
I am not concerned about my father chasing nurses.
O'BRIEN:Yeah, but it's always something with parents, isn't it.
Enterprise, this is Earth Station Bobruisk. Two to transport aboard.
O'BRIEN:Energising.
Mother. Father.
Worf!
You look good, son. Put on a little weight, huh?
No.
Sure you have. Looks good on you. Still working out with those Holodeck monsters, I bet.
Let me take you to
Always good to meet another Chief Petty Officer. Sergey Rozhenko, formerly of the USS Intrepid.
O'BRIEN:Miles Edward O'Brien, sir. Good to meet you.
Don't call me sir. I used to work for a living.
He's joking. The proudest day of his life was when Worf earned his commission.
Can you imagine an old enlisted man like me raising a boy to be an officer?
Come on, Sergey. There's plenty of time to chat with the boys. Your father has been so looking forward to this.
Yes, I want to see everything. The whole ship. At home I have all the specs and diagrams of the Galaxy-class starships.
We are in the midst of a repair. I cannot give you a complete tour.
I'm sure if you asked the Captain
You agreed not to embarrass him. Besides, we have come to see Worf, not the ship.
Fine. Fine. Okay.
Your hair's a little longer, isn't it, Worf?
All right, whoever you are, I can hear you.
Oh, good lord, a highwayman.
A what?
A highwayman. It's a robber who attacks travellers, but none have been reported in this vicinity for centuries.
But I'm not a robber.
I am much relieved, sir.
I know who you are.
Then, you have the advantage.
You're my nephew, Jean-Luc. From the starship Enterprise.
Then you must be my uncle Rene.
I'm not your uncle. It's the other way around.
Too bad. I rather enjoyed the idea.
Why have you been away so long?
Well, Starfleet keeps me very busy.
Father says you don't like it here.
I'm sure you misunderstood.
No, I didn't. He said so.
Well, Robert and I, we. Perhaps it's time to change all that.
You know, you don't seem so arrow. Arrow. You know.
Arrogant?
Yes, arrogant. You don't seem that way to me. What does it mean anyway, arrogant son of a
Let's talk about that later, shall we?
Mummy! He's here! Mummy, he's here!
Jean-Luc!
Marie.
It is so good to finally meet you.
For me, too.
How are you feeling?
Oh, I'm fine.
Well, Robert and I are delighted that you've come to stay with us.
I was, I was thinking I, I might be imposing. I could very easily stay in the village.
I wouldn't hear of it. It's your home and it will always be your home. Do things look that different?
No. In fact, it's amazing how little it has changed. Everything is exactly as I remember it. The house, the hills, every tree, every bush seems untouched by the passage of time.
Robert's worked hard to keep it that way. It's very important to him.
As it was to our father.
Someday I'm going to be a starship captain.
You look exactly like Robert when he was your age. I half expect to see myself as a boy come running out that door to play.
Robert can't wait to see you.
Rene already told me. Where is he?
As usual, with his vines.
So, you arrived all right. Welcome home, Captain.
Hello, Robert.
You've shuttled in from the village?
No I decided to walk. I met Marie and Rene.
Good. Good.
It's good to see you.
Are you tired?
No.
Make yourself at home. You know where everything is. We generally eat about eight. I must try and cure this poor, sick vine. I'll see you shortly.
So, you'll have a chance to visit the surface?
Maybe. Will and I have been talking about going back to Angel Falls.
Oh, Venezuela's beautiful.
Come in.
Great. Thank you.
Something from home?
I left it here in storage a long time ago after Jack died. Odds and ends, mostly.
How to Advance Your Career through Marriage?
It was a joke. Jack sent it to me while I was still in medical school. It was his way of proposing to me.
What's that?
It's for Wesley, from Jack. I'd forgotten it. Maybe I was just trying to forget it.
Why?
Jack recorded a holographic message to Wesley just after he was born. It was a gift for when he grew up. Jack was going to make many more of them. He never had the chance.
Are you afraid of what it might say?
No, I just don't know if it'll do more harm than good. Wesley's finally come to terms with his father's death.
Wesley has a lot of questions about his father. Things that you can't answer for him. Perhaps seeing this will help him understand.
Check completed, sir.
So we walked into the school and we don't know what to expect. Is Worf hurt? Is he in some kind of trouble? The door opens and there is our little seven year old sitting on a chair and glaring across the room at five teenage boys, all of them with bloody noses.
And then the principal looked up and said, please tell me he's an only child.
We have taken enough of the Commander's time.
No, no, no, we're way ahead of schedule here.
I just wanted to tell him the story about
Enough stories, Sergey.
Okay. Okay. Enough stories. Well, how about giving us a look at the new engine core. I used to be a warp field specialist on the old Excelsior class.
I'd be delighted. Mrs. Rozhenko?
No, no, no, no, no. You two go ahead. Your father will be hours. Worf, why don't you show me the arboretum?
Commander La Forge, call me when you, when my father wishes to leave.
I can find my own way. Turbolift four is just over there, right? I have all the specs and designs at home.
The theta-matrix compositer makes the recrystallisation process ten times more efficient than the old Excelsior class ships.
Amazing. Commander, if you have a couple of minutes, there is something else I want to ask you.
Sure, Chief.
It's about my son.
Your friend Louis wants you to contact him as soon as you're settled.
Is he still trying to raise the ocean floor?
Oh yes, he's very excited about it. He's been made a supervisor now, as his wife is constantly reminding anyone who'll listen.
I see no good reason why the Earth should have another subcontinent.
It's really quite exciting, actually, if you understand the potential of exploring a new world on our own planet.
Well, I'm afraid that I do not understand this potential.
The Mayor wants to give you a parade.
A parade?
Give you the keys to the city.
No. No, no, no, no.
He just needs a little arm twisting, dear, coaxing.
No. he does not. I'm here to rest and spend some time with my family.
Well, I've already warned the Mayor not to make any plans without talking to us.
Salut.
Is this the forty six?
Forty seven. You've been drinking too much of that artificial stuff. What do you call it? Synthehol? It's spoiled you. Ruined your palate.
On the contrary. I think that synthehol heightens one's appreciation for the genuine article.
Delicious, Marie.
Thank you.
Leave it to Robert to find the best cook in France, then marry her.
Yes, but sadly cooking is becoming a lost art. That's your wretched technology again.
Robert and I have had more than a few discussions about getting a replicator in the house.
I remember the same discussions between mother and father.
Father understood better than anybody else the danger of losing those values which we hold most precious.
I don't see that you have to lose anything just by adding a convenience.
You wouldn't, but in my view, life is already too convenient.
This is a very old argument.
I wrote a report on starships for school.
And he won a ribbon for it.
The teacher said it was one of the best he'd ever heard.
Good for you, Uncle. You know what? I once wrote a report about starships when I was about your age.
Did you win a ribbon too?
I don't recall.
And I don't find your modesty very unconvincing, brother. Of course you won the ribbon. You always did.
Do you still have it? Your report.
No, I don't think so.
Well, I still have mine.
Why don't you go and get it, and then you can read it to your uncle.
It's hard enough to protect him, protect him from all that's out there without you encouraging him.
I am not encouraging him. If you weren't so narrow minded, if you allowed him to see the world as it really is
You raise your own sons as you would wish, and allow me to do the same with mine.
One man's idea of paradise.
No, my dear Louis, two men. Robert's and my father's.
Never did I know anyone less interested in grapes than you, Jean-Luc.
No, not true. I was interested. And I was proud that my family were helping to preserve the traditions. I just didn't feel bound by those traditions.
You always reached for the future and your brother for the past.
There should be room for both in this life. And what about you, you old rascal. You've taken quite a shift into the future yourself.
Well, hydroponics turned out to be so dull.
You should have listened to me at the beginning.
If I had listened to you, I never would have taken that cycling trip with the Bloom sisters.
And broken your leg.
And got married twice.
I hear you've been promoted to supervisor of the Atlantis project.
I'm one of two hundred supervisors, although my wife would have you believe I run the entire project.
Well. it's certainly very exciting work. I've kept up on it in the journals.
Really?
It's only. There's just one thing I don't understand. You were such a rotten swimmer, Louis. Thinking of you working on the ocean floor.
I suppose we all find ways to confront our greatest fears.
Seriously, how do you plan to accelerate the buildup on the underside of the mantle without increasing the stress on the tectonic plates?
You really have kept up, haven't you? The truth is we don't know, yet.
On the Enterprise, we used harmonic resonators to relieve the tectonic pressures on Drema Four. Obviously, it's not the same problem but
You know, it's such a shame. The government is looking for someone to take over the project. A real leader who'll go in there and get things moving. And they are looking for you, Jean-Luc. I know, I know, you'd never leave Starfleet.
No, I'd never leave Starfleet.
That's what I thought, but if nothing else, why don't I send over some of the internal studies of the tectonic problem, since you're interested? We could use any thoughts you might have.
All right.
It's a great crew, son, and they think the world of you.
They really do.
Mother, Father, I wish you would be a little more reserved while you are on board.
I know. We go too far, sometimes.
We're just excited to be here.
Riker to Lieutenant Worf.
Worf here.
I need to talk to you about the phaser test results.
On my way, Commander. Have Guinan call me if you need anything.
Maybe we should just leave it alone.
I can't just leave it alone. I'm his mother.
You know, sooner or later, everyone comes in here. They stand by those windows and they look out and the stare. They're looking for that little star they call home. It doesn't matter how far away it is, everybody looks anyway. I'm Guinan. Pleased to meet you. You're Worf's parents?
Sergey and Helena Rozhenko
Welcome. Sit, please. There's something I would like to ask you.
Please.
How come you never gave him prune juice?
I beg your pardon?
He said he'd never had it till he came here. Mow he can't get enough of it.
Worf?
He never wanted any human food while he was growing up. Everything had to be Klingon.
I learned to cook rokeg blood pie.
However, we never quite learned how to eat it.
It was a difficult adolescence.
But you got through it.
We didn't do anything special.
Didn't you? Just look at him. I think he's pretty special.
We knew it wouldn't be easy for him, growing up without other Klingons to go to for guidance.
We had to let him discover and explore his heritage by himself, let him find his own path.
So many parents could learn so much from the two of you.
Well, I'm afraid that Worf feels that we do not understand him.
Well, part of him may feel that way, but there's another part that I've seen. A part that comes in and drinks prune juice. A part that looks out the window towards home. He's not looking toward the Klingon Empire. He's looking toward you.
Jean Luc? Are you all right?
I seem to have made a rather disturbing discovery. Louis mentioned the Atlantis project needed a director, and I found myself actually thinking about it.
Why shouldn't you?
Leaving my career, the Enterprise?
Considering what you've just been through
No, it's not that. Or is it?
Besides, it would be wonderful to have you back home. Given a little time, maybe you and your brother might even get to like one another.
Well, I already like his choice in wives. I never thanked you for your correspondence. It made me feel like part of the family.
You're not like part of the family. You are part of the family, Jean Luc Picard.
Don't worry, my dear, I've got it.
Robert.
Louis, come in. Let me get you some wine. You can talk business.
Business?
Well, there's nothing much to talk about.
I'm interested to know what you thought about our plans.
I've only had a chance to glance at them. I've a few ideas.
Wonderful. We should discuss them with the board of governors. I've set up a meeting.
Meeting?
Just a preliminary conversation. Tomorrow morning?
Preliminary to what?
They want you. I mentioned your interest in the project, that's all. That's all I had to say. They jumped at the prospect.
I never said there was a prospect.
At least listen to them, Jean-Luc.
All right. Very good. Fine. I'll listen.
You won't regret it, Jean-Luc. I promise you. I'll see you in the morning.
I don't understand, Mom. What kind of message?
I don't know exactly. Your father made it a few weeks after you were born.
Why?
He felt it was important to say certain things. And to make sure that he didn't forget to tell you later.
Do you know what it says?
No. But he wanted you to have this when you turned eighteen. And I want you to have it, too.
Enter.
Are we disturbing you?
No. No. I thought you were going to your quarters to sleep.
We just came by to tuck you in.
Please. When I heard you were on the visitors' list, I was not sure I wanted you to come. I am glad you are here.
We had to come.
Our boy was in trouble. After we read your letter about the discommendation from the Klingons.
We don't exactly understand it all.
We don't have to. We know what kind of man you are.
Whatever you did, we know it was for a good reason.
I must bear my dishonour alone.
That is not true.
I'm sorry if this is too human of us but, whenever you are suffering, you must remember we are with you.
And that we're proud of you, and that we love you.
You're our son.
Careful. You're not used to drinking the real thing. This synthehol never leaves you out of control, is that so?
That's so.
This will.  Now there is something I'd like to see.
What's that?
The gallant Captain out of control. Mind if I ask you a question? What the devil happened to you up there?
Is this brotherly concern?
No. Curiosity. What did they do to you?
You know what happened.
Not precisely. I gather you were hurt. Humiliated. I always thought you needed a little humiliation. Or was it humility? Either would do.
Why do you walk away? That isn't your style.
I'm tired of fighting with you, Robert.
Tired?
That's right.
Yes. Tired of the Enterprise too? The great Captain Picard of Starfleet falls to Earth, ready to plunge into the water with Louis. That isn't the brother that I remember. Still, I suppose it must have seemed like the ideal situation, hmm? Local boy makes good. Returns home after twenty years to a hero's welcome.
I'm not a hero.
Of course you are. Admit it. You'd never settle for less than that and you never will.
That's not true.
Cancel the parade? In your favour?
No! I never sought that rubbish.
Never sought? Never sought president of the school, valedictorian, athletic hero with your arms raised in victory?
Valedictorian? Arms raised in victory? Were you so jealous?
Yes, damn it. I was always so jealous, I had a right to be.
Right?
I was always your brother, watching you receive the cheers, watching you break every rule our father made and get away with it.
Why didn't you break a few rules?
Because I was the elder brother, the responsible one. It was my job to look after you.
Look after me? You? You were a bully.
Sometimes. Maybe. Sometimes I even enjoyed bullying you.
All right. Try it now.
Did you come back, Jean-Luc? Did you come back because you wanted me to look after you again?
Damn you!
You were asking for it, you know.
Yes, but you needed it. You have been terribly hard on yourself.
You don't know, Robert. You don't know. They took everything I was. They used me to kill and to destroy, and I couldn't stop them. I should have been able to stop them! I tried. I tried so hard, but I wasn't strong enough. I wasn't good enough. I should have been able to stop them. I should! I should!
So, my brother is a human being after all. This is going to be with you a long time, Jean-Luc. A long time. You have to learn to live with it. You have a simple choice now. Live with it below the sea with Louis, or above the clouds with the Enterprise.
You know, I think you were right after all. I think I did come back so that you could help me.
You know what? I still don't like you, Jean-Luc.
What in the world? What happened here?
Ah
It's entirely my fault, Marie.
Yes, I fell down, then he fell and then
We both fell down.
We both fell down.
Together.
We both fell down together.
Have you two been fighting?
Fighting? No, certainly not.
Shame on you both. What would your father say if he saw you like this?
He'd probably send us both to bed without our supper.
Well, perhaps it's just as well you got it out of your systems.
Perhaps it was, Marie. Perhaps it was. I'll contact Louis and cancel the meeting with the Board of Governors. It's time that I was going.
Already, Jean-Luc?
The ship will be ready to leave orbit soon, and I belong on board. If I should ever doubt that again, I know where to come.
Computer, load programme, Crusher One.
Programme complete. Enter when ready.
Run programme.
Hello, Wesley. As I make this recording, you are about ten weeks old. I wanted you to know who I am today. You see, this Jack Crusher won't exist by the time you're grown up. I'll be older, more experienced, and hopefully a little wiser. But this person will be gone and I want you to know who your father was when you came into the world. When I see you lying there in your crib, I realise I don't know the first thing about being a father. So let me just apologise for all the mistakes I'm about to make as you grow up. I hope you don't grow up resenting the fact that I was gone so much. That comes with this uniform. I don't know if I can explain why Starfleet means so much to me. Maybe you'll understand when you get this recording. Maybe you'll even want to try one of these on. But you'll probably be a doctor like your mother. You're only a baby, but it's remarkable. I can see in your face all the people I've loved in my lifetime. Your mother, my father and mother. Our family. I can see me in you, too. And I can feel that you're my son. I don't know how to describe it, but there's this connection, this bond. I'll always be a part of you, Wesley. Well, I hope this made some sense to you. I'm not sure that it does to me, but maybe I'll do better next time. I love you, Wesley.
Goodbye, Dad.
Come back and see us again. Goodbye, Jean-Luc. And be careful.
Take care, Uncle.
You too. Someday, I'll be leaving for my starship, too.
Well, there's plenty of time for that. You may decide to do something else as you get older.
Jean-Luc, here is a little of the forty seven. Do not drink it all at once, and if possible, try not to drink it alone.
Is there anything you want us to send you from home?
No. Perhaps some of your rokeg blood pie.
It's been a while, but I think I still remember how.
Captain. Welcome back.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
These are my parents, Helena and Sergey Rozhenko.
Delighted. Sir.
Quite a ship you have here, Captain.
You had the full tour, I trust?
Well, actually, there are still a few areas because of the repairs
Sergey. It's time to go.
Yes. Yes. Okay. I have all the specs and diagrams at home.
He's still out there. Dreaming about starships and adventures. It's getting late.
Yes. But let him dream.
Damage report!
Casualty reports coming in from all over the ship.
The starboard nacelle has sustained a direct impact. We are venting drive plasma.
Initiating emergency core shutdown.
Inertial dampers failing. We're losing attitude control.
This is the Bridge. All hands to emergency escape pods.
Core shutdown is unsuccessful. We are losing antimatter containment.
We've got to eject the core!
Ejection systems offline. Core breach is imminent.
All hands abandon ship. Repeat, all hands abandon
Captain's log, stardate 45652.1. The Enterprise has entered an area of space known as the Typhon Expanse. We're the first Starfleet vessel to chart this unexplored region.
Sometimes I wonder if he's stacking the deck.
I assure you, Commander, the cards are sufficiently randomised.
I hope so.
Eight, Ace, Queen. The dealer receives a four.
No bet.
Ten. Seven. No help there. A pair of ladies for the Doctor. The dealer receives a nine. Doctor? May I remind you since you show the highest hand, you control the next bet.
Thank you, Data. I bet ten. Worf?
Jack. Four. Deuce. Six.
Twenty.
Your twenty, and fifty more.
Fifty?
I'm in.
I will also see the bet. Seven. A possible straight for Commander Riker. Jack. Still no help for the Klingon. Eight. Nine for the dealer.
Twenty.
Too rich for my blood.
Your twenty, one hundred more.
Fold.
Two hundred.
Your two, and three hundred more.
He does not have a straight.
We'll soon find out, won't we. Let's see your cards.
Take it. How'd you know I was bluffing?
I just had a feeling.
I guess it's better to be lucky than good.
It's the way your left eyebrow raises when your bluffing. Just kidding, Commander.
Ogawa to Doctor Crusher.
Go ahead.
Commander La Forge needs you in Sickbay.
On my way.
At first I thought the catwalk was spinning. As it turns out, it was me. Luckily Ensign Fletcher was there to grab me. It's a long way down to the bottom of the warp core.
You have all the symptoms of an inner ear infection. That would explain the dizziness and the headaches. But there's no physical evidence. My guess is you've been working too hard.
I have been putting a lot of extra hours on this Typhon Expanse project.
I'll give you twenty cc's of vertazine. That should clear up the dizziness. But finding time to relax is up to you.
What? What is it?
Geordi, have you had these symptoms before?
No.
You're sure?
Yeah, I'm positive. Why?
It's funny. I feel like we've discussed this before, and I remember giving you a hypospray for dizziness.
I've never had these symptoms before today, so you must be thinking about another patient.
No. I'm sure it was you. Well, try to get some rest, and try to stay away from high places for a few days, just in case.
Thanks, Doc.
Goodnight.
Goodnight.
As you can see, the Typhon Expanse is huge. If we want to chart the most remote star system, we'll have to launch a probe within the next few hours.
Fine. What about the luminosity studies?
That may pose a problem.
How so?
The flux spectrometers are still down for re-alignment.
I thought they were supposed to be back online yesterday.
They were, until the stellar dynamics lab decided they needed to install new modules.
I recommend we use a gravitron polarimeter. It will perform a similar function.
Make it so, Mister Data.
Captain, I have something I'd like to report.
Yes, Doctor?
I heard voices in my room last night. I was alone, so at first I thought I was imagining things. But this morning, ten other people reported hearing them at the same time I did.
What were the voices saying?
I couldn't make them out.
Data, did the sensors pick up anything unusual last night?
No anomalous readings were reported.
When we're through here, re-check the sensor logs.
Aye, sir.
Counsellor?
I sensed nothing unusual last night.
Maybe it's a problem with the comm. system.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
We are getting unusual readings twenty thousand kilometres off the starboard bow.
On our way.
Report.
Sensors didn't detect the phenomenon until we were almost on top of it, sir.
It is a highly localised distortion of the space-time continuum.
On screen.
Back us off, Ensign. Nice and slow.
Aye sir. Captain, manoeuvring thrusters are not responding.
The distortion field is fluctuating.
All main systems just went down. Power levels are dropping rapidly.
Red alert.
There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
We have to get out of here now.
Captain, something is emerging.
Shields up. Evasive manoeuvres.
Shields inoperative.
The helm's not responding.
The vessel is on a collision course. Impact in thirty six seconds.
Hail them.
No response.
Suggestions?
Decompress main shuttlebay. The explosive reaction may kick us out of the way.
Captain, I suggest we use the tractor beam to alter the other ship's trajectory.
Mister Worf, make it so.
Engaging tractor beam.
Damage report!
Casualty reports coming in from all over the ship.
Starboard nacelle sustained a direct impact. Venting drive plasma.
Initiating emergency core shutdown.
Inertial dampers failing. We're losing attitude control.
This is the Bridge. All hands to emergency escape pods.
Core shutdown was unsuccessful. We are losing antimatter containment.
We've got to eject the engine core!
Ejection systems are offline. Core breach is imminent.
All hands, abandon ship! Repeat, all hands abandon
Captain's log, stardate 45652.1. The Enterprise has entered an area of space known as the Typhon Expanse. We are the first Starfleet vessel to chart this unexplored region.
Sometimes I wonder if he's stacking the deck.
I assure you, Commander, the cards have been sufficiently randomised.
I hope so.
Eight. Ace. Queen. The dealer receives a four.
No bet.
Ten. Seven. No help there. A pair of ladies for the Doctor. Dealer receives a nine. Doctor? May I remind you since you show the highest hand, you control the next bet.
Is there something wrong, Doctor?
No. I bet ten.
Jack. Four. Deuce. Six.
Twenty.
Your twenty and I'll raise you fifty. You're going to call my bluff, aren't you. I think I'll quit while I'm ahead.
How did you know I was going to call your bluff?
I just had a feeling.
Me too.
Ogawa to Doctor Crusher.
Go ahead.
Commander La Forge needs you in Sickbay.
On my way.
At first I thought the catwalk was spinning. As it turns out, it was me. I was lucky Ensign Fletcher was there to grab me. It's a long way down to the bottom of the warp core.
You have all the symptoms of an inner ear infection. That would explain your the headaches and the dizziness. But there's no physical
What? What is it?
Geordi, have you ever had these symptoms before?
Now that you mention it, I think I have.
Do you recall when?
No, I don't.
We've had this discussion before and I know I've given you this examination. Let's check the medical logs. You've been treated several times for headaches related to your visor, but I read no mention of dizziness.
Must be dj vu.
Both of us? About the same thing?
Crusher to Captain Picard.
Yes, Doctor?
Do you have a minute, Jean-Luc?
My Aunt Adele cured a lot of sleepless nights with this steamed milk.
Thank you. Mmm, nutmeg.
Whenever I get insomnia, I try to perfect the recipe.
It was the eeriest feeling. When the glass broke, it triggered the sensation even more intensely that I'd done it all before.
You know, earlier, I was reading this book, and I had the distinct feeling I'd read certain paragraphs before. But I assumed I'd read the book years ago and I'd forgotten.
I've had this feeling for hours. And then the voices.
Well, it could be nothing more than the result of a sleepless night. But let's be sure. Have Data and Geordi run a shipwide diagnostic, concentrating on the time and place you heard the voices, and we'll discuss the results tomorrow at seven hundred hours.
Thank you. For everything.
Thank Aunt Adele.
The internal scans were negative. There was no evidence of auditory anomalies anywhere on the ship.
As far as the sensors are concerned, nothing unusual happened last night.
Ten other people reported hearing voices at the same time I did.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
We are getting unusual readings twenty thousand kilometres off the starboard bow.
On our way.
Report.
Sensors didn't detect the phenomenon until we were almost on top of it, sir.
It is a highly localised distortion of the space-time continuum.
On screen.
Back us off, Ensign. Nice and slow.
Aye sir. Captain, manoeuvreing thrusters are not responding.
The distortion field is fluctuating.
All main systems just went down. Power levels are dropping rapidly.
Red alert.
There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
We have to get out of here now.
Captain, something is emerging.
Shields up. Evasive manoeuvres.
Shields inoperative.
The helm is not responding.
The vessel is on a collision course. Impact in thirty six seconds.
Hail them.
No response.
Suggestions?
Decompress main shuttlebay. The explosive reaction may blow us out of the way.
Captain, I suggest we use the tractor beam to alter the other ship's trajectory.
Make it so, Mister Worf.
Engaging tractor beam.
Damage report!
Casualty reports coming in from all over the ship.
Starboard nacelle has sustained a direct impact. We are venting drive plasma.
Initiating emergency core shutdown.
Inertial dampers failing. We're losing attitude control.
This is the Bridge. All hands to emergency escape pods.
Core shutdown was unsuccessful. We are losing antimatter containment.
We've got to eject the core!
Ejector systems are offline. Core breach is imminent
All hands abandon ship. Repeat, all hands abandon
Captain's log, stardate 45652.1. The Enterprise has entered an area of space known as the Typhon Expanse. We are the first Starfleet vessel to chart this unexplored region.
Sometimes I wonder if he's stacking the deck.
I assure you, Commander, the cards are sufficiently randomised.
I hope  so.
Something wrong, Mister Worf?
I am experiencing nIb'poH, the feeling I have done this before.
Yeah, last Tuesday night.
That's not what I mean.
I've been having the same feeling. Keep dealing, Data.
Eight. Ace.
A Queen. You're going to give me a Queen. And you're going to get a four. Deal, Data.
But no one has bet.
Forget the bet. Just deal. Ten, seven, queen.
Nine. Jack. Four.
Deuce. Six.
This is highly improbable.
How did we know?
Wait. Crusher to Sickbay.
Sickbay here.
Is Commander La Forge there?
No, Doctor, he's not. Wait a minute. He just came in.
You wanted to see me, Doctor?
Yes. Captain, have you been getting the feeling that you've experienced certain things before? A sense of repetition?
Yes, recently. While I was reading. Why do you ask?
There have been similar incidents reported all over the ship. Feelings of dj vu. I had a premonition Geordi was going to come in to Sickbay. A few seconds later he did, with the symptoms of an ear infection. I was going to run the standard tests, but somehow I had a feeling they would turn out negative. So I ran an optical diagnostic which traced the problem to Geordi's visor. His dizziness is being caused by a phase shift in his visual receptors. It's causing him to see images that aren't there.
They're like blurry after-images.
I ran a scan to see if I could detect what he was seeing. I picked up miniscule distortions in the surrounding dekyon field. Somehow, his visor is translating those distortions into visual impulses.
It could be a malfunction in the ship's warp field generator. I'll check it out.
Run a localised subspace scan to look for anything else.
Aye, sir.
Keep me advised.
Crusher to Commander La Forge.
La Forge here.
Geordi, I just heard what sounded like voices in my room, but no one else is here.
Sensors just picked up something strange, too. We're checking it out.
I'm on my way.
Looks like you managed to record six point two seconds worth. Let's see if we can filter the signal and clear it up a little bit.
Then I wasn't just hearing things?
The sound itself appears to have been real. However the acoustic energy does not correspond to any ship's system, nor to any voice communications sent at the time you heard it.
Then where did the sound come from?
You heard the voices at the same time our localised subspace scan picked up a dekyon field distortion. The two may be related. Let's give another listen.
Computer, perform a narrow bandwidth analysis. Eliminate all non-vocal waveform components.
Can we isolate the voices? Find out what they're saying?
Computer, continuous playback please. There are approximately one thousand voices overlapping. The voices are those of the Enterprise crew. Our voices.
I'm sorry to call you here so early, but we couldn't wait until oh seven hundred hours. We think we may have an explanation for the odd occurrences around here. Commander.
This is going to sound pretty wild. Somehow, we've entered what seems to be a temporal causality loop. We think we're stuck in a particular fragment in time, and we've been repeating that same fragment over and over again.
Is this what's causing our dj vu?
Yes, but it's more than that. In dj vu, you only think you're repeating events. We actually are.
Our theory is this. Every time the loop begins again, everything resets itself, and starts all over. We don't remember anything that happened before, so each time through the loop, we think it's the first.
You mean we could have come into this room, sat at this table and had this conversation a dozen times already?
A dozen, a hundred, it's impossible to tell. We could have been trapped here for hours, days, maybe years.
If what we're saying is true, those voices I heard might have been echoes from previous loops.
It's the same thing with the phase shift in my visor. After-images in time.
If you're right about this, how did it happen? How did we get there?
I have a hypothesis that may explain that, Captain. I have analysed the recording Doctor Crusher made. Most of it is quite ordinary. One hundred fifty discussions about ship operations, two hundred fifty two conversations of a personal nature, five couples engaged in romantic encounters.
Your point, Mister Data?
There is evidence of some sort of disaster aboard the Enterprise, severe enough that the Captain ordered all hands to abandon ship. I have isolated three segments of the recording that are crucial.
A highly localised distortion of the space-time continuum.
Collision course. Impact in thirty six seconds.
All hands, abandon ship! Repeat, all hands abandon
Worf refers to a distortion. If this were a temporal distortion, and if we were close enough to it, it's possible that a large enough explosion might've ruptured the space-time continuum. We collided, exploded, then got stuck in this repeating loop of time.
If you're right, perhaps we could escape the loop by avoiding the collision.
That's our guess.
Maybe we should reverse course.
For all we know, reversing course may be what leads us into the crash.
No. We can't afford to start second guessing ourselves. We'll stay on this course until we have reason to change it. But let's do everything we can to avoid the collision.
Captain, we might not be able to figure out how to avoid this accident until it's too late. And if the loop begins again, we'll forget everything we've learned this time around.
What do you suggest?
If we do find a way to avoid this collision, we should try to send that information into the next loop.
Is that possible?
We have seen that echoes, or after-images, from previous loops appear as distortions in the dekyon field. We may be able to send a deliberate echo into the next loop.
Like a message in a bottle.
Exactly. We could enhance a dekyon emission to create a specific pattern and send ourselves a message. Not a long one, probably only a few characters. Maybe one word.
How do we know we'll pick up that word the next time through?
If the dekyon emission is modulated correctly, it will set up resonances in my positronic subprocessors. I will receive the information on what you would call a subconscious level.
Now there's the catch. We have no way of knowing how this information will be perceived by Data. It might be like a posthypnotic suggestion.
Even with all these uncertainties, we've got to try. Take whatever steps are necessary to send a message. Dismissed.
You know, it's possible we've tried this a thousand times and it's never worked.
Do you have a feeling that you've done this before?
No, I don't.
Neither do I. Maybe that's a good sign.
Let's test the emitter.
Particle accelerators at full power.
Dekyon field active. Particle flux nominal. We're in business.
All we need now is a message.
Senior officers, report to the Bridge.
On our way.
We've got to figure out how we've handled this before.
Back us off, Ensign. Nice and slow.
Aye sir. Captain manoeuvring thrusters are not responding.
The distortion field is fluctuating.
All main systems just went down. Power levels are dropping rapidly.
There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
We have to get out of here now.
Captain, something is emerging.
Shields up. Evasive manoeuvres.
Shields inoperative.
The helm's not responding.
The vessel is on a collision course. Impact in thirty six seconds.
Hail them.
No response.
Suggestions?
Decompress main shuttlebay. The explosive reaction may blow us out of the way.
Captain, I recommend we use the tractor beam to alter the other ship's trajectory.
Make it so, Mister Worf.
Engaging tractor beam.
Damage report!
Casualty reports are coming in from all over the ship.
Starboard nacelle has sustained a direct impact. We are venting drive plasma.
Initiating emergency core shutdown.
Inertial dampers failing. We're losing attitude control.
This is the Bridge. All hands to emergency escape pods.
Core shutdown is unsuccessful. We are losing antimatter containment.
We got to eject the core!
Ejection systems are offline. Core breach is imminent.
All hands abandon ship. Repeat, all hands abandon
Captain's log, stardate 45652.1. The Enterprise has entered an area of space known as the Typhon Expanse. We are the first Starfleet vessel to chart this unexplored region.
Sometimes I wonder if he's stacking the deck.
I assure you, Commander, the cards are sufficiently randomised.
I hope so.
Something wrong, Mister Worf?
I am experiencing nIb'poH. The feeling I have done this before.
Yeah, last Tuesday night.
That is not what I mean.
I've been having the same feeling. Wait. An eight, an Ace, a Queen and a four. Deal the cards, Data.
Three. All threes.
I was positive I knew what cards were going to be dealt.
I was also sure.
Finish dealing the hand.
Look at this, we've all got three of a kind.
First we get a three, and then three of a kind.
Ogawa to Doctor Crusher.
Go ahead.
Commander La Forge needs you in Sickbay.
I'm on my way.
At first I thought the catwalk was spinning. As it turns out, it was me. I was lucky Ensign Fletcher was there to grab me. It's a long way down to the bottom of the warp core.
You have all the symptoms of an inner ear infection. That would explain the headaches, dizziness. But I don't see any physical
What? What is it?
Geordi, have you ever had these symptoms before?
Now that you mention it, I think I have.
Do you recall when?
No, I don't.
I know we've had this discussion before, and I remember giving you this examination. Let's check the medical logs. You've been treated several times for headaches related to your visor but there's no mention of dizziness.
Must be dj vu.
Both of us? About the same thing? I'd like to run an optical diagnostic.
For an ear infection?
I have a hunch. Hold still. This pulse may be a little bright. Have you made any changes to your visor lately?
No. Why?
I'm detecting a small phase shift in your visual receptors.
Crusher to Captain Picard.
Yes, Doctor?
Can you come to Sickbay immediately? It's urgent.
I'm on my way.
His dizziness is being caused by a phase shift in his visual receptors. It's causing him to see things that aren't there.
They're like blurry after-images.
I ran a scan to see if I could detect what he was seeing. I picked up miniscule distortions in the surrounding dekyon field. His visor seems to be translating those distortions into visual impulses.
Could be a malfunction in the ship's warp field generator. I'll check it out.
While you're at it, run a localised subspace scan to look for anything unusual.
Aye, sir.
Keep me advised, Doctor.
Lateral sensors online. Subspace scanners active. Data, would you run a level two diagnostic on the warp subsystems?
Certainly.
All threes. that can't be right.
I have encountered the numeral three an inordinate number of times over the last two hours.
We have got a dekyon field fluctuation on deck nine, section twenty eight.
Crusher to Commander La Forge.
La Forge here.
I just heard what sounded like voices in my room, but there's no one here.
Sensors just picked up something strange, too. We're checking it out.
I'm on my way down.
Doctor Crusher, are you all right?
I'm fine.
I have isolated three segments of this recording that are crucial.
A highly localised distortion of the space-time continuum.
Collision course. Impact in thirty six seconds.
All hands, abandon ship! Repeat, all hands abandon
Worf refers to a distortion. If this were a temporal distortion, and if we were close enough to it, it's possible that a large enough explosion might've ruptured the space time continuum. We collided, exploded, then got stuck in this repeating loop of time.
If you're right about this then perhaps we can escape the loop by avoiding the collision.
That's our guess.
Perhaps we should reverse course.
For all we know, reversing course might be what leads us into the crash.
We can't afford to start second guessing ourselves. We should stay on this course until we have reason to change it. But in the meantime, I think we should do what we can to avoid a collision.
Captain. We've been seeing the number three all over the ship. On consoles, in a poker game.
To date we have encountered two thousand eighty five conspicuous examples of the number three.
All of these threes can't be coming up by accident.
Maybe somebody's trying to tell us something.
We came to the same conclusion so we ran a shipwide diagnostic. The only unusual thing we found was a dekyon field modulation in Data's positronic subprocessors.
What could be causing it?
I don't know, but if I wanted to send information from one loop to the next I might use a method like a dekyon emission.
You think we sent ourselves a message?
It would make sense. Maybe we are trying to tell ourselves something.
If that were true, what could three indicate?
Maybe we should run a level three diagnostic on all key systems.
It's a good idea. I'll have the computer run a pattern matching algorithm based on the number three.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
We're getting unusual readings twenty thousand kilometres off the starboard bow.
On our way.
Report.
Sensors didn't detect the phenomenon until we were almost on top of it, Captain.
It is a highly localised distortion of the space-time continuum.
On screen. How do you think we handled this before?
Back us off, Ensign. Nice and slow.
Aye, sir. Captain, manoeuvring thrusters are not responding.
The distortion field is fluctuating.
All main systems just went down. Power levels are dropping rapidly.
There is an energy build up in the distortion field.
We have to get out of here now.
Captain, something is emerging.
Shields up. Evasive manoeuvres.
Shields inoperative.
The helm's not responding.
The vessel is on a collision course. Impact in thirty six seconds.
Hail them.
No response.
Suggestions?
Decompress main shuttlebay. The explosive reaction may kick us out of the way.
Captain, I suggest we use the tractor beam to alter the other ship's trajectory.
Make it so, Mister Worf.
Engaging tractor beam.
The tractor beam will not be successful. I am decompressing the main shuttlebay.
We are clear of the distortion.
Data, what happened?
At the last moment, I speculated that three might refer to the number of rank insignia on Commander Riker's uniform. That indicated to me that his suggestion might be the correct course of action.
Data, you must have picked up a message we sent from the last loop, and stacked the deck in the poker game without realising it.
That is possible. I may also have been inadvertently responsible for the unexplained appearances of the number three.
Mister Worf, end Red alert. And try to access a Federation time base beacon. Let's see if we can find out how long we've been in this causality loop.
Time base confirms our chronometers are off by seventeen point four days.
Reset them, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
Captain, we are being hailed by the other vessel. The computer identifies it as the USS Bozeman, a Federation starship, Soyuz class.
Soyuz class? They haven't been in service in over eighty years.
Open a channel.
This is Captain Morgan Bateson of the Federation Starship Bozeman. Can we render assistance?
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise. We were just going to ask you the same thing.
Captain Picard, your vessel is not familiar to us.
Captain, have you any idea what has just happened?
Our sensors detected a temporal distortion. Then your ship appeared. We nearly hit you.
The Enterprise has been caught in temporal causality loop, and I suspect that something similar may have happened to you.
You must be mistaken. We left starbase only three weeks ago.
Captain, do you know what year this is?
Of course I do. It's twenty two seventy eight.
Perhaps you should beam aboard our ship. There's something we need to discuss.
On screen. Magnify.
That's the Brittain, all right.
The ship is intact, sir, with no indication of structural damage.
Engines?
All propulsion systems are shut down. The ship is drifting, sir.
Life form readings?
Inconclusive.
Counsellor?
There is life on board, but
What is it?
I don't know. Something
Number One, assemble your team.
Doctor Crusher, report to Transporter room three. Worf. Data.
Commander, I need to come too.
There is no malfunction in any of the main systems, sir.
Commander. Here's another one. This was done by a phaser on a setting of six or seven.
And more over here.
The entire Bridge crew.
Whoever did this could still be on the ship.
There is someone alive, but he didn't kill these people. Here.
I think he's Betazoid. It's all right. We're going to help you. Who did this? Who did this to you?
We're almost finished with the autopsies, Captain.
How long will it take to compile the data?
It's complicated. The dead were found all over the ship. Some were found locked in their rooms, barricaded, with weapons piled all around them. Others were found in the corridors where they'd obviously had hand to hand combat. It's going to take some time to analyse and sort through the details. We've identified him as Andrus Hagan, from Betazed, scientific advisor. He's in a profound catatonic state.
I'm not getting much, Captain. A few words, disconnected phrases. I can feel his terror but I can't seem to get through to him.
Stay with him, Counsellor. We're examining the Brittain for clues, but this man is the only one left who knows what happened there.
I'm here. I'm right here.
Are there voices?
Voices? What do they say?
Both things. No. No.
Keep talking to me. I'll try to understand.
All the engines check out perfectly, Commander. Once we get them started, the Brittain can get back to Starbase under her own power.
Let's give it a try.
Pre-heating injectors. Data, fuel flow?
Matter valves are open and operating. Magnetic containment of antimatter pods is constant.
Okay, open injectors.
Injectors open. There is no engine activity at all, sir.
What's wrong?
Nothing's wrong. I don't understand it.
Come.
I've been studying the autopsy reports. The conclusion is appalling. There was no outside source, no alien presence. All thirty four of them appear to have killed each other.
What could have caused such an event? Drugs? A virus? Poison?
Toxicological tests showed no unusual substances in their systems, and they all appear to be in good health. But for whatever reason, they seemed to turn against each other, using phasers and knives and bare hands. I'd like you to see this, Captain. It's from the logs of the Brittain. Captain Zaheva's mental condition deteriorated steadily once they'd became stranded. She began talking of plots and mutinies. This was the last entry log, made after they had been adrift for over three weeks.
First Officer Brink and his men were behind it. They got to the engines. They don't work anymore. Had to eliminate Brink. the ship is out of, out of, we're running out. Too dangerous! Out of Brink! And his men!
Eyes in the dark. One moon.
Where are you? I'm coming. Where are you?
Eyes in the dark. One moon. Eyes in the dark. One moon circles. See the eyes in the dark. One moon.
Where are you?
Captain's log, stardate 44635.8. Four days have passed, but we have made little progress in solving the mystery of the Brittain. I have decided we should return to Starbase two twenty, and to that end, Commander La Forge is rigging the Brittain for towing.
I'm going to try re-calibrating the field generators. I still don't see why we can't get the engines started. It just doesn't make any sense.
Someone's still here.
What did you say, Ensign?
Can't you hear it? There's someone still alive on the ship! I heard, I mean, I thought I heard something.
The ship was searched thoroughly. There's nobody left on board.
Sorry, sir. My mistake.
Don't worry about it. There were thirty four people were found dead on this ship. That's enough to make anybody uneasy.
Thank you, sir.
I'm here. Can you hear me? Tell me about the voices you hear.
Bright. Bright out there.
I don't understand. Bright what? Tell me more.
Boy, what a day this was. I'm doing an isozyme study on some populations of Cardilia but they're turning out to have these really weird polymorphisms. What a headache!
O'BRIEN:Is that why you're late?
Oh, no, I had a conference with Doctor Balthus. She wants to do a study on the laticifer ontogeny of the Kaladian Thorn Flower, but I don't have time to oversee another project.
O'BRIEN:Was Tom Corbin there?
What?
O'BRIEN:Tom Corbin from the science lab. Remember him?
Of course I remember him, but
O'BRIEN:You use any excuse you can to pay him a visit.
Miles, what are you saying?
O'BRIEN:I think you know exactly what I'm saying.
If I didn't know better, I'd say you were jealous.
O'BRIEN:Do you take me for a fool?
Hello, Chief. Having coffee?
O'BRIEN:No, I'm drinking too much coffee.
I'm surprised to see you here at this hour.
O'BRIEN:Why's that?
You're not out of the honeymoon yet. Usually newlyweds can't keep their hands off each other.
O'BRIEN:She has work to do. She heads up the plant biology lab, you know.
Any strange things going on down there?
O'BRIEN:Like what?
I've been hearing things. Kenicki in Engineering told me he saw a man in an old Starfleet uniform riding the lift near the engine core. When the lift got to the top, there was no one on it.
O'BRIEN:Ghost stories.
There's more, there's lots more. There are strange things happening on this ship, O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:I'm surprised at you, Gillespie. A Starfleet officer. I have more things to worry about than shades and spirits.
Come.
Come.
Yes, yes.
Come.
What?
Captain, do you have a moment?
We're concerned. We're afraid whatever happened on the Brittain may be starting here.
Explain.
Well, Beverly and I have been getting unusual reports. People behaving strangely, others hearing sounds that aren't there.
Are we talking about hallucinations?
In some cases. In others just erratic behaviour.
We can't track down any element that might be responsible.
But everything started when we found the Brittain?
Yes. Captain, we have to get the Enterprise away from here before it gets any worse.
We're preparing to take the Brittain in tow. We'll be on our way within the hour.
Ensign, manoeuvre us into tractor beam range.
Aye, sir.
Is there a problem, Ensign?
I can't seem to remember how to enter the coordinates, sir.
Ensign Lin.
Ready now, Captain.
Report to Sickbay, Ensign Rager.
Ready tractor beam, Mister Worf.
Captain, thrusters are losing power.
Impulse engines. Ahead, minimum power.
Impulse engines are not responding, sir.
Geordi, what's going on down there?
I don't know, sir. Nothing's responding.
Go to warp engines, factor one. Engage.
Captain
We don't have warp drive either.
We have no functional propulsion systems?
No, sir. Apparently we do not.
We're adrift.
Just like the Brittain.
Captain's log, stardate 44639.9. The Enterprise has now been adrift for a total of ten days. We have sent subspace distress calls, but because of our distant location, we cannot expect a response for at least another two weeks.
After analysing the sensor logs of the Brittain and the Enterprise, as well as the data from the last series of probes, I conclude that we have become trapped in a massive rupture in space, into which energy is absorbed.
You mean a Tyken's rift.
A what?
A rare anomaly named after Bela Tyken, the Melthusian captain who first encountered it.
Tyken's rift. That would explain why we don't have engine power.
The ship's energy is being drained into the fissure before we can utilise it.
I was detained.
When Tyken was trapped in the rift, his analysis determined that a massive energy release might overload and dislocate the anomaly. Fortunately, his cargo included anicium and yurium, which he used to detonate the explosion. He then escaped through the ruptured centre of the rift.
But we aren't carrying anything that could produce that kind of explosion. Not even our photon torpedoes would be enough.
Couldn't we replicate the elements that Tyken used?
No, sir. We no longer have the power to reproduce complex elements in the replicator. We must find a way to generate a violent energy release without using conventional means.
Data, in Tyken's experience did the crew exhibit behavioural changes?
No. There were no reports of unusual conduct among the crew.
What about nightmares?
There were no records of sleep disturbances of any kind, Counsellor.
Then, what is it? What's happening to us?
The only one who doesn't seem affected by all this is Data.
Bridge.
Number One, how?
Sir?
Any hallucinations, nightmares?
No. I'd be a liar if I said I felt like myself. I've had to bite my tongue to keep from snapping at people. A couple of times, I've gone to my quarters and felt as if there was someone in there, waiting for me.
I've had similar feelings. With everyone succumbing it's even more important that one of us attempt to keep control of his faculties. I want you to turn in, take a nap. I'll be on the Bridge. You can relieve me in four hours.
Yes, sir. Deck eight.
No!
Sir?
As you were. Mister Data, will you join me in my Ready room.
Commander La Forge and I have come up with a potential solution to our predicament. Perhaps the modifications used to increase firepower against the Borg could be effective here.
Channelling power to the main, er, deflector dish.
Yes, sir. I believe that within six hours we could generate a concentrated burst of energy which might disrupt the Tyken's rift.
Very well. Proceed. Mister Data?
Yes, sir?
It appears that I am not immune to the strange forces that are at work on this ship.
Yes, sir.
It's a terrifying prospect to lose control of one's mind. When I was young, I remember watching my grandfather deteriorate from a powerful, intelligent figure to a frail wisp of a man, who could barely make his own way home. Mister Data, it is my responsibility somehow to see that this ship is guided to safety. I will need to rely on you from now on. We may need to count on you for our very survival.
I will do my best, sir.
I'd like to do more cross-sections on the brain tissue of some of these bodies. Set up the positron emission sensor in Sickbay, and I'll decide which ones I want to study.
Yes, Doctor.
Go away.
Captain, let me ask you this. Since we located the Brittain, can you remember any of your dreams?
I hardly ever recall dreams.
Most people don't, but think. Have you even had a dream in the last ten days?
I don't recall.
I'm willing to bet you haven't. What's more, neither has anyone else on board this ship, except for Troi. I began to realise that when she talked about having nightmares. I've done some additional brain tissue tests on, er, bodies, some of the bodies from the, er, the.
The Brittain, Doctor.
Right. And I've also done some scans on a random cross-section from our crew. They both have the same results, a unique chemical imbalance.
Caused by?
Dream deprivation. Every night when we enter into sleep.
I believe the Doctor means is that humans enter what is known as REM sleep. Rapid eye movement. It is the level of brain wave activity at which one dreams.
We have to dream in order to survive. If we don't reach REM sleep, we don't dream, we begin to lose our cognitive abilities, we find it hard to concentrate. We forget how to do the most ordinary task. Then we become irritable, paranoid. Some people experience hallucinations.
You're describing the situation on this ship. But Counsellor Troi reported nightmares.
Maybe it's because she's Betazoid. I don't know why. All I know is there's more going on here than being caught in a Tyken's rift, and I don't know how or why it's happening. But I do know this. There is an inevitable conclusion to this pattern, and if I can't find a way to stop it, we will all go insane.
Eyes in the dark. One moon circles.
Where are you?
Eyes in the dark. One moon circles.
I'm still here. I haven't gone anywhere. Do you remember anything more?
Double. Double.
What does that mean? Is something doubled?
Deanna, nothing's working. I've tried somatic drugs, I've tried inducing theta waves into the entorhinal cortex. No matter what I do, no one can reach REM sleep. No one can dream, except for you.
Except me. And all I have is nightmares. I can hardly sleep at all anymore. In the end, I'll be like him. Just like him.
Well, I think it's some kind of experiment. You see, Captain Picard is trying to see how long we'll take it, stuck here like rats.
You couldn't be more wrong.
It's like we're laboratory animals. I don't want to sit and wait for death to sneak up behind me.
What's that supposed to mean?
You heard about them on the Brittain. Shut in their rooms, dying alone. That's not for me. I'd rather go out fighting.
Okay, all the power has been channelled to the, er, the
The main deflector dish.
Yes. Right. The deflector dish. So, what do we do now?
Data to Bridge. Mister Worf, activate the deflector.
Aye, sir.
Deflector power banks approaching maximum. Discharge in fifteen seconds.
Data, this detonation better work. We're not going to last much longer.
Discharge in three seconds, two, one.
Nothing. It just fizzled out.
Captain, it appears the energy output
Has been absorbed into the rift.
Data, can we try again?
No, sir. If we draw
More power, we risk losing life support systems.
Understood. Keep me appraised, Commander.
lujpu' jiH'e, Alexandrijn.
Worf, no!
You will not stop me.
Security to Lieutenant Worf's quarters, immediately.
No one can stop me.
Why? What is it?
I am no longer a warrior. I am no longer strong. I feel.
What? What do you feel?
I feel fear.
To admit that you're afraid gives you strength.
Something is waiting for us. I am not strong enough to fight it.
No, Worf. It's just an illusion. It's not real. Please, put down the knife.
Counsellor?
It's all right. Everything's fine, thank you.
Let me take you to Sickbay.
Acting Captain:Acting Captain's log, stardate 44642.1. I have assumed command of the Enterprise at the request of Captain Picard. Our situation is deteriorating. Many of the crew are unable to function and our life support systems are beginning to falter.
Once before you said double. What did you mean? What is double?
Mates, too bright. Twin. Cannot leave the twin. One moon circling.
What do you mean? you can't leave?
No, no, please. Can't.
You want to leave. Why can't you?
Can't go. Help. One moon circling. Eyes, that's it. Eyes in the dark.
Eyes in the dark. That's what the voice said in my dream. Is that where you heard it? In a dream? Over and over? Beverly, I know what it is. I know what's happening.
What?
My nightmare. It's not a dream. It's not a dream at all. It's a message.
REM sleep occurs at a different frequency for Betazoids than other humanoids. I believe the beings are using that frequency to communicate telepathically.
It is possible that this telepathic communication is creating interference in the REM sleep of other species. That would explain why the rest of our crew is not dreaming.
Counsellor, what are these beings trying to tell us?
They're calling for help. I think they're trapped just like we are. Eyes in the dark could mean this twin star system.
Your hypothesis is certainly plausible. There may be another ship on the other side of the fissure, where we cannot detect it.
Is there a way we could block their signals?
There is no technology to block telepathic transmissions, Doctor.
Maybe communication through dreams can work both ways. I could try to get them to stop.
Perhaps we can accomplish more than that. If there is another ship, and we can reach them, we might be able to coordinate our efforts to free ourselves.
It is conceivable. When working with patients with debilitating nightmares, I've often used a therapeutic treatment called directed dreaming. Dreamers can learn to control of their dreams, retain a conscious memory even while in REM sleep. I could remember a short message and deliver it to them.
If it were possible, what would you say?
Working together with the aliens, we must discover a means by which we an produce an explosion more intense than either one of us could achieve alone.
What is it you're looking for?
These are the elements we have available. Some of them could be used in the creation of an explosive reaction. If we could communicate this inventory to the other ship, perhaps they would be able to
No, Data, no. This is too complex. This has to be a simple, clear message.
I am uncertain if a simple transmission will be adequate.
Stop. Go back. Further back. There. Stop. One moon circles.
Yes, Counsellor. One electron circles one proton. This is a hydrogen atom.
One moon circles. That's what they've been telling me over and over.
Perhaps the aliens are thinking as we are, to collaborate in producing an explosion. If hydrogen is combined with another element, calendenium for example, it is extremely volatile. But would the message mean they have hydrogen or they want hydrogen?
Well, if it's a distress call, I think they'd be asking for what they need, not what they already have.
Then the proper course of action would be to release hydrogen into the rift, and hope that they have a substance that will detonate it.
How do I tell them what to do?
If you are correct, Counsellor, I believe they have already told us what to do and are waiting for us to do it. When we are ready, the only message you should attempt to convey is, now.
I can help keep you in REM sleep for a while with this cortical scanner. It will maintain electrical activity in your brain at the proper frequency.
Counsellor
You will have to communicate with the other ship within two minutes of entering REM sleep.
Two minutes.
Is that all, Data?
Unfortunately, yes.
We have only enough power to emit a hydrogen stream for that amount of time. They must understand that they will have to detonate it immediately. Captain, we are ready to implement the plan.
Proceed.
We will have to draw power from the life-support systems in order to discharge the collectors. This is Acting Captain Data. All personnel will report to designated shelter areas
Immediately. Life support systems will continue only in emergency shelter areas.
Hear that? Get us jammed into shelter areas. We sit and wait to die. Nobody'll ever find us.
Relax, Gillespie. Everybody relax. Ten Forward is a designated shelter area. Relax.
Do we want to die here like helpless children?
Security to Ten Forward immediately.
We don't even know what we're dying for.
O'BRIEN:Sit down, Gillespie. You're not helping matters any.
What's wrong with standing up for ourselves?
Picard owes us some answers.
What is that?
It's a little souvenir I picked up on Magus Three. That was setting number one. Anyone want to see setting number two?
PGO signals steady. Visual cortex showing increased activity. Rapid eye movements commencing. Crusher to Bridge.
She's in REM sleep.
Thank you, Doctor. Activating Bussard collectors.
Where are you?
Ninety seconds remaining.
One moon circles.
Where are you? I have to find you. I have to tell you.
Forty five seconds remaining.
One moon.
Please, I must find you to tell you.
Thirty seconds remaining.
Eyes in the dark. One moon
Ten seconds remaining.
Nothing. No explosion.
The Counsellor was unsuccessful.
Activate impulse engines.
Engines activated, sir.
We have cleared the rift, sir. Warp engines are coming back online.
Set a course to.
Setting a course for Starbase two twenty. Sir, as my final duty as Acting Captain, I order you to bed. I shall do the same for all personnel.
Very well, Mister Data. And Mister Data, thank you.
Pleasant dreams, sir.
This just came in for you from Starfleet
Testing parameters?
Do not be apprehensive. Wes. I found the Academy examinations quite elementary.
You would.
Your earlier test results were good enough to get you Academy credit for your work here. I don't think you have anything to worry about.
Those Academy cadets can be extremely competitive.
But you have the practical experience, Wes.
Commander Riker is correct. While the information imparted to cadets at the Academy is unquestionably vital for prospective Starfleet officers, it nevertheless requires a significant period of supplementary systems training and situational disciplines.
Didn't I just say that?
Yes, sir, but not quite as perspicuously.
I will not have you telling me what course to set.
As Chief Medical Officer, I am ordering you to report to Starbase Five One Five immediately.
Oh, please. I feel fine.
The truth is, you've ignored this far too long.
This ship has a mission to carry out.
An astronomical survey to be conducted by the science officers, I believe.
And I 'was looking forward to seeing the Epsilon Pulsar Cluster for myself.
Then we'll perform the procedure right here.
Absolutely not.
My staff and I are fully capable of giving you the replacement.
That's not the point. It would be  It would be inappropriate for you to carry out the procedure.
Captain Picard, I had no idea. You do have an ego, don't you?
Meaning?
You're concerned about your image. Don't worry. If you get yourself down to Starbase Five One Five, your image will be safe with me.
Captain, excuse me.
Ensign. I understand you're leaving for Starbase Five One Five.
Yes, sir. I was just going to shuttlebay two.
Good. I have business there. I shall accompany you.
You will? I mean, yes sir.
Prepare the shuttle for immediate departure.
Aye, sir.
Something I can take care of for you on Starbase Five One Five?
Hardly, Number One.
But you'll miss the Epsilon Pulsar survey.
I'm well aware of that fact. You have the Bridge. Carry on.
Come. Yes, what is it, Number One?
Is something wrong? This trip to Starbase Five One Five is rather unexpected.
Ensign Crusher and I will rendezvous with you on your return from the Epsilon Pulsar Cluster.
Forgive my saying so, sir, but you're being rather enigmatic.
Consider it Captain's privilege.
As First Officer, I have complete security clearance.
This has nothing to do with ship's business, Number One. Suffice it to say, it is strictly a matter of image.
Relax, Wes. You'll do fine on your exams.
Yeah.
It's not my exams I'm worried about. It's Captain Picard.
Why? He's not taking the exams.
It's just the two of us, in a shuttlecraft for six hours. What am I going to talk to Captain Picard about for six hours?
Archaeology, semantics, literature, art. You could learn a lot from Captain Picard.
Ah, Captain Picard. Nice day for a little trip.
Shuttle number two is ready for departure.
The Enterprise is at impulse speed. You are cleared for take off.
Data, wasn't the Captain looking forward to this mission to the Epsilon Pulsar Cluster?
So he said.
Then what would make him change his mind? Why would he leave the ship now?
Commander, receiving a mayday on all frequencies.
Source?
Rhomboid Dronegar Sector zero zero six
Detail?
Ship. Unidentified. Distress. Nothing more.
Set course for Rhomboid Dronegar zero zero six, warp seven.
Sir, Rhomboid Dronegar sector would put us at considerable distance from Captain Picard.
I know, Data. I know.
Entering Rhomboid Dronegar Sector zero zero six.
I have a ship on target path.
Slow to impulse speed.
Aye, sir.
Viewer.
Deploy shields, sir?
Hold fast. Data?
Basic early design. Capable of sub-light travel only.
Sir, we are being hailed.
On screen.
I am First Officer William Riker of the USS Enterprise. We're responding to your distress signal.
What is your problem?
We are far from home.
Aren't we all. But you sent out a Mayday?
Do you need help?
We are Pakleds. Our ship is the Mondor. It is broken.
We are far from home. We need help.
Let me guess. Their rubber band broke, right?
Sensors indicate engineering problems. They're experiencing total guidance system failure, with less than twenty four hours' reserve power.
Maybe I can help.
What brings you so far from home?
We look for things.
What were you looking for?
Things we need.
Can you be more specific?
Things that make us go. We need help.
What is the nature of your mission?
We look for things.
Did you hear an echo?
Commander, from the looks of their ship, I could have them up and running in no time.
You sure?
Yeah, no problem.
Very well. Our Chief Engineer will beam over to help you. Close.
Commander? Do we truly need to send our Chief Engineer over to them?
Obviously they need our help.
Why do we not simply give them the information they need to make their own repairs?
Do you honestly get the impression they could handle our technical specifications?
We do not know anything about them.
Acknowledged, Mister Worf. We have an obligation to render aid. Report to the transporter Room with all necessary gear.
Aye, sir.
We need more information.
Do you have anything else on them?
They are a relatively benign species.
Don't they seem a little slow?
They may merely have poorly developed language skills.
What about weapons?
Scanners shows limited armaments.
I think we can relax, Mister Worf. They can't even move their ship without our help. We certainly have them outmanned and outgunned.
ETA thirteen thirty hours, sir. It's not exactly warp speed.
More like a late twenty-second century interplanetary journey.
Sir?
You should read more history, Ensign.
Yes, sir.
Complete waste of time.
Pardon?
I shouldn't be taking this trip at all. I should be back on board the Enterprise.
Why are you coming with me to Starbase Five One Five, sir?
Well, it's certainly not my idea. I'm sorry, Ensign, I didn't mean to take it out on you. I just hate the prospect of another damned cardiac replacement.
Cardiac replacement? I didn't know.
Well, now you do.
A parthenogenetic implant?
What else would it be? My heart was injured and a replacement was necessary. That would have been it, except that the replacement is faulty.
Why would anyone use a faulty replacement?
Just pilot the shuttle, Ensign.
Whoa, whoa, wait a minute, it's okay. I'm here to help.
We are far from home.
Who's in charge of Engineering?
My friend. His name is Reginod.
Think I could meet him?
He is Reginod.
Yes, I think you mentioned that.
We look for things.
So I've heard.
Can you make our ship go?
Yes, I think so.
We look for things to make us go.
Fellas, why don't you show me where your guidance system is, okay? Excuse me.
He is smart.
Commander? Lieutenant La Forge is on an alien ship?
Yes. We're rendering assistance to some curious throwbacks.
How they ever mastered the rudiments of space travel is a genuine curiosity.
Commander. Those aliens. What they feel is not helplessness. Lieutenant La Forge is in great danger! He's in danger, great danger.
Can you be more specific, Counsellor?
It's not our help they want.
Well, our help is all they're going to get. They can't force us into anything, can they?
You think they're weak.
Look at them. They're certainly not Jarada or Romulans.
Our Betazoid Counsellor is often aware of things beyond our perceptive abilities.
Van Doren's technique has been perfected to two point four percent.
Sir?
The cardiac replacement procedure. It has a very low mortality rate. Two point four percent.
Those are pretty good odds.
Just not overly thrilled at the prospect of having my innards becoming the subject of Starfleet gossip.
Of course not, sir. Why didn't you just have Doctor Pulaski perform the operation? I'm sure you could've trusted her to keep it quiet.
Let's say I have personal reasons and leave it at that, shall we?
The power needs to be rerouted through this venturi chamber before it can be channelled to the engine's coils.
It is broken.
Yeah, but not for long. See, we are going to reconfigure these separators, here and over here.
Lieutenant La Forge, this is Commander Riker. Come in.
Yes, Commander. Go ahead.
Are you all right?
Sure. Why do you ask?
Counsellor Troi has expressed misgivings about your absence from the Enterprise.
I don't think there's anything to worry about.
Understood. As soon as you complete the repairs, I want you back here.
Yes, sir, I should be done here momentarily.
You see? Like that.  There. Your guidance is now up and running.
Main power failure?
Will our ship go now?
Your guidance is operational, but you're not going anywhere, not with a main power failure.
It is broken.
Can you make it go?
Commander Riker?
I have a problem.
On screen.
It looks like this is going to take a little bit longer than I anticipated.
I guess you would have preferred Commander Riker as a travelling companion.
What?
It's okay. You're not too comfortable with me. I understand.
Ensign. Wesley, that's not true. You're a fine young man.
You don't have to say that, sir. It's pretty obvious how you feel.
Is it? How so?
Everyone knows. You don't like kids. That's too bad. You'd have made a good father.
Thank you.
Didn't you ever wish you had kids of your own?
Wishing for a thing does not make it so.
We send him over there for one set of repairs, now they need him for more.
Apparently, their ship is apparently quite fragile.
This is Riker on the Enterprise.
Almost got it, Commander.
We look for things.
Apparently your ship is in need of more than minor repair.
Things to make it go.
We will use our tractor beam to tow you to the nearest base.
He can make it go.
Yes, but we need our Chief Engineer back on board our ship.
He is smart.
All done, Commander.
Prepare to beam over.
Yes, sir.
You are good.
We aim to please.
We need you.
I'm flattered. Look, fellas, I hate to repair and run, but if you'll excuse me. One to beam aboard.
Hey! Don't!
Transporter room, beam La Forge back immediately.
Aye negative response, sir.
Try again!
Negative response!
The Pakled ship has a shield up, sir.
A shield? What kind?
It appears to be beyond their technology. Similar to Romulan shields.
Do not interfere with our transporter beam. Drop your shields.
Status?
Viewer transmission terminated and blocked.
Hail on all frequencies.
Running frequency search. Negative, sir.
They're ignoring us.
Apparently so.
Shields up.
Shields up.
Sensors at maximum sensitivity.
Sensors at maximum.
Phasers ready, sir.
Would you care for some coffee, Ensign?
No, thank you, sir.
How about a sandwich?
I don't think so, sir.
Oh, come on, it's been hours. You must be hungry.
Thank you, sir.
Here.
Were you ever married?
Never had the time.
Don't you ever get lonely?
For ambitious Starfleet officers, there are certain costs involved. One must be cautious of long-term commitments, Wesley.
No problem. Where women are concerned, I am in complete control.
Really? I always rather had to work at that.
Have you always been so disciplined?
Good Lord, no. If I was, I wouldn't have this problem.
I don't understand.
Well, I was a young Starfleet officer, not many years older than you are now. Top of my Academy Class. Green as hell. And oh, so cocky. Too cocky, as it turned out.
What happened?
Several friends and I were on leave at Farspace Starbase Earhart. It was little more than a galactic outpost in those days.
Was this before the Klingons joined the Federation?
That's right. Well, my mates and I were at the Bonestell Recreation Facility, which was something of a dead rough crossroads at the time, filled with an assorted bunch of galactic riffraff. When a trio of Nausicaans came in, they were clearly spoiling for a confrontation with a group of fresh-faced Starfleet officers such as ourselves. Well, everyone in the group had the good sense to give these Nausicaans a wide berth, to stand off. Everyone, that is, except me. I stood toe to toe with the worst of the three, and I told himwhat I thought of him, his pals, his planet, and I possibly made some passing reference to his questionable parentage. And the next thing I knew, all three of them were on me and I was fighting for my life. I was actually doing quite well for a while, too.
You fought them? And won?
I had this one Nausicaan down in this somewhat devious joint-lock when, unbeknownst to me, one of his chums drew his weapon and impaled me through the back. Curious sensation, actually. Not much pain. Shock, certainly, at the sight of serrated metal sticking through my chest. A certain giddy warmth. In fact I do actually remember that I laughed out loud. Well, it pierced my heart, of course. Well, if we'd not been so near to a medical facility, I would surely have died.
Really? Then what happened?
Nothing. I was no hero, Wesley. I was an undisciplined, loud-mouthed, opinionated young man who was way out of his league. I learned a very hard, very painful lesson that day, but I learned it well. I hope you never have to learn it the same way. Care for another sandwich?
Please.
Come on, Data.
I am programming the comm. system to scan the interference patterns, but a full analysis will take time.
You be careful with that thing.
You want to hurt us.
What? I came here to help you.
We can make more.
Make more weapons.
Wait a minute. You have a replicator?
It is not broken.
I didn't come here to give you weapons.
You will make more.
Commander, a photon torpedo may penetrate their shield.
Any hostile move on our part could jeopardise Geordi.
Agreed. But what do the Pakleds want?
Counsellor?
They have what they want. For now.
We're approaching Starbase Five One Five, sir.
At last. Did you read that book I gave you?
Some of it.
That's reassuring.
I just don't have much time.
There is no greater challenge than the study of philosophy.
But William James won't be in my Starfleet exams.
The important things never will be. Anyone can be trained in the mechanics of piloting a starship.
But Starfleet Academy
It takes more. Open your mind to the past. Art, history, philosophy. And all this may mean something.
It's all deception. Nothing the Pakleds have said or done has been sincere.
Intensified scan shows their guidance system to be perfectly intact, as is their power generator.
Then what was Geordi repairing?
Apparently, the putative malfunctions were carefully programmed into their ship's computer.
I didn't think the Pakleds had that kind of technology.
They seem to have made some technological leaps forward, Commander.
Why would they go through the charade of needing our help?
For the sole purpose of making Lieutenant La Forge their prisoner.
Captain's personal log, stardate 42779.5. We have arrived at Starbase Five One Five. I'm still quite uneasy, despite assurances that this medical procedure poses little risk.
I hope you won't be late for your exams.
I still have some time, sir.
Why do I get the distinct impression you're acting like some kind of escort?
Doctor Pulaski asked me to make sure you actually went inside.
That woman. She would.
Sir?
Yes, what is it, Ensign?
I enjoyed our trip together, sir.
So did I.
They are initiating visual contact, sir.
Maybe now we'll find out what they really want.
Enterprise.
We demand that you return our crewmember immediately.
Request denied.
Lower your shield!
Request denied.
Stop it! What do you want?
You think we are not smart.
I think you need to continue to develop.
We are smart.
Prove it. Return our man to us.
You want him?
Yes, damn it.
Good. We want all computer information from your ship. Now.
We've got a man held hostage by alien forces and all I have are no-option options. I need some input.
Is Geordi all right?
He's already been hit by multiple phaser stuns.
He could need medical attention.
Security team stands ready to take the initiative, sir.
Data?
Our options have not changed. We can either respond to the Pakled demand or not. We can either use force or not.
Allowing them access to our computer is a complete breech of Starfleet security.
Then force it must be.
Don't worry about a thing, Captain. We've done this a hundred times, and we're ready when you are.
Just get on with it, Doctor. I've got work to do.
Activate Sterile Field. Neural callipers.
This will be a secondary cardiac procedure with mid-line entry and excision of the early model unit. I anticipate no complications, as the patient has had positive primary results and exhibits extraordinary physical condition. We'll all be home in time for dinner. Tissue mitigator.
There's limited information available on Pakled culture, but the eclectic range of their equipment suggests their technology was borrowed from others.
And now they have become militant.
So it would seem.
Rationale?
They are unwilling to wait for the timely evolution of their species' intellectual capacity. They want instant knowledge, instant power and gratification.
The more they get, the more they want.
And the more aggressive and dangerous they become. I think it's time we set some limits.
To what effect, sir? We are faced with an impossible conundrum.
Suppose we turn their impatience and greed against them?
But how?
Perhaps Geordi should give them something they want. Something important. Then we simply create the right moment for him to take it away, and get him the hell out of there.
Would you be suggesting a ruse of some sort?
I would.
But what if we fail? What'll happen to Geordi then?
We have no other choice. We have to try.
There's been some capillary reaction here. Let's proceed carefully. We'll need sharper focus on the thoracic polychromatics and verification of myocardial enzyme balance.
Let me talk to them. I'll get you their computer banks.
We want to be smart.
So open the hailing frequency. They'll listen to me.
We are smart.
We need their computer things.
Yes. Yes.
Hey, let me talk to him. I'll get you their computer banks.
We want to be smart.
So open the hailing frequency. They'll listen to me.
We are smart.
We need their computer things.
Yes. Yes.
Commander Riker?
Yes, Lieutenant, we're here.
The Pakleds seem pretty sincere.
We want what we want.
Our computer banks are non-negotiable.
We want them.
Believe me, they're nothing if not persistent.
We want to be nothing if not persistent.
Nobody ever said they were great conversationalists.
Where did they get their shields?
Yes. We like shields.
Well, from what I've seen, half the systems on this ship have been stolen from Romulans, Klingons, Jarada, just about anybody they've ever came in contact with.
We like to be smart.
Confirmed, Lieutenant La Forge. They steal technology.
But they lack the ability to use it properly.
You're an excellent Chief Engineer, Lieutenant La Forge.
Thank you, sir.
And of course your knowledge of phaser and photon weaponry is unmatched.
That's nice of you to say, sir, but really Lieutenant Worf
Our missions are always inherently dangerous, and any of us could be called upon to make the ultimate sacrifice at any time.
Yes, sir, but
Speaking of time. This may be your time. I shall personally miss you.
Goodbye, Geordi. I shall miss you at weapons systems analysis.
And I guess you'll just have to arm your photon torpedo countdowns without me.
As well as our hydrogen collectors. Fond farewell.
He knows about weapons.
You can make us strong.
It's not something I really like to talk about.
Any classified weapons knowledge you share with your captors will be considered treason.
But I may have no choice.
You will die without honour.
Thanks a lot, Worf.
You will never attain the twenty fourth level of awareness.
Twenty-four? That's quite a challenge.
Indeed. Twenty four is the gateway to heroic salvation.
Do you think he understands?
He'd better.
He's afraid.
We all are, Counsellor.
You are smart.
Not smart enough. I'm still here.
Make us strong.
I thought you wanted me to help you go. Why don't we work on that guidance system, okay?
Make us strong, or die.
It's not working. Something's wrong. The metabolation occlusions aren't holding. Damn it! I can't stop the heterocyclic declination. Fuse.
Again! We need a biomolecular physiologist in here. This man is dying.
Right away, sir.
You've got to be kidding.
Make us strong.
Come on. There's not enough juice in these to blow up a passing asteroid.
Do it. Make us strong.
I suppose we could increase the anti-matter charges.
Yes. We like power.
Yeah.
Do not try to trick us. We can tell.
Metabolation?
Negative.
Heterocyclics?
Failing. And capillary integrity too unpredictable to attempt a resect.
You're unwilling to make the attempt??
I'm not qualified.
I know someone who is.
Are you sure he can do it, sir? Geordi's an engineer, not a weapons specialist.
If anyone can improvise, it's Geordi.
What makes you think the Pakleds even have that kind of gear on board?
Ongoing scanning indicates progressive weapons potential. The timing will be crucial. Geordi must correctly interpret our intentions.
Geordi's up to speed. I trust his instincts.
The Pakleds did hear our little fiction about Geordi's weapons knowledge.
Exactly. And since they equate intelligence with strength, they won't pass up the chance to use that knowledge. Can you do it?
Count on it.
Bridge to Commander Riker!
Go ahead, Bridge.
I am receiving an emergency summons from Starbase Five One Five. Captain Picard
Is close to death.
Be ready.
We are strong.
You're now armed to the teeth.
Teeth are for chewing.
You have photon torpedo. You are strong.
We are strong. We have power.
Positive indication of armed photon torpedoes, Commander.
Geordi did it.
Starbase requests we proceed to base at warp nine
We've got to go.
Yes. the Captain needs our help.
We can't leave Geordi behind. I want the Pakleds on that screen and I want them now.
Forced spectrum communications are spotty at best, sir.
Do it.
This is the Enterprise. Return our personnel or face immediate reprisal.
We are strong now. We have better weapons.
Are you prepared to use them?
We are a force now. We will have respect. Power.
We don't have time for this. You want power? Here's power. Riker to Ensign Gomez.
Ready, Commander Riker.
Prepare firing sequencing.
Start firing countdown from twenty four.
I can't believe it! My friends, my people, they're trying to kill us! Kill me!
Believe it. They are violent.
Okay, they want to play rough, that's fine with me. Just let me check something.
Good. He is on our side now.
Begin firing sequence.
Twenty four, twenty three
Twenty two. twenty one, twenty
Firing sequence proceeding, sir.
Hold fast.
Eighteen, seventeen
Sixteen, fifteen
Don't do anything yet.
Fourteen, thirteen.
What are you doing?
Making sure your systems are operative.
We will attack. We are strong.
Nine, eight, seven, six, five
We should attack now.
Just another second. We can't afford a mis-fire here.
Two, one.
Hurry.
Fire.
Now!
No! Too late!
We have fired! They will be destroyed.
They used their crimson force field.
It did not shoot.
No, the crimson force field has disarmed us.
They are smart.
We are not strong.
Drop your shields.
Allow us transport Lieutenant La Forge immediately.
Shields are down.
Transporter room, beam one to the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
Set heading for Starbase Five One Five, warp nine.
Blowing that hydrogen exhaust through the Bussard collectors sure put on a nice light show.
Harmless, but effective. Were you able disable the photons?
Just in time. That's why you're still here.
Deactivating neural callipers.
What the hell are you doing here?
Saving your life.
Oh, come on. This is a routine procedure. Quite commonplace.
True. But you are not a commonplace man. You'll be out of recovery in four hours.
I didn't want you involved in this.
You're welcome.
If you're here, the entire crew must know.
You're still the Captain. Invincible.
Thank you.
I beg your pardon?
Looks like things are back to normal.
I'm pleased to report that Ensign Crusher's Starfleet exam results permit him to continue his studies on board the Enterprise. Furthermore, any rumours of my brush with death are greatly exaggerated. Is that clear?
Yes, sir.
Then, Ensign Crusher, set course for the Epsilon Sector, warp five. Engage.
I have long been interested in the notion of time travellers. In fact, I wrote a book about it. It chronicles the tale of a man of our era who fouled the sixth century by introducing newfangled gadgets and weapons all in the name of progress. This idea of time travel is not so far fetched as it might seem. In fact, I have learned that, even now, there are people from the future right here in San Francisco and I have no doubt that their intent is to foul our world just as my Yankee did in King Arthur's time. Well, sir, let me serve notice. As soon as I have the necessary evidence, I intend to expose them and make it absolutely clear that they are not welcome here.
Yes, sir. And will this be a sequel to Connecticut Yankee, Mister Twain?
The name's Clemens, son. Sam Clemens. That's with an e.
With an e. Got it.
Excuse me.
The coroner said this is where they kept all the cholera victims.
It doesn't make sense that so many people are dying of cholera. It just isn't that virulent. Will, this is strange.
What is it?
The cerebellum, the cerebral cortex, the brain stem, the entire nervous system has been depleted of electrochemical energy. Here's another one. Same neural depletion. These people did not die of cholera. They died because their neural energy was drained somehow.
Drained and taken to Devidia Two for those aliens to ingest? If you were a time traveller with a taste for human neural energy where would you get your supply?
I would travel back to a time when there were plagues and epidemics, so I could murder and use disease as a cover.
Over half the victims whose neural energy had been drained came from the Sisters of Hope Infirmary.
A charity hospital near the waterfront.
If the aliens have been killing people there, well, someone might have noticed something unusual.
And if they're moving among humans, they must have taken on human form. But the question is, how do we know who we're looking for?
The tricorder indicated triolic activity from most of the bodies we looked at. If the aliens left that sort of signature, they'll be detectable.
You know, we might even be able to rig some kind of alien alarm system.
Any luck contacting Data?
None. The tricorder's broadcasting random emissions on all frequencies his sub-processors might pick up, but the range is limited. Almost anything could interfere.
She's back.
Mister Pikerd!
Yes, Mrs. Carmichael.
Mister Pikerd. I'll be reminding you that it's one o'clock.
Yes.
One o'clock on a Thursday. I'm sure I made it clear to you that the rent is always due, payable in full, by one o'clock on Wednesdays.
Ah, yes, er, the rent. Mrs. Carmichael, even now my troupe are in rehearsals for a new production.
Oh? I haven't heard of any new production. What play is it?
The play? A Midsummer Night's Dream. We have performed in London, Paris, Milan. Milan. To sold out houses. I assure you, you will have the rent, in full, with a bonus.
Oh, no, no, no, no. I've heard you silver-tongued devils before. I'll have the rent in full tomorrow by one o'clock or you'll be out performing on the street.
I wouldn't do this for just anybody, Mister Clemens. And I hope you won't spread it around that I let you in. People start talking.
Of course not, Jack. And I assure you that Mister Data would be most upset if you didn't. If I can't find that Letter of Intent that he left me, our major investor is going to pull out and take his business elsewhere.
It has to do with Mister Data's engine, doesn't it?
Engine?
Yes.
Oh, yes. Yes, this is exactly what it's all about. Ow!
You know, Mister Clemens, I'm going to do you another favour today. You're always looking for good stories, right? Well, I've got a real humdinger for you. The story of my life. Now, I know you may think I'm young, but I've covered a lot of ground and if I do say so myself, it'd make for some pretty fascinating reading. So, what do you think?
About what?
About writing my life story. You and me. Literary partners, of course.
Young man, I have a maxim that I have always lived by. No one is more qualified to write your story than you are.
Me? Be a writer? You think I could do that?
As long as you write what you know. You got any passions, boy? Any dreams?
I'd like to do some travelling, maybe go to sea. And Alaska. I've had the strangest notion to go see Alaska.
That's a great idea, son. That's exactly what I would do if I were your age. Alaska, the Klondike, the Aurora Borealis. That's it. Follow your dreams and write about 'em.
Thank you, Mister Clemens. You know, that is exactly what I'm going to do.
You do that, son.
You'll see my name in print, too.
I'm sure I will.
Don't forget. The name's London. Jack London.
Goodbye now. Bye-bye.
I found the Head Surveyor, I found the cavern. You will not be able to get to it. The entrance is on a mine shaft that is the middle of the Presidio on an army base.
Perhaps you could arrange for us to get in.
How?
With permission to dig for the mine shaft.
Oh, no, Data. I've done everything you've asked
I have full confidence in your persuasive abilities.
Well, I suppose it's more interesting than throwing a tea dance.
Strange. The transceiver assembly has been removed. Without it I will be unable to track the time shifts.
Twain.
Clemens?
Yes. He's been driving me crazy. He watches the house, he follows me down the street asking me questions. If anyone took this you can believe it was him.
If you are correct, he must be warned. The device has been modified in such a way that prolonged contact with human tissue would be highly toxic.
Madame Guinan. Mister Data.
Shame on you, Mister Clemens. Shame.
Shame, madam? I think not. I find no shame in my efforts to uncover your plot.
I keep telling you, there is no plot.
Yes, you do keep telling me that. What an interesting pair you are. Where in Switzerland did you say you were from, Mister Data?
I am French, sir, not Swiss.
Oh yes, that's right, now I remember. A Frenchman with a talent for poker, from what I hear. You know, I was talking to a friend of mine, Ches Whitley. He says to say hello and wonders when you're coming back.
I do not believe I know Mister Whitley.
No? He works at the County Assayer's office. He says you've been in there a number of times claiming to be a geological engineer and wanting information about mining operations during the 1850's. You remember him now?
I am unfamiliar with the gentleman's name. I have spoken to several people at that office.
Yes, I know. And in the Hall of Records, and in the Geological Society, and a little-known mineral shop in Chinatown. You do get around, don't you?
As apparently you do, Mister Clemens.
I must admit you've got me mystified. This contraption, for instance. It's very unusual. It looks quite futuristic. Tell me, might it have something to do with time shifts?
In a sense. The time shift is a gearing system I have invented for the horseless carriage.
Do not insult me. You have come here to this century and brought your infernal technology with you for God only knows what purpose, but I have no doubt it will be the people of this century who will suffer for it.
My dear Mister Clemens, I do think we've heard enough. Mister Data's business is his own, and I will thank you to leave now.
Pardon me, Madam Guinan, but it is my business too. It is the business of all humanity, I believe, to stop both of you from whatever it is you are doing here. And that is what I intend to do.
Just what are you doing with those lamps?
Replacing the burners. City ordinance. Makes it safer in case of earthquake.
There hasn't been an earthquake here in thirty years.
Well, that's takes care of this ward. Time to be moving on.
Earthquakes. Nurse.  If you can handle things here, I've got a meeting with the Board of Patrons.
I'll try to manage.
There, by that bed. I can see an afterimage of triolic waves. They've been here recently. I'd say within the last twenty four hours.
That's the bed where the man died last night.
This man was complaining about a strange doctor and nurse who visited that patient. Perhaps they're still in the hospital.
Here. This'll make you more comfortable.
Do you need any help, Doctor? Doctor Apollinaire felt he had entered the algid stage. He was cyanotic, pulse unobservable. That's an interesting cane.
Doctor!
Stand aside, stand aside. Let me in here. People said there was gunfire in here. What's going on?
Just a little misunderstanding. I was just clearing these people out of here.
I haven't seen you before.
I was just assigned here this morning. I was working downtown.
I worked downtown for three years. I don't remember you.
We'll be on our way.
No, wait. Wait. I'm going to ask all of you to come down to the station for questioning. Including you. Where'd you get that? That's a gentleman's cane. Never seen a cane like this before. I'll have to confiscate it for evidence.
I just want you to know that I have the utmost respect for the law.
Let's go.
Data!
Boy, are we glad to see you.
I suggest we postpone our greetings for another occasion.
Agreed. Get us out of here.
If we tune a phaser to the approximate frequency of triolic waves and lay down a field burst, it might respond.
The ophidian the aliens were carrying.
What the?
These look like minute distortions in the space-time continuum, like the one we saw on Devidia Two.
They were so small, and they lasted only a second.
The aliens appear to be able to concentrate the distortion and direct it to a specific time and place.
Maybe they have something, a mechanism that focuses it.
Any device like that would produce significant levels of triolic waves. Like the ones in the cavern where Data's head was found.
I have located that cavern.
Mister Pikerd! I know you're in there. Open the door!
Mrs. Carmichael.
How now, spirit. Whither wander you?
Over hill, over dale, thorough bush, thorough brier,
Mrs. Carmichael, thank goodness you're here.
We need someone to read a part. You're just in time.
Mister Picard, I need to be talking to you.
My mistress would that he be gone.
Ill met by moonlight, proud Titania.
Now, Mrs. Carmichael Right there.
Ill met by moonlight, proud Titania.
What, jealous Oberon. Fairies skip hence. I have foresworn his bed and company.
Well, I don't think I need to hear any more. That was truly unique.
Really?
Ladies and gentlemen, I think we have found our Titania. Don't you agree?
Well, I did do a church play when I was a lass.
Well, there you are. We start rehearsals tomorrow.
You're back. I have wonderful news. I've found a way to get into the Presidio and into the mine shaft.
It is all right.
Do you know me?
Very well.
Do I know you?
Not yet. But you will.
Thanks for your help, officer.
Now, be sure you put in the part about me spotting that phony policeman.
Yes, sir.
Hello, son.
Mister Clemens. What brings you here?
Writer's curiosity. I heard that two people vanished into thin air in this Infirmary.
One of the patients said that, yes, sir, but the police deny it.
I bet they do.
They say a band of outlaws set off an explosion in the hospital and then escaped.
Well, what did these outlaws look like?
The carriage they escaped in was driven by an albino.
Oh. Mister Data.
You know him?
You bet I do. You say there were others with him?
Yes, at least a dozen.
His accomplices. They've come from the future. My God, it's an invasion.
An invasion from the future? Mister Clemens, what can you tell me about this? Do you have any proof?
When's your deadline, boy?
Five o'clock, sir.
I'll meet you at your paper at four thirty with a story that will make your career.
Thanks, Mister Clemens
Take me to the Presidio, driver, and don't spare the whip.
The triolic levels are as high as they were on Devidia Two. There's no indication of a control mechanism.
I'm not so sure. My visor is picking up crystalline fractures. These cavern walls have undergone some kind of selective molecular polarisation. In fact, if I'm right this whole cavern has been configured to focus the space-time distortion. Just like a lens. Captain, we think we might be on to something. The cavern itself seems to be acting as a focusing mechanism. I'm willing to bet it's the same at their habitat back on Devidia Two.
If we can get back there and destroy that site, it might put an end to their time travelling.
We have the ophidian.
Truthfully, I don't know that we can get back. The aliens use triolic energy as a power source. The energy our phasers generates might not be entirely compatible.
We have no choice but to try.
An event I would most certainly enjoy witnessing. However, I will regretfully waive that opportunity for the privilege of taking you all in to the authorities.
Mister Clemens, it is imperative that we continue our mission.
Mister Data, I have listened to your stories and your excuses and your evasions, and I will listen no longer. It is my moral duty to protect mankind from whatever devious plan you have in mind. Now, move along. I suspect that even time travellers are vulnerable to the Colt forty five. Now, let's go. I made a young fellow a promise and I don't want to be late.
Follow him!
Is everybody all right?
I think so.
You!
Where are we? And when?
This is the twenty fourth century, we're on Devidia Two, and you're not supposed to be here.
Well it seems to me I have as much right to be in your time as you had to be in mine. I wanted to see how you've conducted my future affairs.
Your future affairs?
The affairs of mankind.
But the disappearance of Mark Twain, one of the most noted literary figures of the nineteenth century
Thank you.
That's not supposed to happen.
I only took advantage of an irresistible opportunity, as any good writer would.
Bridge to Away team. Acknowledge.
We're here, Mister Worf. Stand by to transport five.
Commander.
Mister Worf?
Yes, Commander.
Make that six to transport.
Where are we now?
The Federation Starship Enterprise. Ensign, call security. I want an escort for this man.
Security? What for? Are you afraid I'm going to go around stealing things?
A werewolf!
It's a long story, Mister Worf. I'll brief you later.
Let's have Data's body taken to the science lab. I'll try and re-attach the head we have.
Geordi, that head is over five hundred years old.
Yeah, but it's the best chance we've got.
I want Mister Clemens kept under escort at all times.
Commander, perhaps I could handle that. I'd be happy to take Mister Clemens to his quarters.
Good idea. If you would accompany the Counsellor.
Madam, I'd be delighted. So, this is a space ship? You ever run into Halley's comet?
Gently. Don't sit up too quickly.
Where'd everybody go?
I hope they're all safely back on the Enterprise by now.
But you're still here.
You were hurt. I had to make sure you were all right.
And so you stayed for that?
I didn't want anything to happen to you. You're far too important to me.
You know an awful lot about me.
Believe me, in the future the tables will be turned.
So we become friends?
It goes far beyond friendship.
Oh, but I'll have to wait almost five hundred years, and when we meet I won't be able to tell you about this, will I?
No. Because for me, none of this will have happened yet.
What's that?
That's history fulfilling itself.
History has to fulfill itself. Even Picard knew that.
You were there in the cavern. You know what happened. What am I supposed to do?
If I told you what happened in that cavern, it would affect any decision you'd make now. I can't do that. I won't.
Not telling me might affect my decision. Did you think of that? We're talking about Jean-Luc Picard. I can't sit around and hope it all works out. I've got to do something.
Any place that doesn't stock a good cigar doesn't rank high in my book.
If you must have one, I'm sure we can replicate it for you.
You think one of these imitations can take the place of a hand wrapped Havana?
I wouldn't know.
Well, that's the problem I see here. All this technology it only serves to take away life's simple pleasures. You don't even let a man open the door for a lady.
I think what we've gained far outweighs anything that might have been lost.
Oh? Well, I'm not so impressed with this future. Huge starships, and weapons that can no doubt destroy entire cities, and military conquest as a way of life?
Is that what you see here?
Well, I know what you say, that this is a vessel of exploration and that your mission is to discover new worlds.
That's what the Spanish said.
Deck thirty six.
And the Dutch and the Portuguese. It's what all conquerors say. I'm sure that's what you told that blue-skinned fellow I just saw, before you brought him here to serve you.
He's one of the thousands of species that we've encountered. We live in a peaceful Federation with most of them. The people you see are here by choice.
So there're a privileged few who serve on these ships, living in luxury and wanting for nothing. But what about everyone else? What about the poor? You ignore them.
Poverty was eliminated on Earth a long time ago, and a lot of other things disappeared with it. Hopelessness, despair, cruelty.
Young lady, I come from a time when men achieve power and wealth by standing on the backs of the poor, where prejudice and intolerance are commonplace and power is an end unto itself. And you're telling me that isn't how it is anymore?
That's right.
Well, maybe it's worth giving up cigars for after all.
Any luck?
Not so far. His activating units won't initialise. I thought they would have been protected by his buffering programme, but I guess five hundred years is just too long a wait.
My watch.
Yeah. It was found in the cavern where Data's head was. I guess after five hundred years, that's not likely to work either.
Mister Data, I fear I sadly misjudged you. As I have misjudged many things.
Can you communicate?
Yes.
You're injured.
Why have you interfered with us?
You hunt us. You kill us. We cannot allow that.
We need your energy.
Perhaps we can find a substitute.
No. There is none. We must continue.
We know how you move back and forth through time. My crew have returned to the twenty fourth century to destroy your transport site on Devidia Two.
Destroy it? Your weapons will only amplify the time distortion. You will annihilate your own world.
I'm going back for Captain Picard. Mister Worf, assemble an Away team to accompany me to the surface. Doctor, I need to know anything you can tell me about that ophidian.
I've just started running some tests. If I can have a few hours.
I can't give the alien any more time.
Will, I haven't been able to determine if our phaser energy can generate a stable field. The risk would be
I'll take that risk.
Sir. Permission to speak frankly.
Go ahead.
Our priority is to stop the aliens from any more incursions to Earth. Any delay is unacceptable.
If I can save Captain Picard, I consider that very acceptable.
The Captain would not. I recommend we target photon torpedoes on the alien habitat and destroy it. Immediately.
He's right, Will.
Power up the photons, Mister Worf. Alert me when they're ready.
Computer, initialise the reload circuits.
Reload circuits are initialising.
Okay. Data? This ought to do it.
I don't get it. I don't understand why isn't this working. Computer, run me a diagnostic on the input polarisers.
There is intermittent contact in the input polarisers.
Intermittent?
What? An iron filing. How'd that get in there?
Commander, I have set the photons to fire in staggered rounds, detonating in ten second intervals.
Very well. Fire when ready.
The sequence will be ready to initiate in one minute.
Computer, run another diagnostic on the input polarisers.
Polariser circuits are functioning.
Well, then, that ought to do it. Okay, Data. Come on, now.
Torpedoes. Phasing. Alien. I am processing a binary message entered into my static memory by Captain Picard. Geordi, are we planning to fire on the alien habitat?
Yeah, but
It is imperative that we do not. I will explain later.
La Forge to Riker. Hold your fire!
The binary message left by the Captain is not entirely clear. He seemed to be concerned about the phase differential of our photon torpedoes. That firing them might produce catastrophic effects.
Then how do we destroy their habitat?
If I am correct, we must modify our weapons so that the force of the explosion is re-phased into the aliens' time continuum.
If we outfit the photons with phase discriminators we could get the variance we need.
How long will it take you?
At least a couple of hours.
Fine. I'll have time to go get him.
Sir?
I'm going back to the nineteenth century to get the Captain. Doctor?
My analysis of the phasers suggests you'd be able to open the rift, but it won't be stable enough to transport more than one person.
You mean if I go back, only one of us can return?
That's right.
Then I have the perfect solution for you. I'm the one who should return to the nineteenth century and remain there so your Captain can return here.
There's a risk. We're not sure how stable the rift will be.
There's risk in everything. The point is, it's the right choice. I've got more books to write, and your Captain has a job to do here.
Geordi, you'll brief him on what he needs to know?
Aye, sir.
I'm glad I have the chance to thank you.
For what, sir?
Why, for starting me out on the greatest adventure a man's ever had. And for helping a bitter old man to open his eyes and see that the future turned out pretty well after all.
I'm thirsty.
I'm going to get help. We have to get you out of here.
No, don't go. They'll be back for you soon.
No, you need help.
This thing put me down in the middle of Market Street. Took forever to get here.
Commander La Forge has completed the reconfiguration of the photon torpedoes.
If Clemens got back, the Captain should have been here by now.
We have no way of knowing if Mister Clemens was successful.
Re-establish your firing pattern, Mister Worf. We'll wait five more minutes.
Aye, sir.
No time for chit chat, sir. According to Mister La Forge, who did get your message by the way, a frequency setting of point oh four seven on your phaser will correctly activate this creature.
Now you have to get help. Guinan needs medical attention.
I promise you she will be attended to.
And there is a bill to be settled at Mrs. Carmichael's boarding house.
I'll settle it.
Thank you. I wish, I wish time would have allowed me to know you better.
You'll just have to read my books. What I am is pretty much there.
I'll see you in five hundred years, Picard.
And I'll see you in a few minutes.
Commander, I am picking up massive triolic wave activity on the surface.
Is it the Captain?
There are no human life signs.
No sign of a temporal distortion?
No, sir, but triolic activity is increasing.
The aliens. Mister Worf, are the photons ready?
Yes, sir.
Fire.
Torpedoes away, sir.
Sir, I am detecting a temporal distortion on the surface and human life signs.
O'Brien, get him out of there!
Transporter room, have you got him?
He has indeed, Commander. And believe me, it's good to be back.
We have destroyed the target. There is no further indication of triolic activity.
Ensign, lay in a course to the nearest Starbase. Warp six.
Captain's log, stardate 46001.3. Everyone who should be in the nineteenth century is safely there, and those who should be in the twenty fourth are here. Mister Data has been restored to us, head and all, and Samuel Clemens will write the books he was to have written after our encounter.
Now be careful, boys. Don't jostle her too much. Don't worry, Madam Guinan, you're going to be fine.
Watch the door. Careful, he may have suffered cranial damage.
Move him onto the diagnostic pad.
Right.
Slowly.
Right, here we go.
Slowly. That's good.
All right. Careful.
Readings?
They're fluctuating, sir.
He took a severe blow. Possible trauma to the telencephalon.
Start fifteen octares of quadroline. We'll need a complete del-scan series.
I can't find his cardial organ.
What do you mean? I'm reading a steady circulation.
There it is. Up here.
In his digestive tract?
Ever seen anything like this?
He's missing three costal struts on one side and four on the other.
You think that's something? Look at this
He has digits on his terminus.
What are you?
What happened?
You're in the crisis room at the Sikla Medical Facility. You've had a severe injury, but you're going to be all right.
I was caught in the riots when the police moved in. It's the last thing I remember.
Can you tell us your name?
Rivas. Rivas Jakara.
Rivas Jakara? Where do you live?
In the Marta community on the southern continent.
You're a long way from home. Do you have any members of your family we should notify?
No, I have no family. I can't stay here. I have to get back.
You're in no condition to leave yet. There are several unusual things about your case, Mister Jakara. Your cranial lobes, for instance, they seem to be surgical implants.
I had cosmetic surgery to correct a genetic birth defect.
And these?  Another birth defect?
Yes, isn't that something? My father's were the same way.
You want us to believe that all your abnormalities are inherited genetic traits?
I understand your confusion. My personal physician is much more familiar with these genetic irregularities. To be honest, I would much feel better back home under her care.
Why don't I talk to her about that. What's her name?
Crusher. Actually, I'm not sure you'll be able to reach her.
Why not?
She's taking a sabbatical.
Well, we'll do the best we can for you. Oh, there was one other thing. We found this curious-looking device in your clothes. What is it?
It's just a toy. I was taking home as a present.
I thought you didn't have any family.
It's for a neighbour's child. Was there anything else found? I had one piece of jewelry, a metal pin.
No, I'm sorry, this was all we found.
Genetic irregularities? That thing isn't even the same species as we are.
Keep your voice down. The last thing we need is a panic in here over some
It's all the space flights. They have attracted creatures from outer space.
That's exactly the kind of thing I don't want to hear.
What are you going to do?
Of all the medical facilities available, why did he have to end up here?
I think we ought to call Central Security.
Well, I'm not calling anybody yet. Not till we've done a lot more. A lot more. I want his story checked out. Run a complete search through the medical library. Be absolutely certain there's never been anything like him.
What if there're more of them? They could be everywhere.
Cordon off the wing. I want security on his door twenty nine hours a day, and I want this kept quiet.
Code three drill in B wing. All instructors report immediately.
At twelve point four after launch, the warp field generator will be activated.
That's when it would break the light barrier?
Yes, Chancellor. If we're successful, the craft will leave our star system, and in a matter of minutes will be on its way to the Garth system.
And then what?
And then, Krola, we'll see what's there.
How long, Mirasta?
We have the prototype design for the warp engine. It would simply be a matter of building the actual production units. If I get your approval today, ten months, maybe less.
Chancellor, I'll admit Mirasta's enthusiasm for her work is seductive, but perhaps we're moving too fast. Your opponents will see this as another example of your determination to pull us further from our traditional ways.
My opponents look back as I look forward. I cannot believe that my people would choose to retreat after all we've done.
I agree.
The people were willing to accept your social reforms because they believe in you, Chancellor. But there are many who say we have gone far enough. All these new ideas, new technology, and now space travel? It confuses them, frightens them.
I will not allow them to remain in the dark ages. The warp programme will proceed as you have outlined, Mirasta. And then we will slow down, Krola, to let everyone catch their breath. Including you.
Mirasta Yale?
Yes.
Please, don't be alarmed at our appearance.
My name is Jean-Luc Picard. This is my associate Deanna Troi.
What are you?
We've come with some important information.
About what?
About space. About the universe you are preparing to enter.
We come from a federation of planets. Captain Picard is from a planet called Earth, which is over two thousand light years from here. I'm from another planet called Betazed.
We've been monitoring your progress toward warp-drive capability. When a society reaches your level of technology and is clearly about to initiate warp travel, we feel the time is right for first contact. We prefer meeting like this, rather than a random confrontation in deep space.
We've come to you first because you're a leader in the scientific community. Scientists generally accept our arrival more easily than others.
We almost always encounter shock and fear on this sort of mission. We hope that you will help us facilitate our introduction.
Is this a joke? Did Lupo and the others from the lab put you up to this?
It's certainly no joke. As you can see, we are physically quite different from Malcorians. And, with your permission, I'm prepared to prove it to you.
I would like that.
Picard to Enterprise. Three to beam up.
It's everything I've ever dreamed of. When I was a child, my parents would take me to the planetarium and we would sit in the dark and it was as if I was on a spaceship, on my way to another world to meet people on other planets. Part of me keeps waiting for the lights to come up and the programme to end. How did you know about me?
We learn as much as possible about a planet before we make first contact.
One of the things we monitor are your broadcast signals, your journalism, your music, your humour. Try to better understand you as a people.
I hate to think how you would judge us based on our popular music and entertainment.
Indeed, we do get an incomplete picture, which is why we also do surface reconnaissance.
You've had people on our planet?
For several years.
These are specialists, highly trained observation teams, superficially identical to yourselves and therefore able to blend naturally into your society. You see, we have discovered that the most hazardous aspect of these missions is a lack of sufficient information
You don't have to explain. I understand, although not everybody on my planet would. They would think you were trying to infiltrate our society.
There is a difficulty here, one that has forced us to accelerate this entire process. One of our people is missing. My First Officer, Commander William Riker. He was down on the planet surface, coordinating with the observation team the final details of contact. He disappeared. My people have made enquiries but they've not been able to locate him. If there is anything you can help
Of course. Where was Riker's last known location?
The capital city. He was under the name of Rivas Jakara, a tourist from the Marta community.
We must find him before someone realises what he really is. If this gets out prematurely, it could seriously complicate matters. Our ideology is based on the assumption that the Malcorian is a supreme lifeform, and our world is the centre of the universe. Your arrival will change our entire understanding of life, and some will not want it to change.
What about Durken?
Durken. He will be open-minded, but cautious. I strongly suggest that you do not discuss your surveillance teams with him. At least not right away.
But with the disappearance of Commander Riker, wouldn't it be prudent
Captain Picard, I must ask you to trust me on this. If you tell the Chancellor about Commander Riker, you will undermine everything that you hope to accomplish here. Durken will assign Krola, our Minister of Security, to find him. Krola has his own political agenda. He will perceive you as the greatest threat that our people have ever known. And he will not hesitate to use Riker to prove that he is correct.
From another planet, hundreds of them.
It doesn't make sense that he's the only one. Think about it.
I thought I said this was to be kept a secret.
You know Nilrem.
Well, it's getting out of control. I don't know what else he is, but he is still a patient in this medical facility and we have a responsibility for his care and recovery. Remind them of that, will you?
You're not going to be able to contain this much longer.
I know.
If people get scared enough, anything could happen
Mister Jakara, we have been unable to confirm anything you told us. No physician named Crusher is on file. Not on this planet. Your address in Marta's an eating establishment. The cook has never heard of Rivas Jakara.
Obviously there's been some misunderstanding.
There's a growing number of people on the other side of that door who believe you are not one of us, Mister Jakara.
Not one of you?
That you are from another planet. Are you, Mister Jakara?
Do you realise what you're saying?
I know how it sounds. I'm not anxious to make a fool of myself. This new era of space flight, it fires the imagination. People see unidentified vessels in the sky that turn out to be weather balloons.
Well, it's far more likely that I am a weather balloon than an alien.
Our medical journals have documented several cases of genetic mutation in recent history. Some unusual physical disfigurations have occurred.
I'm another case for the medical journals, then.
Perhaps. But you, Mister Jakara, are hiding something, and unless you tell me the truth about yourself, this rumour will persist and grow and could even become dangerous. Most especially to you.
Chancellor, Minister Yale of the Space Bureau would like to introduce you to someone.
Call her back. See if the Vice-Chancellor will do.
They're out here waiting to see you, sir.
All right. Send them in.
Always time to meet your friends, Mirasta.
Chancellor, I think you might want to clear your afternoon schedule for this.
And this is the Bridge.
Chancellor.
Here we have Environmental and Engineering stations, mission operations, and the two principal science stations.
Data, allow me to introduce Chancellor Avel Durken and Space Administrator Mirasta Yale.
Chancellor. Minister.
Commander Data is my Second Officer.
He's an android, Chancellor. A constructed being.
A machine?
In a manner of speaking. The term artificial lifeform would be more accurate.
Captain Picard, is there someplace we might speak together without distraction?
Certainly.
Chancellor, with your permission, I would like to beam to the surface. I have several matters to attend to.
Not a word to anyone about this, Mirasta.
Of course.
Mister Data, will you escort the Minister to the transporter room? Chancellor.
Has there still been no communication from Commander Riker, Data?
No, Minister. He has not returned to our designated transport coordinates. We have continued to scan the capital city without success.
I've been saving this for a special occasion. My brother on Earth produces fruit known as grapes, which he turns into wine. He's really quite good at it. Chancellor, we have a tradition called a toast. It is a drink to salute one's friends and good fortune, and I would like to propose a toast to a new friendship.
We have something very much like this here on Malcor Three.
I think we shall find we have much in common.
And much that is not in common.
An opportunity to learn from one another.
You speak the language of diplomacy very well, Captain. It is a language I appreciate and understand, but I have learned to not always trust it.
Trust requires time and experience.
My world's history has recorded that conquerors often arrived with the words, we are your friends.
We are not here as conquerors, Chancellor.
What do you want?
A beginning. But how we proceed is entirely up to you.
And if my wishes should conflict with yours?
There'll be no conflict.
And if I should tell you to leave and never return to my world?
We will leave and never return. Chancellor, we are here only to help guide you into a new era. I can assure you we will not interfere in the natural development of your planet. That is, in fact, our Prime Directive.
I can infer from that directive that you do not intend to share all this exceptional technology with us.
That is not the whole meaning, but it is part of it.
Is this your way of maintaining superiority?
Chancellor, to instantly transform a society with technology would be harmful and it would be destructive,
You're right, of course. I'm overwhelmed, Captain Picard. I'm quite overwhelmed. I go home each night to a loving wife, two beautiful daughters. We eat the evening meal together as a family, I think that's important. And they always ask me if I've had a good day.
And how shall you answer them tonight, Chancellor?
I will have to say this morning, I was the leader of the universe as I knew it. This afternoon, I am only a voice in a chorus. But I think it was a good day.
There are guards out there. You'll never escape that way. I'm not afraid of you.
Good. Because there's nothing to be afraid of.
We shouldn't fear the unknown. We should embrace it.
Can you help me get out of here?
Are you really an alien? It's all right to tell me.
No, I'm not an alien.
I don't believe you. You are an alien.
I really have to leave.
I could divert the guard's attention. You might stand a chance if you took the service exit down the hallway to the right.
To the right? Fine, let's do it.
Why should I?
Well, you know why. I don't belong here. I have to get back on my ship, in space.
I believe you.
Now, will you help me?
If you make love to me.
What?
I've always wanted to make love with an alien.
Listen, Miss
Lanel.
Lanel, I really have to get going. All the other aliens are waiting for me.
Oh, it's not so much to ask, and then I'll help you escape.
It's not that easy. There are differences in the way that my people make love.
I can't wait to learn.
But it's
It's your only way out of here, my alien.
Something's happened to him. I think he's dead. Go on, get some help.
Okay. No, that way.
Thanks.
Will I ever see you again?
I'll call you the next time I pass through your star system.
Stop him! Somebody stop him!
Hold it.
He's escaping! The alien's escaping!
Stop it! All of you! Stop it now! Have you all lost your minds?
They've aggravated the injury to his renal organ. He's bleeding internally.
Get him into a surgical cubicle. And call Central Security. This has gone too far.
Their leader, Picard, has made it clear that how we proceed is entirely our own decision.
You cannot possibly be suggesting surrender, Chancellor.
They are not hostile.
Mirasta, you are incredibly naive. Can you be so enraptured with the notion of space travellers that you are blind to the threat they represent?
I have seen their vessel, Krola. If they chose to be hostile, I do not think we would be standing here now.
Why should they use force when we are ready to lay down in fear.
I do not lay down in fear, to them or to you, Krola.
Chancellor, I mean no disrespect, but I have repeatedly warned you about your policies, taking us so quickly where we had no business going in the first place. New philosophies, new economics, new technologies. There are many people who still value our traditional way of life and I for one am willing to die to defend it.
Open your eyes, Krola. We are part of a greater community. We cannot ignore it.
You would ignore them as they infiltrate and spy on us.
What are you saying, Krola?
We have captured one of their spies.
Chancellor, he is Captain Picard's first officer, Commander Riker.
You knew about this, Mirasta?
He has been missing for two days. I told Captain Picard not to discuss this because I was afraid this is exactly what would happen.
What else do you know, Mirasta? Everything!
They have been on our planet, observing, for several years.
Years! Imagine what they have done. Influenced our young, stirred up dissent.
They were collecting information.
Where is this Commander Riker now?
He's in the Sikla Medical facility. He's recovering from surgery. He suffered head injuries in an escape attempt. He will recover consciousness in a few hours.
Will he survive?
I didn't think he would have survived the injuries.
I have to interrogate him before he dies.
At least give him time to regain some strength. Come back tomorrow.
It cannot wait until tomorrow.
Krola, we can get help from his ship. With their medical technology, he might recover.
We're not giving him back. He's the one advantage we have now. Use your drugs to revive him.
Those drugs increase cardial rate and vascular pressure. That's the last thing we need to do to him right now.
It will probably be enough to kill him. You can't do it!
Revive him.
I'm just a physician, Minister. I don't know much about affairs of state, but he is a living, intelligent being. I don't care if the Chancellor himself calls down here. I have sworn an oath to do no harm, and I will not.
Then I'll find someone to replace you.
Chancellor.
You are punctual, Captain.
I know how busy you are.
Do you? I think you know a great deal more about me than I know about you.
In what respect?
You speak of trust and peace and working together to enter a new era, and at the same time you conduct secret surveillance posing as Malcorians.
Commander Riker?
Commander Riker.
Mirasta said it would be a mistake to discuss this with you.
Yes, she's tried to accept the responsibility.
It was my error, not hers. Chancellor, there is no starship mission more dangerous than that of first contact. We never know what we will face when we open the door on a new world, how we will be greeted, what exactly the dangers will be. Centuries ago, a disastrous contact with the Klingon Empire led to decades of war. It was decided then we would do surveillance before making contact. It was a controversial decision. I believe it prevented more problems than it created.
I can appreciate the logic of your position, Captain. But it would seem a full disclosure after contact would have been in order.
In time there would have been full disclosure. I can only ask you to believe that. On other worlds it would not be an issue. But here, everything our observers reported indicated that the people of this world would almost certainly react negatively to our arrival. We could see that even surveillance might even be interpreted as an act of aggression. I hoped that we would have found Commander Riker before you did so the matter would not complicate our introduction. It was a mistake.
Yes. A mistake I might have made in your place. I rather like it actually.
Like it?
That you make mistakes like any man.
Chancellor, I have made some fine ones in my time. Now, I must ask you, will you release my officer?
We'll talk again later, Captain.
Enterprise, one to beam up.
Yes I understand.
I have been relieved of my duties, as I'm sure you already know. You are Acting Director of the facility, Nilrem.
Revive him.
Leave us.
I am Minister Krola of Internal Security. You are Riker, an alien. Yes, we know.
Please bring my people here.
In time. In time. But first I need to ask you some questions.
Thank you for seeing me.
If I did not depend so much on your expertise in space matters, I would have asked for your resignation.
I felt I was acting in the best interests of our people, Chancellor.
When you are selected to occupy this office, then you will have the privilege of deciding the best interests of our people. Picard I can excuse, but you, Mirasta, you should have trusted me.
Chancellor, we must release Riker to Picard Any hope for a relationship with these people depends on it.
I can't afford to be the idealist you are, Mirasta.
Riker
I am prepared to release Riker after we have interrogated him.
Are you prepared for him to die, Chancellor? His injuries are extremely serious. A mob at the medical facility almost killed him. Krola has ordered drugs to be used to revive him for questioning, drugs that in his condition would be dangerous for him. Without medical aid from his ship, I believe that Riker will not survive the day. You must tell Picard where he is.
You have lied since the moment of your capture and I believe you are lying now, Commander.
No. We're here on a mission of peace.
Such noble creatures. Why do peaceful people develop such lethal weapons? Or do you still insist it's just a toy?
An interesting toy, to be sure.
It's only used for defence.
Perhaps, like many conquerors, you believe your goals to be benevolent. I cannot. For however you would describe your intentions, you still represent the end to my way of life. I cannot permit that to occur. Eventually, Durken would choose to welcome your people with arms open and eyes closed. I must force him down another path.
When they find us, I will be dead, killed by your weapon. The lines will be drawn. A peaceful accord will no longer be an option.
No.
For my people.
What happened?
He shot him. The alien shot Krola.
Get me three octares of adrulmine, high frequency EM charge unit now!
I have a circulation pattern. It's very weak. We have to get him on vital buffers right now
I'm a physician, don't be frightened. I need to know what happened. Are you doctors?
Yes. He shot him.
With that thing.
Crusher to Picard.
Go ahead, Doctor.
Commander Riker is near death.
But there's still some brain activity. I need to get him back to the ship.
Acknowledged.
And there's a Malconian male with a phaser wound in his upper chest. I need to get him back as well.
We'll meet you on the Enterprise. Picard out.
They're both going to be okay. We were able to stabilise Will. If we had been any later
Krola?
He was never in any real danger. The phaser was on stun.
Stun?
It's a defensive weapon. Have you been able to ascertain what happened?
Based on the angle of impact, it suggests that Krola's left hand was on the phaser when it went off,
They were struggling for the weapon?
Commander Riker was in no position to offer any kind of struggle, Chancellor.
Krola was trying to be a martyr?
Where is this?
You're aboard the starship, my foolish old friend.
No. Chancellor, you must not. You must not pursue relations with them. You must not.
I know. I know.
But Chancellor
Mirasta, it goes against every instinct in my being. My people are not ready to accept what you represent. Everything that happened in the hospital proves it. And Krola is the best evidence of all. We must slow down and allow all those like him to join us in the present before we can move into the future.
But when we encounter other beings in space, our people must be ready.
The warp programme will have to be delayed. We will divert more resources to education and social development to prepare for the day when we are ready.
Chancellor, I strongly disagree.
I know. Captain, you once said if I ask you to leave, you would without hesitation. I'm afraid I must ask you to do just that.
Well, it's your decision, Chancellor. But I must say, I regret that I won't have the opportunity of knowing your people better.
We're a good people, Captain. A society with much potential. Once we cross the threshold of space, we will have to give up this self-importance, this conceit that we are the centre of the universe. But this is not the time for that. For now, we will have to enjoy that sweet innocence.
How will you keep us a secret when so many have seen and heard so much?
The stories will be told for many years, I have no doubt. Of the ship that made contact, of an alien who was held prisoner in the medical facility. There'll be charges of a government conspiracy. Some of the witnesses will tell their tales and most people will laugh at them, and go back and watch more interesting fiction of the daily broadcasts. It will pass.
I'm sorry to say he's probably right. Captain Picard, I have one last request. Take me with you.
She will be unhappy with the restrictions I must place on her at home, Captain.
We may not be back here in your lifetime. And I have to believe that you cannot be fully prepared for the realities of space travel.
I have been prepared for the realities of space since I was nine years old, and sitting in a planetarium.
Mister Worf to my Ready room.
Escort Chancellor Durken to the transporter room, Lieutenant. And assign quarters to Minister Yale. She will be remaining on board.
Aye, sir.
Until we return, then.
With luck, we'll both be around to renew our friendship, Captain.
The intense electromagnetic whirlwinds on the moon's surface make it virtually impossible to locate the source of the signal, Captain.
Any indications of life, Mister Worf?
Scanners read negative, sir, but they may be affected by the interference.
Have you ever heard anything like this, Data?
I believe so, Commander. At Starfleet Academy.
The Academy?
I will verify it. Just as I thought. It is a Starfleet subspace distress signal, standard to Daedalus-class starships.
There hasn't been a Daedalus class in service for what?
One hundred seventy two years, sir.
Are there any records of missing ships in this vicinity?
The USS Essex under the command of Captain Bryce Shumar disappeared in this sector over two centuries ago.
Daedalus class.
I have accessed the subspace transponder signature of the Essex. It is identical to the signal coming from the moon's surface.
W arrived a little late.
Mute it, Mister Data. With that storm activity down there, it isn't worth the risk to check on a ghost ship. Advise Starfleet that we have solved the mystery of Captain Shumar and the Essex.
I'm not sure we have. Someone's down there. Alive.
First Officer:First officer's log, supplemental. The electromagnetic interference on the surface has been judged too dangerous for anyone to transport down, so we have taken a shuttle to investigate.
Shields are holding, sir.
Wind shear is incredible. Data, keep an eye on the stabilisers. If it's anything like this on the ground, I don't see how anyone can survive on this moon for long.
Maybe they've been living underground.
Question is where? I still can't locate the source of the damn signal. It's bouncing around more than we are.
Forward thrusters have failed, sir. We are losing power.
Enterprise!
Go ahead.
We've lost our thrusters. Attempting to compensate with secondary boosters
Sir? The shuttlecraft's impulse generators have shut down.
Commander, can you hear me?
Enterprise to shuttle, please respond.
Hold on! We're going down.
Initiating emergency landing procedures.
Maintain the approach attitude, Data. I'm taking her in. Brace for impact.
The shuttle has crashed on the surface.
Do we have their position?
I am picking up the shuttle's trace signature, but the surface interference is distorting its position.
Can you locate them?
I think I can. I followed their entry almost all the way in. We can calculate the coordinates from the angle of descent.
Your arm.
Yeah, I'm pretty sure that's broken. Enterprise?
It is unlikely that we will be able to establish communication with the ship, given the electromagnetic interference.
We'll stay in the area until the Enterprise finds us. Take an inventory of the shuttle. See if there's anything left in there that's usable. The ground cover is all non-porous rock, which makes me believe it's even less likely there's anyone living here.
There are no instruments left of practical value that have not been damaged by our landing, sir.
What is that?
That doesn't look like any storm front I've ever seen.
The tricorder is picking up high levels of EM bursts across the spectrum. No lifesign readings other than our own.
There is someone alive here. I'm more certain of it now than ever.
Well, I hope they can find us, because there's no way we'll find them.
They're coming. They're coming with the storm.
We can't get a pattern lock on their communicators because of the EM bursts, Captain. There's no way we can beam them out of there, not under these conditions.
The same conditions won't permit a shuttle to land safely, Mister LaForge. Any suggestions?
O'BRIEN:Give us a minute, Captain.
O'BRIEN:Sir, let me beam down with a pattern enhancer.
Chief, there's no guarantee you won't rematerialise in a million pieces if your signal gets caught up in that electromagnetic whirlwind.
O'BRIEN:I can boost the confinement beam. One person might be able to make it.
Captain, Chief O'Brien wants to beam down to the surface with a pattern enhancer.
His chances of getting down there safely are no better than fifty-fifty, in my opinion.
Captain, a major storm front is moving in on the away team's coordinates.
You're aware of the risks, Mister O'Brien?
O'BRIEN:Yes sir.
O'BRIEN:I think I can make it.
All right then. Good luck.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Mister O'Brien! Nice of you to join us.
O'BRIEN:Nice spot for a picnic, sir. We need to distribute these enhancer rods at seven metre lengths. That should do it.
Is this storm front going to interfere with the transport, Chief?
O'BRIEN:I'd really like to get us out of here before it hits, Commander. I'm supposed to be feeding the baby lunch. Molly gets in a terribly foul mood if I'm late.
I'm with you.
Lunch time, Miles! Let's do it!
Easy, Deanna.
Where?
Back on the Enterprise. You're going to be okay.
My skin, it's tingling.
You're experiencing the afterimages of the electromagnetic discharge. The sensation will pass. They're all fine, too. Now, I want you to take your time, Counsellor. Doctor's orders.
Injury report, Doctor?
Mostly minor abrasions. Commander Riker took the worst of it with a broken arm.
Mister Data. Good work, Chief.
O'BRIEN:Thank you, sir.
Ready for duty, sir.
You're sure, Number One?
It's not the first bone I've ever broken.
And how are you, Counsellor?
Very glad to be here.
Good. Let's go.
So what happened down there?
It was just one hell of a storm. It moved in on our position faster than anything I've ever seen.
Was there any evidence of life?
No, but if Troi was right, we were very close to it.
Bridge. How do you suggest we proceed?
We need to adjust the scanners so they can penetrate those storms. Do you have any ideas, Data?
We might be able to employ virtual imaging to interpolate  missing data.
Is something wrong, Commander?
My apologies. It seems my primary speech processors are experiencing a minor fluctuation. I will have it corrected in a moment.
Captain, may I speak with you a moment in private?
Of course. You have the Bridge, Number One.
Mister Data, deploy sensor scans when you're ready. Ensign, take us to a synchronous orbit aligned around our crash site.
Aye, sir.
Sir, given the EM field properties of this moon, I recommend a search pattern beginning in the southern polar region.
The polar region? That would be starting from scratch, Mister Data. Our latest readings would suggest that we begin our scan around our crash site.
The Essex signal was never clearly located, sir. A systematic survey of the moon from a polar orbit might be more practical.
Well, you might be right, but I'd like to give the crash site a once over first. Maintain our current orbit.
Understood, sir.
I've never felt anything like it. It was as though they were calling to me.
Are you saying someone was communicating telepathically?
Perhaps, for an instant. It was like their voices were being carried on the wind.
What were they trying to communicate?
I'm not sure, but they were calling me to the southern polar region. I believe that's where we should look for the Essex.
Commander, did you override my orbital heading?
Override them?
We've moved into a polar orbit and I'm locked out. The helm isn't responding.
Do you know anything about this, Mister Data? Data?
Security to the Bridge!
Computer, transfer command to Engineering. Full security alert!
O'BRIEN:This way!
What happened?
He would not move to a polar orbit.
You couldn't wait? The Captain would have done it for me.
O'BRIEN:Deck thirty six. Engineering.
Computer, re-enable Bridge control. Security protocol, Riker omega Three.
Report.
Data, O'Brien and Troi tried to commandeer the ship.
They're in turbolift four. Engaging override controls now.
They've trapped us.
What deck is this?
O'BRIEN:We're on deck ten.
Can you move us again?
O'BRIEN:I know how to override the bridge command.
Activate security fields decks eight through fifteen.
Sir, the turbolift is moving again. They're still inside.
Initiate emergency bulkheads in turboshaft four.
Aye, sir. They have been stopped at deck thirteen.
Mister Worf.
Do you know how to deactivate this?
O'BRIEN:The computer will not allow us to override an emergency forcefield command.
My entity's artificial substructure may be useful.
They've broken through a security field, deck ten, section two.
Security to Ten Forward.
Shh. Momma's here. Shh.
Everyone get down on the floor.
Miles?
O'BRIEN:On the floor!
Everyone down, now!
Multiple phaser shots, Ten Forward.
Picard to Worf. Report.
Mister Worf acknowledge. Can you hear me, Mister Worf?
Yes, Bridge. He can hear you.
Captain's log, supplemental. Following an aborted attempt to take control of the Bridge, Counsellor Troi, Mister Data, and Chief O'Brien have seized Ten Forward.
Position security teams at both entrances.
Yes sir.
Mister La Forge, shut down all computer access to Ten Forward.
I can't, Captain. They've already set up a remote security lock out. We'd have to shut down all computer function in the saucer section.
Transporter room three, can you get a pattern lock on Commander Data, Counselor Troi
And Chief O'Brien in Ten Forward?
Attempting to lock on, sir.
O'BRIEN:You were correct. They're attempting to engage their transporters. But I know how to shut them down.
Do it.
Bridge, the entire transporter array has been taken off line and placed into diagnostic mode.
I can't override. It'll take a couple of hours to complete the cycle.
How many people are down there?
Seventeen. They just shut down the internal scanners too, Captain.
Doctor Crusher to the Bridge.
On my way.
What are you doing now?
I can reverse the polarity of their forcefields to isolate this room.
Good.
O'BRIEN:Their communicators. Now they will learn nothing but what we tell them.
They've done something to the forcefields on deck ten, section one.
Geordi?
I don't recognise the configurations, but they've completely isolated Ten Forward.
What about flooding their air vents with anaesthezine gas?
That won't affect Data. No rescue plan will work unless we can knock out all three of them.
A concussive charge would blow out the security fields. We could go in with phasers on wide beam, stun everybody. Sort it out later.
Doctor, go back to the biofilter readouts taken of the away team's transport from the moon's surface. See if you can come up with any clue that might explain this.
Ten Forward, this is Captain Picard. I am prepared to discuss this situation. There is no need for further violence.
Please identify yourselves.
They will now attempt to negotiate for the safety and release of their people. Interesting. Under normal circumstances, I would be counselling the Captain at a time like this.
O'BRIEN:And what would you tell him to do?
I would help him find a way to secure our trust.
What are you looking at? You, Klingon. Attack me.  Are you afraid?
I have no fear of death.
And I have no fear of killing you.
Stop it!
Please respond, Ten Forward. Are there any members of my crew who require medical assistance?
We can discuss your wounded, but first you will move the ship.
Move it where?
You will
Change the ship's orbit to an inclination of eighty degrees south.
The southern polar region. That's where Data tried to move the ship.
And that's what Troi asked me to do. But why? Ten Forward, if you could be more specific about our intended destination
Perhaps we could
You have thirty seconds to change your heading or additional members of your crew will require medical attention.
We need to stabilise this situation. Play for time. I suggest we move the ship as they've asked. Agreed? Set a new heading, but take us there as slowly as you can. Ten Forward, we are moving the ship as you requested.
He's telling the truth. Their heading has changed.
Captain, I've compared the away team's last transporter trace patterns to their earlier records. They're exactly the same, except in Troi, Data and O'Brien there's an unusual synaptic activity. Some kind of anionic energy. It may be another lifeform superimposing its neural patterns on our people.
Why wasn't I affected?
I don't know. The only difference between you and the others was that you were injured.
My broken arm.
The fracture caused pain receptors to fire, which may have made you immune to this energy.
If your theory is accurate, Doctor, what would happen if we were to inflict pain on the others?
It might force whatever it is out of our people.
A plasma shock. It would be painful but it wouldn't cause any physical harm.
I could hook up a modified laser scanner to a plasma inverter.
What about Data?
Well, a plasma shock would definitely overload his neural net. It'll work on him too.
We have to find a way to penetrate the forcefield around Ten Forward.
I might be able to interrupt the forcefield for a few seconds, but I'll be fighting the computer for control. Timing would be critical.
We'd have to hit all three with a single discharge. If they're standing together, it shouldn't be a problem.
How will you gain access?
A micro-optic drill through the ceiling. They'll never detect it.
If this is going to work, we have to have some way to contain or neutralise this anionic energy once it's out of our people.
Yes, Doctor. That will be your top priority. Very well, proceed. Bridge to Ten Forward. Now that we are moving the ship as you requested, I would like to know the nature of the injuries to the members of my crew.
Five of your people have been injured.
How serious is their condition?
You, Klingon, tell him.
Captain, one person has suffered what looks like a level-five phaser hit, and four others have secondary burns. They require medical attention. And our captors are not affected by phaser stun settings.
Silence, Klingon.
Ten Forward, you must release these people so that they can receive proper medical attention.
I will release no one.
If you will release them, I will take their place.
I don't trust him. It may be a deception.
The crew values Picard's life above all others. Captain Picard, we agree to your proposal.
Expect a medical team to accompany me.
Acknowledged.
Sickbay, this is Picard. Have an emergency medical team meet me outside Ten Forward.
Sir, putting you down there only strengthens their position.
Number One, so long as they're on board this ship, I'm a hostage no matter where I am. We all are. I must find out who we're dealing with. If La Forge and Ro can attempt a rescue in short order, then let them proceed. If they can't, I will provide you with another opportunity. Watch for it.
Yes, sir.
Silence that child!
O'BRIEN:I know you. I know who you are. And I know who this is.
She's frightened. Why don't you just let us go?
O'BRIEN:No. Make it stop.
Ten Forward, we're outside the door.
Lower the force field.
Welcome, Captain. Allow me to introduce myself. I am Captain Bryce Shumar, of the Federation Starship Essex.
The Starship Essex vanished over two hundred years ago.
Indeed. I know, I was there. This is my First Officer Commander Steven Mullen , and my Security Chief, Lieutenant Morgan Kelly.
And you have survived all this time as?
Spirits? Ghosts? But you're a man who would never believe in ghosts, Picard. Isn't that true? You see, Troi knows you. And so I do as well.
Then Counsellor Troi is still alive?
Yes, of course she is. I have no wish to harm her or to harm anyone else.
I'm very pleased to hear that.
We have been forced to take this action, Captain, because we need your help.
My help?
Our consciousness has been trapped on this moon for two centuries. We must escape this torture.
How did this happen to you?
I can't explain how it happened. I only know that it did. The Essex was caught in an electromagnetic storm just as your shuttle was. Moments before we crashed, the bridge was struck by lightning. The ship was ripped apart. Somehow, in that instant, our consciousness was absorbed in the magnetic currents on the surface.
Why didn't you tell us this? Why the deception? The violence?
Because as I said, I knew you would not believe us. Even now, I know you don't.
What was your vessel's designation and its complement?
NCC One seven three. Daedalus-class starship. Crew, two hundred and twenty nine.
Under whose command in this sector?
Admiral Uttan Narsu, Starbase Twelve. You will find all this in Starfleet records.
I don't need to see the records.
Then you know I am correct.
End this, and I will give you whatever help you need.
No. You don't trust us. And I can't risk trusting you.
It is taking too long. We should have been there by now. He is manipulating you.
Captain Picard has every right to be curious.
He will try to delay until a rescue attempt is possible.
I know that. I also know that he will make every effort to protect the lives of his people. Since our demands are not excessive, Captain, I hope you will see that it will be simpler to accede than to risk further injuries.
What do you want?
All you need to know for now is that we want to rest. Simply, finally, to rest.
Section two B, A, section one.
Finally. I never want to see this part of the Enterprise again.
I hear you. This is what starship designers call easy access. Yeah, yeah, this is it. I thought we might have a problem with conduit number two twenty seven but it looks like we're going to be able to get by it.
Thanks.
We're through.
Good. Let's hook up the scanner and see what we've got.
Got it. All three have got to be in the circle if this is going to work.
We're halfway home. La Forge to Crusher. How're you doing?
I think I've come up with an idea for a containment field.
This anionic energy seems to be vulnerable to the same magnetic flux density we monitored in the storms. If we can duplicate it, we can trap it
Once it's out of our people.
You should be able to do that by flooding Ten Forward with ionogenic particles.
Exactly what I was thinking.
Geordi, how long will it take to get it all ready?
We still have to calibrate the plasma inverter, Commander. My guess is forty five minutes to an hour.
I can have the containment field ready by then.
Keep me advised.
Impressions, Mister Worf?
Spiritual possessions of this sort have been reported throughout Klingon history. It is called jat'yIn, the taking of the living by the dead.
Human history is full of many similar legends.
Then you believe they may be telling the truth?
Not for one moment.
Sir, they know much about the Essex. If it is the spirit of Captain Shumar.
Then he should be behaving very much better, don't you think? A Starfleet Captain.
O'BRIEN:You two, sit down.
After living disembodied for two centuries, perhaps they've gone mad.
I assure you, Mister Worf, these are not jat'yIn. Our job is to find out exactly what they are and then to determine how to deal with them.
Right, That's enough. Sit down, both of you. You over there, you there. Down.
O'BRIEN:I gave you that. In a place called McKinley Park. Green grass. Tall trees.
Please don't.
O'BRIEN:I hid the bracelet in your pocket. You were surprised.
Don't.
O'BRIEN:You said, Miles, you make me feel so happy.
No! Get away! Get away from me.
Leave her alone.
Captain Shumar. We'll be approaching the southern polar region that you requested in a few minutes. I need to give additional instructions.
Very well. We're taking you to our crash site.
The southern pole?
That is correct.
Nothing our sensors were able to detect indicated that the Essex went down in that region.
As I told you, Captain, the ship broke up in the atmosphere, and the bridge went down here. When we reach it, you will beam what's left of our skeletal remains on board this ship and then take them back to Earth for a proper burial. You see how simple a request this is?
Captain, if you will let these people go, I'll order the Bridge to follow your instructions.
I will release no one.
If you are who you say you are, there's no need for any of this. We'll gladly take you home.
I wish you were truly as open-minded as you say, Picard.
If you don't release the hostages, I won't cooperate.
You will cooperate, Captain. You will cooperate or someone will die. Who shall it be? How about the Klingon? Get another one.
O'BRIEN:You.
O'BRIEN:Come on. Come on, come on.
Pick one to die, Captain, or I kill them both.
They're all in range. I have to do it now.
I'm only going to be able to shut down the forcefield for about seven seconds before the computer compensates.
Well, if they're the right seven seconds, it'll be enough.
Bridge,
Prepare to release the ionogenic field on my signal.
Standing by.
Ready?
Lower the forcefield.
Forcefield down.
Firing plasma charge.
Damn!
Tell them to stop, or I kill everyone in this room, starting with you.
Picard to Bridge, abort immediately.
As you say, Captain. Riker to La Forge, return to the Bridge.
Are you ready to cooperate?
Yes.
First Officer:First officer's log, supplemental. The Enterprise has moved into a synchronous orbit near the southern polar region. We await further instructions from Ten Forward.
Any sign of the Essex?
Negative, Commander. Electromagnetic disturbances are even worse here. Scanners can't read a thing.
Bridge to Ten Forward.
Intense storm activity over the southern pole is making it virtually impossible for us to pick up any trace of the Essex.
We are giving you the exact coordinates of our remains on board the wreck of the Essex.
I'm receiving the coordinates now.
Can you tell what's there?
Just your basic ionic cyclone. I can't read a thing.
I'm sure as hell not going to beam up whatever might be down there.
I've got a good excuse for you. The transporters aren't going to work any better than the scanners.
Bridge to Ten Forward.
Whatever's blocking our scanners will prevent the use of the transporters.
O'BRIEN:They're lying.
On the contrary, we've had a difficult time with transporters since we arrived here. That's why we had to send down the shuttle. You should all have been aware of that fact.
We must be able to use the transporters.
Mister O'Brien was the one who safely executed the return of the away team. He's the most qualified person on board to operate the transporters under these circumstances.
Can you do it from here?
O'BRIEN:No. I'd have to use a transporter pad.
I could give you safe passage to a transporter pad in one of the cargo bays.
It's a trick. He is trying to divide us.
We must not be separated.
I can give you all safe passage.
Why are you suddenly being so helpful?
Because I assume that if you choose go to the cargo bay, then you won't to take all of the hostages. Their safety is my chief priority.
What are the risks when we leave this room?
Without the protection of the forcefields, we are completely vulnerable.
O'BRIEN:They could use the transporter against us. Once the forcefield is down, they could beam us back to the surface. But there is a way to neutralise that threat. Bridge, transfer all transporter functions to Ten Forward.
In order to do that
You will have to release your computer control lockouts.
O'BRIEN:That's not true.
Let me talk to him. Number One, I think we have an opportunity to end this siege.
It will require the cooperation of all concerned.
Our guests will be moving shortly to cargo bay four, where the transport will occur. I want you to ensure them of safe passage between Ten Forward to the cargo bay.
Understood, Captain. Doctor. Mister La Forge.
Yes, sir.
O'BRIEN:Transporter controls are being transferred. Ten Forward to Bridge. I said all transporter controls. Including those aboard all your shuttlecraft.
Almost had them, Ensign. Nice try. Ten Forward. Our mistake. Remaining transporter functions are being transferred to you.
O'BRIEN:Once we create our own access code, we can prevent anyone using the transporter against us. We can go to the cargo bay.
What about the weapons?
We will each take a hostage for protection.
Klingon.
Picard, you are mine.
Please, let her stay.
Lower the forcefield.
Security teams, stand by.
They're heading through section five.
Mister La Forge, Doctor, they'll be at their destination in less than a minute.
They've stopped at deck eighteen, sir.
Security, allow them access into cargo bay four.
Aye, sir.
O'BRIEN:I will require assistance.
Captain Shumar, how do you intend to achieve this rest that you so desire?
What do you mean?
Well, how do you intend to free yourselves of this existence that has so trapped your consciousness?
It will fade as we move further from this planet.
Really? What is your scientific basis for that?
I don't need a scientific basis. Just be quiet.
Captain Shumar, when are you going to tell me who you really are?
O'BRIEN:I've initialised the transporter signal.
Proceed.
They're powering up the transporter, Commander.
Mister LaForge.
I've isolated cargo bay four with a neutrino field, sir, but it'll only take Data and O'Brien a couple of minutes to override it, once they discover that it's there.
I hope that'll give the Captain enough time to play his hand.
Do you know what he's going to do?
There's only one reason he chose cargo bay four. If it becomes necessary, Ensign, you will blow the cargo bay hatch on my orders.
Yes, sir.
You're quite right, Picard, it's not rest we seek. Only escape.
Escape?
We were brought to this moon over five centuries ago from a star system called Ux-Mal. We were separated from our bodies and left to drift in the storms. Once we almost escaped, on board the Essex, but that ship was incapable of eluding this moon's electromagnetic storms.
Did you really think using their identities would gain our sympathy?
It was a better approach than asking you to allow hundreds of condemned prisoners on board.
Then this moon is a penal colony.
That's correct. But now we have your ship and your bodies to carry us home.
I'm reading dozens of them. Hundreds.
They have the same anionic signature we saw on the biofilter scans.
I think we can give the Captain a new bargaining chip. Doctor Crusher, flood the cargo bay with your containment field.
No! Let them go or you will all die.
Your threats are meaningless now.
O'BRIEN:We are still in control of these three bodies. We will not let them go.
Are you prepared to sacrifice the lives of the others? They'll all die when the cargo bay hatch is blown.
You will die too, Picard.
I would die to save the life of my child.
To die defending one's ship is the hope of every Klingon.
If you each know the officers you inhabit, then you know they're equally ready to give their lives for this ship. Free them now and I will return you to the moon's surface.
I advise you, Picard, not to pass our way again.
Picard to Bridge.
Aye, sir.
Our guests will be leaving shortly. I need an emergency medical team down here.
On our way, Captain.
Mister Worf, prepare to transport these prisoners back down to the moon's surface.
Gladly, sir.
Captain's log, stardate 45572.1. Doctor Crusher has examined Troi, Data and O'Brien. There seem to be no residual effects from their experience.
It was as though my own consciousness were pushed to the side. I was watching everything happen, hearing my own voice, but not being able to control any of it.
What about the entity that controlled you, What were your perceptions of him?
He was intelligent, actually. Thoughtful, in a ruthless sort of way. Cold.
Lieutenant, I must apologise for my inadvertent misconduct toward you.
No apology necessary.
Your restraint was most remarkable.
You have no idea.
How do you feel?
O'BRIEN:Hungry.
That's a good sign. Go home.
O'BRIEN:How do you feel?
I'm just glad to have you back.
O'BRIEN:If I could've killed that thing inside me, I would have.
I know. We both know.
Captain, sensors have located the transport ship. Two Rekag battle cruisers are flanking it.
Red alert. Shields up.
Phasers online. Photon torpedoes armed and ready.
Is the transport still under attack?
The cruisers' weapons are powered up but sir, the Rekag ships are turning and heading out of sensor range.
They don't want to take on the Enterprise.
We are within visual range of the transport, sir.
On screen.
Sensors indicate damage to the Dorian's subspace emitter. Audio communication only.
Open a channel, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation starship Enterprise.
Captain Talmadge of the Dorian. Glad you're here we took some shield damage from the Rekag ships but we're still intact.
Do you have injuries? Can we assist you in any way?
No injuries, but I'd like permission to transport a couple of our passengers to your ship.
Of course.
We're conveying a mediator to Seronia. I think he's the reason the Rekags fired on us. He's
Captain, I'm losing you. Go ahead and beam your passengers on board. Counsellor, after you've seen to their needs will you escort them to my Ready room.
Yes, Captain.
Cancel Red alert. Mister Worf, take the weapons offline.
Aye, sir.
I'm Counsellor Deanna Troi.
Ambassador Ves Alkar, and my mother, Sev Maylor. Counsellor, it's imperative that I speak to the Captain.
You think he's attracted to you, but he isn't. You offer him nothing.
She hasn't been feeling well. Could she be taken to quarters?
Of course. Chief. I'll take you to Captain Picard.
Mother, go with her.
Don't pursue him. I won't have it. I'll stop you.
I am grateful for the Federation's offer to escort me, but if I arrive at Rekag-Seronia on board the Enterprise, the armed flagship of Starfleet, my mission as negotiator of peace will be compromised. There must be a Federation transport ship somewhere in the area that could take me there.
With all due respect. Admiral, to put the Ambassador on board another unarmed transport would be to invite a second assault.
I believe the attack on us was an isolated incident, nothing more.
Ambassador Alkar, the Rekag-Seronia dispute has threatened Federation ships for many months. We are grateful that you are willing to undertake this mission and you have our full support.
Thank you, sir.
However, we also recognise that safety is an issue. Not just yours, but the crew that escorts you. To send you on an unarmed transport puts everyone at risk. I think it best if you proceed to Rekag-Seronia aboard the Enterprise.
Then I have no choice.
Once you get to Rekag-Seronia, you can conduct your negotiations as you see fit. Until then, you'll be in good hands with Captain Picard.
I understand, sir.
Good luck, and a successful journey.
Picard to Commander Riker.
Yes, sir?
Set a course for Seronia.
Aye, sir.
That will be all for today. There will be another class tomorrow at oh seven hundred hours.
The skills are demanding. You're very disciplined.
I believe in a strong connection between body and mind. You obviously share the same convictions.
Yes, I do. Only sometimes my body has a problem conforming to my mind's wishes.
I would imagine that your self-discipline helps you in your work.
I don't know about that. I think maybe my biggest asset is patience. I let everybody else talk until they're exhausted, and when I start, they're too tired to argue.
You're going to need all your patience at Seronia. I can't imagine how you'll get the two sides talking to each other.
Neither can I. I won't know that until I get there. I tend to feel my way through a situation.
Deck nine. If I were empathic like you, I'd have a real advantage.
I thought Lumerians were empathic.
Only with each other, not other species. So, I don't have any idea what you might be feeling just now.
Curiosity. What I sense from you is very unusual. Calmness, serenity, tranquillity. You seem to embody the very qualities that you hope to draw out in others.
Tell me, Counsellor, have you ever been involved in diplomatic negotiations?
Several times with Captain Picard. There have been instances when having an empath along has been helpful.
I'm sure. I could use some of that help. Would you come with me when we reach Seronia?
If the Captain authorises it, of course I will.
Good. I hope to see you again.
You're late.
Mother, I told you that I'd be gone for over an hour.
You're late because of her. Have you mated with him yet?
What?
That's what you want, isn't it?
Mother, please, come in.
I can always tell. The ones with a certain look in their eye.
I'd better go.
And I'll tell you this. If you do, you'll regret it the rest of your life.
Mother. come in please. You should lie down.
Come in.
Hi. It's that time again. The dreaded crew evaluation reports.
Does it have to be today?
It's not going to be any easier tomorrow.
It might.
What's wrong?
I've just had a disturbing encounter with Alkar's mother. She frightens me, Will. The feelings I sense from her are malevolent. They're out of proportion. They're evil.
I know she's been sick. She's very old. She's probably senile. Who knows, we could all end up that way some day.
You're right. Okay, let's get through these evaluations, and when they're done I'm going to reward myself with two ice cream sundaes.
First, molecular biology. Lieutenant Jeffrey Fratis.
Worf to Commander Riker.
Go ahead.
Can you report to Ambassador Alkar's quarters? There is an emergency.
We're on our way.
Forty cc's inaprovaline.
I'm sorry, Ambassador.
She was ill. I should never have brought her along. She was ninety three. She'd lived a long life. I should be grateful for that.
Alkar, is there anything I can do?
Counsellor, there's a funeral meditation. Part of our rituals. As an empath, you're the only person on board who could perform it with me.
I'll be glad to help.
This meditation is one of our most sacred ceremonies. Hold the stone like this. Rohm gah sevi rohm. Say after me. An end to grief.
An end to grief.
An end to pain.
An end to pain.
Strength comes from love.
Strength comes from love.
And courage from wisdom.
And courage from wisdom.
Thank you.
Computer today's appointment calendar.
Oh nine hundred hours, counselling session with Ensign Janeway. Ten hundred hours, counselling session with
Cancel them. Cancel everything till after lunch.
Acknowledged.
You wanted to see me, Doctor?
Yes, Captain. I'm sorry to bother you, but I'm a little concerned. I haven't been able to determine the cause of death. She was elderly. and Alkar said she had been ill, but I found no evidence of any disease. I did find abnormally high levels of neurotransmitter residue in her cerebral cortex.
What are you suggesting?
I'd like to do an autopsy. I've already spoken to Alkar, and he informs me that Lumerian custom forbids it. Could you speak with him?
Do you suspect that her death poses some kind of threat to the Enterprise?
Well, no.
Then we have no alternative but to concur with his wishes.
Deanna.
Hello.
Come in, please.
I thought you might like some company, if you're not too busy.
Nothing that can't wait. Would you like something to drink?
No. I'd like you to talk to me.
About?
About you. I don't know anything about you. And I'd like to.
There's not much to know. I lead a very simple life.
What kind of woman do you find attractive? Do you find me attractive?
Extremely.
And when you find someone attractive, what do you usually do?
That depends on a lot of things.
Is it really so complicated?
It can be.
Well, perhaps you over think things.
Deanna.
Yes?
I'm sorry. If I led you to believe? You are very beautiful, but our relationship can't be like that.
Deck four.
Sir.
Will.
We were supposed to finish the crew evaluation reports.
Of course. Come in.
Sir!
As you were.
Yes, sir. Thank you, sir. I was just leaving.
If there's anything else I need, I know where to find you.
Yes, ma'am.
Are you bothered by his being here?
Of course not.
Good. Because it's really none of your business.
I know that. I believe we were with Lieutenant Fratis i n molecular biology.
Why do I think you're upset?
I don't know. Could we just continue with the evaluation?
Will, remember who you're talking to. You are bothered, I can tell.
Deanna, I'm sorry I intruded. When you're ready to work, why don't you give me a call.
I will.
Captain's log, stardate 46073.6. We have arrived without incident at Rekag-Seronia, where two members of Ambassador Alkar's delegation have been waiting. They have joined us to report on the situation in the capital city.
Things have deteriorated steadily. Rekag sympathisers in outlying districts have attacked several towns.
But I was under the impression there was a cease fire agreement.
It was broken before it went into effect. A Rekag shuttle strayed into Seronian space and was destroyed by fighter craft.
Naturally, the Rekags retaliated. There's been fighting ever since.
If they would just sit down with me.
The Rekags won't go into Seronian territory for talks. And the Seronians won't go to Rekag. In the meantime, they fight.
Ambassador, the situation sounds so volatile. Perhaps a cooling off period?
These people need an end to the fighting now. To delay a week, even a few days, could cost thousands of lives.
Then I would recommend that we ask both sides if they would agree to meet in the city of Darthen.
Why Darthen?
It's a coastal city that has been neutral throughout the conflict. Both Seronians and Rekag loyalists live there. It might be acceptable as a compromise.
Contact the leaders. If they'll meet me in Darthen, I will join them there tomorrow.
I know it must be my imagination, but it seems as though Lieutenant Pinder just doesn't want me in his section.
What makes you think that?
He's so critical. I can't ever do anything to please him and I try, Counsellor, I try to make sure there's nothing he could find fault with.
Give me an example of what you mean.
Well, yesterday I was running routine diagnostics on the sensor pallets. They checked out, but Lieutenant Pinder questioned me because I'd allowed a point oh two three variance. That's well within specifications. He goes out of his way to criticise me.
Do you know of any reason why he might do that?
No, that's why I'm here.
Well, maybe he's just tired of hearing you complain.
Pardon me?
I know I'm certainly tired of it. How do you think it feels to sit and listen to someone whine about themselves all the time?
I didn't realise I was
This isn't Starfleet Academy. You're not going to be coddled. If you can't take it here, then you might think about a transport ship. There's a lot less pressure there.
But I love being on the Enterprise I don't want to be anywhere else.
If you aren't up to it then you don't deserve to be here. Isn't that right?
I guess so.
So you'd better take a hold of yourself, or be prepared for a transfer.
I will, Counsellor. Thank you.
Glad I could help.
Yeah, here we go. Biofilter log on Sev Maylor.
Geordi, could this log have been damaged in any way?
I don't think so. Why do you ask?
There's a discrepancy between the log and the tricorder readings I took just three days later. The tricorder shows massive physiological deterioration compared with her condition when she beamed aboard. I find it hard to believe that so much damage could have occurred in such a short period of time.
Well I can run a diagnostic of the biofilter system and your tricorder.
Thanks. Of course, the best way to get the information I need would be to do an autopsy.
Ambassador? We've received word from the Seronian and the Rekag delegates. They've agreed to meet with you in Darthen tomorrow.
Thank you, Commander.
Counsellor Troi has altered her appearance.
Am I interrupting?
Hello, Counsellor.
You want him. I can tell. But you have nothing to give him.
Deanna, could I talk to you in private.
And you. You're envious of him. You pretend to support him, but secretly you want him to fail.
That's not so.
Please, you must return to your quarters.
I won't. I want to be here, with you.
Ambassador, the Counsellor and I are needed on the Bridge.
Of course, Commander.
I don't know what you thought you were doing in there, but you were way out of line.
Deck nine.
All right, Deanna, just what the hell is all this?
Imzadi, do you still care about me?
Of course I care about you. I'm worried about you. What's all this?
Don't you think I'm attractive?
This just isn't you.
Oh, it is. You want me, don't you?
Deanna.
I need you.
What is this?
Please!
Come in.
Deanna, I'm leaving for the surface.
You said you'd take me with you.
I know, but that's not possible now.
You told me I'd be helpful. You needed me.
And I still do. You've done so much for me.
Then take me. Don't leave me here. Is Liva going with you?
She's been on Seronia for weeks. She knows the people, the situation.
She wants to take you away from me.
Deanna, you are my anchor. I need you more than you can possibly realise. Do you understand that? I need you here, making it possible for me to do my work.
I won't let her have you! I'll stop her!  I will go with you. Take me with you. Please, Alkar. Don't leave me. Don't do this! No!
You wouldn't have recognised her. Her dress, her hair, everything about her. I'm closer to Deanna than I've ever been to anyone, but last night she was someone that I had never seen before.
And you don't know of anything that might have caused her to behave like that?
No. I've thought and thought about it. I don't have an answer.
Computer, location of Counsellor Troi.
Deck six, corridor B.
Let's go.
Ambassador, I came to alert you that the Rekags and the Seronians are in disagreement about the seating arrangements at the conference table.
I'm not surprised.
The good news, however, is that the cease fire seems to be holding.
And that is by far the best news. Thank you, Captain.
Chief.
Will you take me with you?
Deanna?
Deanna, I've already told you I can't
I won't let her have you
Security to Transporter room two.
Don't try and stop me! No, no, let go!
It's nothing, it's superficial. What happened to Deanna?
All of the systems in her body have elevated readings. Take her to Sickbay. I want to see you in Sickbay too.
Captain, perhaps we should delay transporting to the surface.
No. You should proceed with your mission.
Very well.
Chief, transport them to the planet surface.
Aye, sir.
We'll have to sedate her. Twenty cc's of melorazine.
Yes, Doctor.
How's it feeling?
It's a little stiff, but it'll be fine.
It'll disappear in a day or two.
Doctor Crusher? I think you should see these readings, Doctor. Her neurotransmitter levels are three hundred percent above normal.
If you remember, I found extremely high levels of neurotransmitter residue in Alkar's mother.
Could Deanna have picked up some kind of disease from her?
I don't know. I need to do that autopsy. I don't care about the customs of Alkar's people. I need to find out if there's a connection between what killed Maylor and what's happening to Troi.
Picard to Lieutenant Worf.
Worf here, Captain.
Mister Worf, contact Ambassador Alkar. I need to speak with him.
Doctor, neural energy is now three hundred forty percent above normal.
Captain, Ambassador Alkar is at the negotiation table and cannot be disturbed.
Proceed with the autopsy.
Medical Officer:Medical log, stardate 46075.1. I have performed an autopsy on Alkar's mother, but instead of answering our questions, the results have created an even deeper mystery.
I don't have any explanation for this. When I examined Maylor's body, I found her heart, her lungs, her skeletal structure, most of the systems in her body were those of a thirty year old.
But how could that be? We both saw the woman.
That's not all. I compared Maylor and Alkar's DNA. I don't know who that woman was, but she was definitely not his mother. Deanna's condition is deteriorating rapidly. She could die. There are questions that only Alkar can answer.
Picard to Lieutenant Worf.
Worf here, Captain.
Meet me in Transporter room two. We're going down to the surface.
Aye, sir.
No, she wasn't my mother.
And she wasn't ninety three years old.
Captain, did you perform an autopsy against my wishes?
Yes, for a very good reason. Counsellor Deanna Troi is in Sickbay, dying. Doctor Crusher doesn't know the cause of her condition, but I believe you do.
Alkar, we need you. The Rekags have withdrawn some of their concessions and the Seronians are threatening to break off the talks.
I'll be right there.
But
They've been arguing for hours in there. It seems hopeless. But now, when expectations are lowest, now is the moment I can be most effective. If I'm focused, centred, free of disquieting thoughts, I can turn these factions toward peace.
Alkar
Hear me out, Captain. It's important you understand. You see, I discovered long ago I had the ability to channel my darker thoughts, my unwanted emotions, to others, leaving me unencumbered.
Is this what you've done to Counsellor Troi?
I hadn't planned it. I'd expected Maylor to live through the negotiation. Her death could not have been more untimely.
So then you deliberately used Deanna.
She's an empath. I was reasonably certain I could establish a link with her. Frankly, I was amazed when I saw how quickly she'd aged. Usually my receptacles survive for years.
Receptacles?
Come now, Captain. Surely you can see there's a broader canvas here. If I came to these peace talks hindered by unwanted emotions, the Rekags and Seronians would be condemned to go on fighting
You cannot explain away a wantonly immoral act because you think it is connected to some higher purpose.
Captain. do you know how many people have died on this planet in the last forty eight hours? Thousands. Deanna Troi is just one individual.
That does not justify brutalising her, nor any of the others you have used.
Ask the Seronian and Rekag children who go to bed each night in fear of their lives. Captain, I get no payment, I have no power base, no agenda. I am willing to risk my life simply to help others.
Do you think that makes you appear courageous? Because you're mistaken. You're a coward, Alkar. You exploit the innocent because you're unwilling to shoulder the burdens of unpleasant emotions. Well, this time you will be held accountable. I'm taking you back to the Enterprise to release Counsellor Troi.
I have no intention of releasing her now or ever.
Alkar, everything is falling apart. You have to come now.
If you'll excuse me, Captain.
Mister Worf.
I'm needed.
You and your Security Chief will leave.
Lock on to Alkar's signal. Bring him on board.
Captain, I am sure the Seronians have re-activated their security field.
Then work with Mister La Forge to find a way to break through it. I want that man on this ship.
Aye, sir.
I'll be in Sickbay.
If Alkar is flooding her with this psychic waste, that would explain the high level of neurotransmitters. All these negative emotions pouring into her have caused an abnormal chemical response in her brain.
Isn't there something you can do to counteract it?
Enzymic decontaminants will be able to reduce the level of the neurotransmitters, but I can't make any headway unless Alkar stops what he's doing.
He has no intention of stopping. He feels perfectly justified in using her until she dies.
Then Deanna has to die. In order to save Deanna, Alkar has to break his link with her. And the only he'll do that is if she's no longer an adequate receptacle. When Maylor died, Alkar turned immediately to Deanna.
If Deanna dies, and he breaks the link with her, then he will choose someone else, possibly someone from his own delegation.
Wait a minute. You're talking about killing Deanna!
I'll be able to resuscitate her, Will, as long as it's not more than thirty minutes. The big question is, will that be enough time? Alkar has to establish a link with someone else before we revive Deanna, or else he might turn back to her.
We must bear in mind that we'll be putting his next victim at risk. I want every possible security measure taken to protect that person.
How will you?
I'll give her a hypospray of dylamadon. It's the gentlest way.
Proceed, Doctor.
Well, my friend, an era of conflict and bloodshed appears to be over.
Alkar.
What is it?
I'm fine. Just a little light-headed.
You're exhausted.
Do you want a doctor?
No of course not.
Enterprise to Ambassador Alkar. Respond, sir.
I'm here, Captain.
Ambassador, You must return to the Enterprise immediately. Counsellor Troi is dying.
We are prepared to transport you from the surface whether you come willingly or not.
There are security force fields protecting us, Captain.
They won't protect you any longer.
Transporter room two, prepare to energise.
We're ready, Captain.
Computer, make a note. Death occurred at fourteen thirty hours from respiratory and renal failure.
Will you wait for me in my quarters?
Of course.
It's a tragic loss, but her death had a purpose.
I intend to make certain that you answer for what you have done.
Your own Federation Council has granted me safe and timely passage back to my planet. I expect you to honour that, Captain.
How much longer do we have?
Three minutes and forty seconds.
Picard to Transporter Room Two lock on to the young woman in Ambassador Alkar's quarters. We may have to transport her out of there.
Yes, Captain.
Mister Worf, I want you to station yourself outside her quarters.
Aye, sir.
She helped me so much. Without her, I couldn't have accomplished what I did.
I'm so sorry. Is there anything I can do?
Yes, there is something. If we could share the funeral meditation.
We have a minute and a half left. Prepare a hypospray of cordrazine. We'll use that in conjunction with the cortical stimulator.
Yes, Doctor.
Rohm gah sevi rohm. Rohm gah.
Rohm gah sevi rohm. Rohm gah.
We can't wait any longer. Release the stasis field. Ten cc's of cordrazine.
Yes, doctor.
Ten cc's cordrazine. Cortical stimulators. Now.
An end  An end to pain.
An end to pain.
Again.
She has a pulse. Blood pressure climbing. Ninety over forty. Cortical activity approaching normal levels.
Let's neutralise the neurotransmitters. Initiate decontamination sequence.
Levels are dropping, Doctor. Down to four hundred and twenty percent above normal. Three hundred and ninety percent.
Picard to Transporter room three
Not yet. We won't know if it's working till the levels are below three hundred percent.
Alkar! Alkar, what's wrong?
Neurotransmitter levels are down to three hundred and ten percent. Two hundred and ninety percent.
Now.
Picard to Transporter room three, energise.
Let me go!
Neurotransmitter levels are down to two hundred and thirty percent.
Worf to Captain Picard. Ambassador Alkar is dead.
Will.
Beverly thinks Alkar must have been at a susceptible point in the meditation ceremony. He was vulnerable.
Then the flow of negative emotions and feelings were reversed back to him somehow.
That's our guess. Like a man with no immune system, he wasn't able to handle the overload.
And Liva?
She seems to be fine. He wasn't able to establish a link on her.
Looking back on the past few days, it's as though I'm looking at a holodeck projection of someone else.
That's how it seemed to all of us.
Thanks for sticking by me.
I always will. Even when you're old and grey.
Number One, will you join me in the Ready room?
Yes, sir.
I've just come from a meeting with Admiral Moore. He wanted to discuss this.
Recognise it?
Sounds like it might be an SOS.
Good guess. You're quicker than Starbase research. It took them hours to determine this was a distress beacon.
When was it detected?
Last month. Just kicked in without any warning.
Who used the beacon?
It's Terran.
Captain, I'm familiar with most Earth codes, and
Interesting. Yes, that code hasn't been used in centuries.
What was its origin point?
Ficus sector.
Captain, I don't think there's any record of an Earth colony in that area.
Now we know there's someone out there and they're asking for help.
But who?
Let's try and find out. Computer, download all information regarding signal beacon from Starbase mainframe.
Distress beacon used by the European Hegemony.
The European Hegemony?
A loose alliance formed in the early part of the twenty second century. It was the first stirrings of world government. You should read more history, Number One. Computer, locate exact dates in which this signal beacon was in general use.
Old Earth calendar, 2123 until 2190.
No extraterrestrial source ever used this code?
Negative.
Locate all Earth deep space launches from 2123 until 2190, with a destination in or near the Ficus sector.
Working.
Nothing for Ficus.
Damn it, who's out there?
Lost sheep.
Let's go see if we can find them.
Medical emergency. Doctor Pulaski to the Bridge.
What happened?
He just collapsed, sir.
Captain's log, stardate 42823.2. We're departing from Starbase Seven Three to investigate the source of the mysterious distress signal. Meanwhile, my Security Officer remains in Sickbay, where Doctor Pulaski is searching for the cause of his collapse.
I am fine.
You're not fine. You fainted.
I did not faint. Klingons do not faint.
Excuse me, I'll rephrase. This Klingon suffered a dramatic drop in blood pressure, his blood glucose level dropped, there was deficient blood flow resulting from circulatory failure. In other words, he curled up his toes and laid unconscious on the floor.
Doctor, there is no need to insult me.
Worf, I am worried. Now, something is wrong. Klingons don't faint. Forgive me. I just can't think of another word that applies. You're sick.
Klingons do not give in to illness.
Just stay right where you are. I have to check something with the computer. Lieutenant, you have rop'ngor.
But that is a childhood ailment!
Yes.
How shall I live down the humiliation?
Worf, you can't help.
Still, for a warrior to find himself in such a situation.
So you've got the Klingon version of the measles.
How would Commander Riker feel if he had the measles.
Pretty silly.
Doctor Pulaski, how is Lieutenant Worf?
He's in no danger. Worf was just observing a Klingon ritual involving fasting, and he didn't take into account that you have to decrease your physical activity as you decrease your caloric intake. Pulaski out.
Thank you. I am in your debt.
Come.
Captain, I have been considering the problem of the missing ship. Although there is no record of a launch to the Ficus sector, which would not be unusual considering the chaos of the early twenty second century, someone had to load that ship.
The manifest.
Yes, sir.
There it is. SS Mariposa, loaded 27th November, 2123. Destination Ficus sector. Captain Walter Granger, commanding.
Mariposa. The Spanish word for butterfly.
Thank you, Data.
I thought it might be significant, sir.
It doesn't appear to be, Data.
No, sir.
You learn a lot about people from their luggage. Two hundred and twenty five Yoshimitsu computers, five monitor beacon satellites, seven hundred cellular commlinks, fifty spinning wheels.
Spinning wheels? Accessing. A device for spinning yarn or thread that consists of a large foot or hand driven wheel and one spindle.
Cattle, chickens, pigs. Not DNA, the actual livestock. Incredible. Why would anyone carry such an insane mix of cargo?
Spindle, a thin rounded tapering rod
Data!
Perhaps they were planning for the worst, sir.
Theorise, Data. Give me some background.
In the early twenty-second century, Earth was recovering from World War Three. A major philosopher of the period was Liam Dieghan, founder of the Neo-Transcendentalists, who advocated a return to a simpler life in which one lived in harmony with nature, and learned under her gentle tutelage
Thank you, Data. But if this was a ship full of utopians, why carry all this technological baggage?
I have insufficient information from which to form a cogent theory, sir.
Doctor. I wished to thank you for protecting my
Your secret is safe with me. Worf, I'm honoured. No one has ever performed the Klingon tea ceremony for me.
There, that should do it.
You know the ceremony?
I understand the externals, not the mysteries. I'm not a Klingon.
You must not drink the tea. It is deadly to humans.
And none too good for Klingons.
It is a test of bravery, of one's ability to look at the face of mortality. It is also a reminder that death is an experience best shared, like the tea.
Worf, you're a romantic.
It is among the Klingons that love poetry achieves its fullest flower.
Hold that thought.
Antidote. If we're going to share, let's share.  Now, quote me a little of that poetry.
Initiate sensor sweeps.
Aye, sir. The system's sun has entered a period of severe flare activity.
Now we know what triggered the SOS.
Class M readings from the fifth planet in the system.
Take us in.
Shields at maximum.
Sensors indicate human life form readings thirty metres below the planet's surface.
Hailing on all frequencies. No response so far, but the flares may be interfering with communications.
There is no evidence of an advanced communication network.
They brought a lot of technology. Where is it?
There is no artificial power source on the planet.
The stellar flares are increasing in magnitude and frequency. Computer projections indicate they will brush the planet in three point six hours.
Evacuation will be difficult. We can lower our shields for transport only between the flares.
Captain, these people have been isolated for three hundred years. They could be very unsophisticated. The shock of suddenly being transported onto a spaceship could frighten them, to say the least.
Your point is well taken, Counsellor. Number One, you're going to have to go down there.
On my way.
Captain's log, stardate 42827.3. Commander Riker has reached the caverns, where he is making preparations to begin the evacuation.
What's the situation, Number One?
There are roughly two hundred people down here.
Their condition?
Surprisingly good.
Are they willing to leave?
Yes, but
Well, get them up here.
I'm having a little debate with the colony's leader. It seems
There's no time, Number One. Initiate the transport.
But, sir
Whatever the problem, we'll handle it up here.
Aye, aye, sir, we're on our way. All of us. Riker out.
First load ready, Mister O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Energising.
O'BRIEN:Captain, you'd better get somebody down here. Right away.
Take the pig out there, will you? Very good.
O'Brien, I think that third wave should be in position.
Shoo, damn you, shoo.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
O'Brien, is it?  I should have known t'would be a good Irishman that was running this ship.
What the devil is going on here, Number One?
Ah, Captain Picard is it. The man who makes decisions for me and mine without so much as a by your leave.
This is my Security Chief, Lieutenant Worf.
I don't suppose security is much of a problem for you. Danilo Odell, sir, at your service.
What are these animals doing here, Number One.
I'm sorry, sir. It was either this or arguing till hell froze over.
Captain Picard, sir, we can't leave our animals here to die. Besides, how could we build our future without our animals?
All right. Chief O'Brien, transport this group directly to cargo hold seven, and beam the remaining refugees from the planet directly to that hold.
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir.
Right, lads. Everybody back onto the infernal machine.
Everybody up here.
Captain! Captain, t'was very good of you, sir, to rescue us from our troubles.
My pleasure.
Sir, you must be worth quite a bit to own a fine ship like this.
I don't own the Enterprise, I command her.
Whatever. Sir, would you happen to be married?
No. Why?
No? Well, you see, sir, I have a daughter.
Felicitations.
Would you be interested, sir?
No.
You're quite sure?
Quite sure.
He's quite sure.
What's the total?
Two hundred and twenty three.
Count on two more in the next few days.
Set course for the nearest starbase.
You know, they were anachronistic in 2123. It will be interesting to see how they cope.
They'll learn and adapt. If Danilo Odell's any indication, they'll be running this place inside of a week.
Lieutenant Worf, here. Report.
Fire in cargo hold seven.
The Bringloidi.
What have they done to my ship now?
Keep the area clear.
Report.
Fire has been contained. No damage.
Unseal the doors.
My God, Picard, the place is a bloody death trap! Lightning bolts falling from the ceiling!
What the hell was that thing?
Automated fire system. A force field contains the flame until the remaining oxygen within the field has been consumed.
What if I had been under that thing?
You would have been standing in the fire.
Well, leaving that aside for the moment, I mean, what would have happened to me?
You would have suffocated and died.
Sweet mercy.
Oh, there you are. Your hospitality leaves a hell of a lot to be desired! You don't offer us a bite or a sup, and when we build a fire to cook a little something, the place goes mad!
My apologies. I was unaware that you had not been instructed in the use of the food dispensers.
And what are you staring at? Have you never seen a woman before?
I thought I had.
Commander, may I present my daughter, Brenna Odell.
Pleased to meet you, ma'am.
You may have all the time in the world, but I've dozens of frightened and hungry children and women to look after.
And what about the men?
Well, I'm sure they'll find their comfort as they always do, in the bottom of a mug of home brew!
Pay no heed, Commander. She's a fine girl. She's not usually so sharp tongued.
Dado!
Sir?  That's the last thing I expected.
Sometimes, Number One, you just have to bow to the absurd.
Captain, Captain, sir. How did the ship sense the fire?
The ship's computer
Computer?
The ship's computers sense a localised increase
Men! Always talking when there's work to be done. And shouldn't you be flying this ship, or whatever it is you do?
Sir, I think I'll stay and give her some help.
That isn't necessary. The ship will clean itself.
Well, good for the bloody ship.  Tell me, Commander Riker, where does a girl go to wash her feet on this ship?
As the First Officer, I feel it's my responsibility to show you all the amenities.
She is very like a Klingon woman.
Ah, Captain, there's just one other thing. It slipped my mind in all the hustle and bustle.
The point, Mister Odell.
Well, in all your travels, have you heard anything from the other colony?
The other colony?
Captain's log, supplemental. A review of stellar charts has revealed a Class M planet only half a light year from the Bringloid system. I am proceeding on the premise that it was the destination of the colony which possessed the more sophisticated equipment.
William Riker, you're a mess.
You don't have to do that.
And if I don't, who will?
I can see why your father wants to marry you off.
Oh, and why is that?
So he can have a pipe and mug of beer in peace.
You've shown me so many wonders on your great ship, but there's still one thing you haven't shown me.
What's that?
I'm still waiting to wash my feet.
Right behind that door.
William, is something wrong?
What do you mean?
Do you not like girls?
Of course I do. Oh, is there a technique to this foot washing?
You generally start at the top and work your way down.
I think I can handle that.
I was hoping you might.
You sent for me?
Ah, yes, yes. Now, we're brewing poteen, but we need to find a way to heat it without this bloody ship firing bloody lightning bolts at us.
You can obtain spirituous liquours from the food dispensers.
Oh, no, no, no. It's not that synthehol bilge that O'Brien offered me, is it?
No, if you wish, it can be real alcohol.
Good.
With all of the deleterious effects intact.
As it should be. You see, lad, every moment of pleasure in life has to be purchased by an equal moment of pain. Whiskey.
Terrible. It's got no bite.
Chech'tluth.
Now that's what I call a wee drop of the creature.
Father!
Remember what I said about the moment of pain? Well, tis about to begin. Hello, my darling.
Oh, my darling, is it? I might have known! Are you drunk yet, or can you talk with Doctor Pulaski about the children?
What about them?
She wants to send them to school with the ship's children.
What do you think?
I think it's a good idea. So go handle it!  I'm sure there's something you can be doing with your time.  And as for you.
What?
Why did you have to tell them that this magic wall can give them more than meat and potatoes? Now we'll never get a lick of work out of them.
Madam, have you considered a career in security?
If it's anything like babysitting, I'm an authority.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are approaching the class M planet where we hope to find the other colonists.
Signal from the planet, Captain.
On screen. This is Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise, representing the United Federation of Planets.
This is wonderful. Welcome, Captain. I'm Wilson Granger, Prime Minister of Mariposa.
No doubt a descendant of Captain Walter Granger.
Not quite a descendant. We feared Earth had suffered some catastrophe when no one came back to check on us.
I'm afraid the truth is, you got lost in the bureaucracy. But despite the lateness of our arrival, we're here now and we're eager to renew ties.
Splendid. Please, come down, and allow us to extend our hospitality to you and your crew.
Thank you. Form an away team, Number One.
I would urge caution.
Caution? What's wrong?
He's hiding something.
We'll check it out. Mister Worf. Doctor Pulaski, join us in Transporter room three for an away detail.
GRANGER 2:Welcome to Mariposa. I'm Victor Granger, Minister of Health.
Commander William Riker, Doctor Pulaski, Lieutenant Worf.
GRANGER 2:A pleasure. I'll escort you to the Prime Minister. This way please.
Twin brothers?
GRANGER 2:Your arrival really is serendipitous.
Oh, how so?
GRANGER 2:Well, perhaps I'll let the Prime Minister to explain that.
Triplets? Worf, there is something damn odd down here.
Quadruplets.
GRANGER 2:Doctor, is your title scientific or medical?
Medical.
GRANGER 2:Ah, excellent.
Is there some medical problem we should know about?
GRANGER 2:I think it best if the, er
Prime minister explains that. Somehow I thought you might.
GRANGER 2:Yes. Excuse me. Gentlemen? Please, follow me.
GRANGER 2:This way please. Doctor.
Welcome to Mariposa.
Doctor Katherine Pulaski.
This is my Chief of Staff, Elizabeth Vallis.
Tell me, is your entire population made up of clones, Prime Minister?
Clones?
Clones?
Clones.
Captain's log, supplemental. Prime Minister Granger has requested an urgent meeting to discuss the future of the Mariposan colony. I've invited him to the Enterprise.
Captain, we need your help. Three hundred years ago during our landing on Mariposa, the skin of our ship was breached. Only five of the colonists survived. The progenitors weren't willing to just give up and die, and they were scientists
So, they used that expertise and turned to cloning.
Yes. We had no other option. Two women and three men represented an insufficient gene pool from which to build a society.
How did you suppress the natural sexual drive? Drugs? Punitive laws?
In the beginning, a little bit of each. Now, after three hundred years, the entire concept of sexual reproduction is a little repugnant to us.
How did you overcome the problem of replicative fading?
We haven't.
You have got a problem.
Wait. I don't understand replicative fading.
Each time you clone, you're making a copy of a copy. Subtle errors creep into the chromosomes, and eventually you end up with a non-viable clone.
How can we help you?
We need an infusion of fresh DNA. I was hoping that you would be willing to share some tissue samples.
You want to clone us?
Yes.
No way, not me.
How can you possibly be harmed?
It's not a question of harm. One William Riker is unique, perhaps even special. But a hundred of him, a thousand of him diminishes me in ways I can't even imagine.
You would be preserving yourself.
Human beings have other ways of doing that. We have children.
I think you will find that attitude prevalent among all the Enterprise people.
I see. Well, if you are not willing to share your DNA, will you at least send some people to repair our malfunctioning equipment?
Yes, of course. Number One, put a technical team together. Let's get these repairs underway.
Yes, sir. Lieutenant La Forge. Prepare a technical support away team. Meet me in transporter room three.
Captain, with your permission, I would like to return to the planet. It could be my last opportunity to study replicative fading. With your permission, of course, Mister Prime Minister.
You'd be most welcome. Perhaps you will find a solution that we have overlooked.
Well, I appreciate the compliment, but I don't think that's very likely. And repairing that equipment will certainly not solve your problems.
What other solution do we have? Doctor, remember, there are only five of us.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander Riker and Doctor Pulaski have returned to Mariposa with a team of Enterprise technicians.
The repairs are almost complete. I wish there was something more we could do.
Are you sure you won't reconsider?
About the cloning?
Yes.
Out of the question.
Excuse me, sir, I was looking for Commander Riker.
I'm afraid I haven't seen him.
Doctor Pulaski?
Sorry, I can't help you.
Well, I guess I'll just have to hunt for them. Sorry to disturb you.
Hey. So what happened to you two down on Mariposa? Is everything all right?
Is there any reason why it shouldn't be?
Yeah. Every time I asked where you were, some clone lied to me.
Lied to you?
Commander, with this I can see better than your average person. Now when someone lies there are certain physical manifestations. Variations in blush response, pupil dilation, pulse, breath rate. Doesn't always work with aliens, but humans? Got'em nailed.
The clones lied about our whereabouts? I don't remember anything happening. I was working in their medical facility and got a call to report to Granger's office. I ran into Will on the way
Now wait a minute. Granger said he hadn't seen either one of you. Did you make it to his office?
I think, I don't remember.
So what's the prognosis, Doc?
Geordi, you'll be pleased to know that you're not missing any epithelial cells.
Great.
Will and I, however, are.
Meaning?
Although you can clone from any cell in the body, the cells lining the stomach are the best choice because they're relatively undifferentiated.
Where are you going?
To their cloning lab.
Stop! Murderers!
Like hell! You're a damn thief!
Gentlemen, please.
What else could we do? We asked for your help and you refused us. We're desperate. Desperate!
And that gave you the right to assault us, to rob us.
We have the right to survive!
Doctor, how desperate is the colony's situation?
They've got two or three generations, then the fading will be terminal. They're among the walking dead now. They just haven't been buried.
I want the cloning equipment inspected. Who knows how many tissue samples were stolen. We certainly have a right to exercise control over our own bodies.
You'll get no argument from me.
I know the Mariposan culture seems alien, even frightening, but really, we do have much in common. They're human beings fighting for survival. Would we do any less?
Are you saying we should give them the DNA samples they require?
That's just postponing the inevitable. If they get an infusion of fresh DNA, in fifteen generations they'll just go back to the same problems. Cloning isn't the answer. What they need is breeding stock.
The Bringloidi.
Yes. They have the energy and drive, and the clones possess the emotional maturity and the technological knowledge.
They started out together. It seems only fitting they should end up together.
It's a match made in heaven.
Unfortunately it will have to be a shotgun wedding.
I'm sorry, Captain, it's out of the question. You're trying to dump your problems on us. We have problems of our own.
Don't you understand? The Bringloidi can help you.
Look at him. How could we ever integrate that into our society?
You're no prize yourself.
Primitive, hostile, disruptive. It would require enormous effort to even educate them.
Oh, forget it, Captain Picard. I'm not going to come in here with my hat in my hand begging charity from this blatherskite.
Now stop! I will not allow posturing and bigotry to destroy this meeting. Now please, sit down. Now, Commander Riker has asked that your laboratories be inspected for stolen tissue samples, and I understand his concern. We may have to transport all your equipment here, to the Enterprise.
I see. When reason fails, you'll resort to blackmail.
Fine. Destroy yourselves.
It's not so bad, Captain. In fifty years we'll have a new class M planet, complete with cities, and ready for colonisation.
You see, the end is closer than you like to think.
I don't know. There are so many difficulties.
Look, man. We are decent, hard working people. We're willing to learn.
They're so different.
It is the differences that have made us strong.
For three hundred years, we have denied the carnal side of our nature. How can we learn to put that aside?
Well, you put a young couple together and you let nature take its course.
Now if this is going to work, you're going to have to alter your society, too. Monogamous marriage will not be possible for several generations.
I don't quite understand.
Thirty couples are enough to create a viable genetic base. But the broader the base the healthier and the safer the society. So it will be best if each woman, Bringloidi and Mariposan, had at least three children by three different men.
I think I could handle that, yes.
Oh, God, it's so
Frightening?
Repugnant.
So, it's a done deal? And here's my hand on it.  Right, now, let's go and stake out my three women. Send in the clones.
I must be out of my mind.
Starfleet will probably agree with you.
Excuse me, sir. Captain. Thank you. Brenna. Brenna, a word.
Isn't that just like a man! You make these grandiose decisions, but you never stop to consider the poor women.
Miss Odell, I
You men draw a mug, and solve all the problems of the world while the beer goes down, but, when it comes to the practical matters, it always falls to the women to make your grand dreams come true.
Miss Odell, you were the one who wanted a new home.
But I don't know if I want to be Eve.
It's your choice. If you wish, you can stay on the Enterprise. We will drop you at a starbase, then you can go where you wish.
Leave my da?
If this is going to work, these people will need your strength, your guidance.
Oh, damn. What does he do again?
Prime Minister.
Sounds important.
Oh, it is.
Sounds like he might have more than two coins to rub together. Three husbands?
You are hereby requested and required to relinquish command of your vessel to Captain Edward Jellico, Commanding Officer USS Cairo, as of this date.
I want this ship ready for action, and I don't have time to give Will Riker or any one else a chance. And forgive me for being blunt, but the Enterprise is mine now.
Our orders are to penetrate the Celtris Three installation.
It's a trap. Come on!
Let's go.
The Captain!
No! There are five more of them heading this way from another tunnel.
You should prove an interesting challenge. Possibly the most interesting to come through that door in many years.
What do you want?
Why, you, of course.
Your place of birth?
La Barre, France.
Mother's name?
Yvette Gessard.
He's ready. Keep the serum at that level. What is your current assignment?
Special operations on Celtris Three.
What is your mission on Celtris Three?
To seek and destroy a metagenic weapon.
How many others were part of this mission?
Two.
Name and rank?
Chief Medical Officer Beverly Crusher. Lieutenant Worf.
What are the Federation's defence plans for Minos Korva?
I don't know.
Increase the level slightly to point three one. Let's begin again, shall we? Name?
Picard, Jean-Luc.
Place of birth?
La Barre, France.
Captain's log, stardate 46360.8. The negotiations with the Cardassians have made little progress. I believe a military confrontation may be unavoidable.
Gul Lemec, I assure you that what the Federation wants above all, is the preservation of peace.
Then how do you explain the fact that a Federation team launched an unprovoked assault on Cardassian territory less than fourteen hours ago?
I don't know what you're talking about.
Then let me explain. Captain Jean-Luc Picard, Lieutenant Worf, and Doctor Beverly Crusher landed on Celtris Three, attacked one of our outposts in a brutal assault, and killed over fifty five men, women and children.
What evidence do you have of that?
We have all the evidence we need. We have Captain Picard.
Is he alive?
The Cardassian Union has yet to decided how it will respond to this latest provocation. But rest assured, we will respond.
Is there any truth in what he's saying?
Captain Picard and the others were sent to investigate reports of a metagenic weapon on Celtris Three. It's possible that they may have been captured. But if they did escape, they'll head for the Lyshan system. The Enterprise is supposed to meet them there in eight hours. Will, I want you to take a shuttlecraft and head for the rendezvous point. The Enterprise will have to remain here until the endgame with Gul Lemec is played out.
Aye, sir.
Captain Picard.
I demand to see a neutral representative as required by the Federation-Cardassian peace treaty.
We have already sent a message to Tohvun Three, the nearest neutral planet. They assure us they will dispatch someone immediately. Will you allow me to remove your restraints?  I understand that you are a student of archaeology. Did you know that Cardassia boasts some of the most ancient and splendid ruins in the entire galaxy?
I know that the burial vaults of the First Hebitian civilisation are said to be magnificent.
Apparently when they were first unearthed two hundred years ago, they were. The burial vaults contained unimaginably beautiful artefacts made of jevonite, a rare, breathtaking stone. But most of those objects are gone.
What happened to them?
What happens to impoverished societies. The tombs were plundered, priceless treasures stolen, a few were preserved in museums but even those were eventually sold in order to pay for our war efforts.
That war cost you hundreds of thousands of lives. It depleted your food supplies, left your population weakened and miserable and yet you risk another war.
Let's not waste time arguing about issues we can't resolve. Would you care to tour the Hebitian burial vaults?
What I would like is to be returned to my ship.
My dear Captain, you are a criminal. You have been apprehended invading one of our secret facilities. The least that will happen is for you to stand trial and be punished. But I am offering you the opportunity for that experience to be civilised.
What is the price of that opportunity?
Cooperation. We need to know the Federation's defence strategy for Minos Korva.
You've injected me with drugs. Surely you must realise that I've already answered truthfully every question you've put to me.
Captain, we have gone to great lengths to lure you here because we know that in the event of an invasion, the Enterprise will be the command ship for the sector encompassing Minos Korva.
Then it seems you have more knowledge of the situation than I.
Wasted energy, Captain. You might come to wish you hadn't expended it in such a futile effort.
Torture is expressly forbidden by the terms of the Seldonis Four convention governing treatment of prisoners of war.
Are you in good health? Do you have any physical ailments I should know about?  Beautiful, isn't it? The stone is jevonite. And now you know why it is so highly prized. From this point on, you will enjoy no privilege of rank, no privileges of person. From now on, I will refer to you only as human. You have no other identity.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. I have returned from the rendezvous point in the Lyshan system with Doctor Crusher and Lieutenant Worf. Captain Picard's fate is still unknown.
There was no chance to go back for the Captain. We barely made it back to the Ferengi cargo ship ourselves.
You were smart not to try.
I don't feel so smart.
Get some rest, Doctor. Will.
I want Geordi to analyse the readings from Beverly's tricorder. Tell him to scrutinize every detail of those caverns on Celtris Three.
Aye, sir. Request permission to begin planning a rescue operation.
I know you were close to him, Will, but we don't even know if he's still alive. Under the circumstances, a rescue mission would be foolhardy.
Shouldn't we assume that he is alive until it's been proved otherwise? We cannot just abandon him.
He's gone. I'm sorry, Will, but you're going to have to accept that. I want those tricorder readings analysed by fourteen hundred hours.
Yes, sir.
Good morning. I trust you slept well?
Thirsty? I would imagine so. Well, It's time to move on.
I've told you all that I know.
Yes, I'm sure you have.  How many lights do you see there?
I see four lights.
No, there are five. Are you quite sure?
There are four lights.
Perhaps you're aware of the incision on your chest. While you were under the influence of our drugs, you were implanted with a small device. It's a remarkable invention. By entering commands in this PADD, I can produce pain in any part of your body at various levels of severity. Forgive me. I don't enjoy this but I must demonstrate. It will make everything clearer.
Surprising, isn't it? Most people feel at first that they can steel themselves against it but they're completely unprepared for the intensity of the pain. That was the lowest possible setting.
I know nothing about Minos Korva.
But I've told you that I believe you. I didn't ask you about Minos Korva. I asked how many lights you see.
There are four lights.
I don't understand how you can be so mistaken.
What is your current assignment?
Special operations on Celtris Three.
Do you have anything to say?
Captain Picard was not acting under my orders.
And if we wish to execute him?
Under the terms of the Selonis Convention, Captain Picard must
The Selonis Convention applies to prisoners of war, which means you would have to acknowledge that he was captured during a mission authorised by the Federation. Are you willing to make such an admission?
No.
Then he will be treated as a terrorist.
It's not my concern.
There is, of course, an alternative.
I'm listening.
If the Federation agreed to a complete and immediate withdrawal from this sector, then we would be disposed to release Captain Picard and forget about this incident.
I'll have to discuss this with my superiors.
Of course. You have seven hours.
What are you going to do?
Send a message to Admiral Necheyev. I recommend that she reject Lemec's proposal and deploy additional starships along the border.
What about Captain Picard?
I'm not suggesting you trade an entire star system for one man's life, but you've got to acknowledge that these were Federation orders and he is a prisoner of war.
No.
He will have the protection of the Seldonis Convention.
That would play right into Gul Lemec's hand. He's just waiting for some sign of weakness on our part before he starts making more demands.
I can't believe you're willing to sacrifice Captain Picard's life as a negotiating tactic.
Will! Captain, we're all concerned about
Are you questioning my judgment, Commander?
As First Officer, it is my responsibility to point out any actions that may be mistakes by a commanding officer. sir.
Then maybe it's time you found other responsibilities. You're relieved. Don't make me confine you to quarters as well.
Sir.
They went to a lot of trouble to lure a Federation team to that planet. Why?
It is possible that the Cardassians were specifically interested in capturing Captain Picard.
Why do you say that?
The metagenic weapon they were supposedly developing used a theta-band subspace delivery system. Captain Picard is one of only three Starfleet Captains with extensive experience in theta-band devices. The other two are no longer in Starfleet.
So they tailored a fake weapon to lure Picard. But why? They must've known we'd change all his access codes and security protocols.
Maybe they were interested in something that he did in the past. Something that happened while he was Captain of the Enterprise.
Or something he was going to do in the future. In case of a Cardassian attack, the Enterprise will be assigned as Command ship for this sector. If the Cardassians got wind of that
They might have assumed Captain Picard would know those defence plans.
If your theory is correct, the Cardassians may be planning an attack somewhere in this sector.
The question is, where? Geordi, I want you to conduct a discreet scan of Gul Lemec's ship. Look for anything unusual, anything that might indicate where they've been lately.
Aye, sir.
I want you to be very careful with your wompat from now on, Jil Orra. Now that she's separated from her mother, she depends on you.
JIL ORRA:I will, father. Do humans have mothers and fathers?
Yes, but human mothers and fathers don't love their children as we do. They're not the same as we are.
JIL ORRA:Will you read to me tonight?
Yes, of course I will. I'll see you later.
Your daughter is lovely.
Yes, I think so. And unusually bright. It's amazing, isn't it, the way they're able to sneak into your heart. I must admit, I was completely unprepared for the power she had over me from the moment she was born.
I'm surprised that you let her come in here.
Why?
To expose a child to this. To someone who is suffering. To see that it is you that inflict that suffering.
From the time Jil Orra could crawl she's been taught about the enemies of the Cardassians, and that enemies deserve their fate.
When children learn to devalue others, they can devalue anyone, including their parents.
What a blind, narrow view you have. What an arrogant man you are. What do you know of Cardassian history?
I know that once you were a peaceful people with a rich spiritual life.
And what did peace and spirituality get us? People starved by the millions. Bodies went unburied. Disease was rampant. Suffering was unimaginable.
Since the military took over hundreds of thousands more have died.
But we are feeding the people. We acquired territory during the wars. We developed new resources. We initiated a rebuilding programme. We have mandated agricultural programmes. That is what the military has done for Cardassia. And because of that, my daughter will never worry about going hungry.
Her belly may be full, but her spirit will be empty.
Shall we begin again? How many lights are there?
What lights?
It looks like they had some minor hull degradation along their warp nacelles. The distribution pattern indicates a recent exposure to a molecular dispersion field.
Where could they have run into a dispersion field?
The McAllister C Five nebula's just across the border. It's approximately seven light years from Federation space.
Could there be Cardassian ships inside the McAllister nebula?
It's possible, but they wouldn't be able to stay in there for very long. The particle flux in the nebula would begin to break down a ship's hull just after seventy two hours.
Is there a Federation system near the McAllister nebula that might interest the Cardassians?
Minos Korva is only eleven light years from the nebula, and the Cardassians tried to annex it during the war.
Data, I want to be at Minos Korva in one hour.
Aye, sir. Set course three five zero mark two one five and engage at warp eight point five.
Sur le pont d'Avignon on y danse on y danse.
Wake up. Where were you?
At home. Sunday dinner. We would all sing afterward.
What a charming picture. The Picard family, voices raised in song. Is this what's keeping you from breaking? Memories of home and hearth? Images of happier times? I must congratulate you. You're remarkably strong willed. I see no point in holding you further. You may go. Someone will give you clean clothing before we return you to your ship.
We will get what we need from the human female.
What female are you referring to?
The human who was part of your abortive assault team, of course. Doctor Beverly Crusher.
What have you done to her?
Not a thing. She's quite safe. I wanted to finish my interviews with you before I interrogated her. I had hoped it might not be necessary.
Lieutenant Worf?
He left us few options. We had to kill him. I'm more optimistic about getting what we need from the woman.
Doctor Crusher has no knowledge of any of Starfleet's plans. She's a Medical officer.
You might be right. I'll have to determine that for myself.
Are you choosing to stay with me? Excellent! I can't tell you how pleased that makes me.
Starfleet now believes the Cardassians are preparing to invade Minos Korva. I'm convinced their invasion fleet is hiding in the McAllister Nebula. I intend to hit them before they leave it.
Captain, what if you're wrong? What if the Cardassians are in that nebula to conduct scientific research?
You'd have to have some pretty good evidence to convince me of that.
You're still gambling hundreds of lives.
This discussion is moot. The plan has been approved and we are going ahead. Mister Data, by your calculations, how long could the Cardassian ships stay in the nebula?
In seventeen hours their hull degradation will reach dangerous levels. They will have to leave before that.
All right. Worf, prepare a series of five hundred antimatter mines with magnetic targeting capabilities.
Aye, sir.
Geordi, we're going to need a shuttle specially outfitted to operate in the nebula by fourteen hundred hours. Beverly, you'll need to
Have Sickbay ready for the casualties you're about to send me.
That's right. Dismissed.
Oh, you're awake. Have something to eat. I insist. Boiled taspar egg. It's a delicacy I'm happy to share with you.
Wonderful. Wonderful. I like you, human. Most people become ill at the sight of live taspar. I remember the first time I ate a live taspar. I was six years old and living on the streets of Lakat. There was a band of children, four, five, six years old, some even smaller, desperately trying to survive. We were thin, scrawny little animals, constantly hungry, always cold. We slept together in doorways, like packs of wild gettles, for warmth. Once, I found a nest. Taspars had mated and built a nest in the eave of a burnt-out building and I found three eggs in it. It was like finding treasure. I cracked one open on the spot and ate it, very much as you just did. I planned to save the other two. They would keep me alive for another week. But of course, an older boy saw them and wanted them, and he got them. But he had to break my arm to do it.
Must be rewarding to you to repay others for all those years of misery.
What do you mean?
Torture has never been a reliable means of extracting information. It is ultimately self-defeating as a means of control. One wonders that it's still practiced.
I fail to see where this analysis is leading.
Whenever I look at you now, I won't see a powerful Cardassian warrior. I will see a six year old boy who is powerless to protect himself.
Be quiet.
In spite of all you've done to me, I find you a pitiable man.
Picard, stop it, or I will turn this on and leave you here in agony all night.
Ah! You called me Picard.
What are the Federation's defence plans for Minos Korva?
There are four lights.
There are five lights. How many do you see now?
You are six years old. Weak and helpless. You cannot hurt me.
How many?
Sur le pont d'Avignon, on y danse
How are we doing?
We're almost done, sir. I've shielded the engine nacelles and the transporter system so they won't be affected by the particle flux from the nebula.
Good.
Been awhile since I flew one of these. You're a pilot yourself, aren't you Geordi?
Yes, sir.
I began my career as a shuttle pilot, on the Jovian run. Jupiter to Saturn and back once a day, every day.
Is that right? I was on that run myself for a while.
Then you must've done Titan's Turn.
Oh, yeah. You set a course directly for Titan, hold it until you're just brushing the atmosphere, throw the helm hard over and whip around the moon at point seven c.
And pray like hell nobody saw you.
You know, this trip into the nebula's going to need someone who can do Titan's Turn in their sleep. These mines need to be laid within two kilometres of the Cardassian ships. But the particle flux from the nebula will blind all the sensors except for this proximity detector. You're going to need one heck of a pilot to pull that off.
Is that you?
I could do it, but truthfully, the man you want is Commander Riker. He's the best there is.
Come in.
Am I disturbing you?
Not at all.
Musician.
Yes.
Classical? Contemporary?
Jazz.
Ah.
Is there something I can do for you, Captain?
Are you aware of our plans to attack the Cardassian invasion fleet?
Yes, sir. I understand you've been talking to every shuttle pilot on board.
Let's drop the ranks for a moment. I don't like you. I think you're insubordinate, arrogant. wilful, and I don't think you're a particularly good first officer. But you are also the best pilot on the ship.
Well, now that the ranks are dropped, Captain, I don't like you, either. You are arrogant and closed-minded. You need to control everything and everyone. You don't provide an atmosphere of trust, and you don't inspire these people to go out of their way for you. You've get everybody wound up so tight there's no joy in anything. I don't think you're a particularly good Captain.
I won't order you to fly this mission. I'm here to ask.
Then ask me.
Will you pilot the shuttle, Commander?
Yes.
You're welcome.
We've lost primary navigation. Switching to secondary systems.
Inertial dampers compensating.
Sensors inoperative.
Right on schedule.
The proximity detector is working. We should be able to read their ships at a distance of five hundred metres.
Don't make this too easy.
Hang on.
Do I want to know how close that was?
No. Get ready to deploy the mines.
Captain, the shuttlecraft is emerging from the nebula.
Enterprise to shuttle. Were you successful, Commander?
Aye, sir. The mines are laid.
Very well. Red alert. Stand by to detonate the mines on my command.
Standing by.
Open a channel to the Reklar.
This is Cardassian territory, Captain. Your presence here is another deliberate provocation to
I'm not going to argue with you, Gul Lemec. Every one of your ships has a mine on its belly, my finger's on the button, and you're in a very bad position.
You can't intimidate us.
Mister Worf, set off alpha four two.
Aye, sir.
That was just a baby. The big boys are sitting on your hull just waiting for me to say the word.
What are your terms?
Your ships will leave the nebula one by one. Each ship will eject its primary phaser coil before setting course for the nearest Cardassian base.
But that will leave us defenceless.
Mister Worf, prepare to detonate
I will agree to your terms.
Excellent. Oh, and one more thing. I understand you're holding a Starfleet officer named Jean-Luc Picard. I expect him returned. immediately.
That won't help. I have many more.
Still, it felt good.
Enjoy your good feelings while you can. There may not be many more of them. I've just received word. There's been a battle. The Enterprise is burning in space. The invasion of Minos Korva has been successful.
I don't believe you.
There's no need for any further information from you. Our troops were successful in spite of your refusal to help me. You might have saved yourself a great deal of torment by yielding at the beginning.
I want to see neutral representative.
There is no such person. The word will be that you perished with your crew. No one will ever know that you are here with us, as you will be for a long, long time. You do, however, have a choice. You can live out your life in misery, held here, subject to my whims, or you can live in comfort with good food and warm clothing, women as you desire them, allowed to pursue your studies of philosophy and history. I would enjoy debating with you. You have a keen mind. It's up to you. A life of ease, of reflection and intellectual challenge, or this.
What must I do?
Nothing, really. Tell me how many lights you see. How many? How many lights? This is your last chance. The guards are coming. Don't be a stubborn fool. How many?
You told me he would be ready to go.
We had some unfinished business.
Get him cleaned up. A ship is waiting to take him back to the Enterprise. Captain Picard, if you'll go with the guards, they'll take care of you.
There are four lights!
Captain on the Bridge. Welcome home, Jean-Luc.
Thank you.
Just the way you left it, maybe a little better. Computer, transfer all command codes to Captain Jean-Luc Picard. Voice authorisation Jellico alpha three one.
Transfer complete. USS Enterprise now under command of Captain Jean-Luc Picard.
I relieve you, sir.
I stand relieved.  It's been an honour serving with you.
You have the Bridge, Number One.
Aye, sir.
I, er, I don't know where to begin. It was
I read your report.
What I didn't put in the report was that at the end he gave me a choice between a life of comfort or more torture. All I had to do was to say that I could see five lights, when in fact, there were only four.
You didn't say it?
No, no, but I was going to. I would have told him anything. Anything at all. But more than that, I believed that I could see five lights.
Another Coco-no-no?
No thanks, I think I've had enough already.
Yeah. Yeah, me too. Oh, I almost forgot.
Geordi. I'm sorry. I think I'd better go back.
Too chilly? I can turn down the breeze.
No, it's been a lovely programme.
Yeah.
And you're a terrific guy.
Yeah.
I just don't feel that way about you.
Yeah.  Knock it off.
This was the final battle, wasn't it?
Neither side intended Orelious Nine to be the decisive conflict.
There's not much left, is there.
The destruction is remarkable considering the primitive weapons of the period.
Uh, oh.
I beg your pardon, Wesley?
Geordi had a big date with Christy tonight. He spent days putting together the perfect programme. Looks like it ended kind of early.
Uh, oh.
Commander Data to the Bridge immediately.
Acknowledged.
We're picking up a signal, coordinates two one one mark six one.
It would seen to be an ancient interplanetary code. Mister Data?
Confirmed, sir.
Survivors on Orelious Nine after all this time? Not possible.
Well, hardly possible, Number One. Lay in a course to the source of the signal.
Approaching the source, Captain.
Put it on the viewer.
A Promellian battle cruiser?
With its Lang-cycle fusion engines still intact.
Sensors indicate no life signs aboard, Captain.
I should hope not, Mister Data. That ship belongs in a museum. I'm afraid we're a little late. That call for help was probably initiated over a thousand years ago.
Captain's log, Stardate 43205.6. We have arrived at Orelious Nine, to chart the battle in which the Menthars and Promellians fought to their mutual extinction. Among the ruins we have found a relic, a Promellian battle cruiser that has withstood the centuries.
Indulge me, Number One.
I would prefer it if Lieutenant Worf and I were able to a security sweep of the ship first.
No. Captain's prerogative. This one's mine. We have examined every conceivable risk.
The risks on a ship this old and fragile are inconceivable, Captain.
Ghosts, perhaps? Number One, have you never dreamed of climbing inside the bottle?
Sir?
The ship in the bottle. Model air ships. I used to build them when I was a child. My God, I bet I had a Promellian battle cruiser too.
Ready to beam down to the vessel?
O'BRIEN:Locked on to the main bridge, Captain.
You're certain about the atmospheric conditions, Data ?
There is adequate oxygen for life support, Commander.
It is exactly as they left it, Number One. In the bottle. The ship in the bottle. Good Lord, didn't anybody here build ships in bottles when they were boys?
I did not play with toys.
I was never a boy.
O'BRIEN:I did, sir.
Thank you, Mister O'Brien. Proceed.
O'BRIEN:I did. I really did. Ships in bottles. Great fun.
What's that?
O'BRIEN:I'm not sure. The secondary power bus may need adjusting.
Keep me posted.
Extraordinary.
Admirable. They died at their posts.
Hmm. You'd expect the bridge layout of this era to be clumsy, awkward, but look at this. It's a model of simplicity. Elegant, functional. They built this craft for generations. And it worked.
Don't you have anything stronger than this, Guinan?
Yes.
Would it help?
No.
Tell me something, Guinan. You're a woman, right?
Yes, I can tell you I'm a woman.
What is it that you want in a man?
Me personally?
As a woman. What's the first thing you look at?
His head.
His mind. Of course.
No, his head. I'm attracted to bald men.
Seriously?
Seriously.
Why?
Maybe because a bald man was very kind to me once when I was hurting. Took care of me.
I'd like to do that.
I take care of myself these days.
I mean, take care of somebody. I just don't get it, Guinan. I can field strip a fusion reactor. I can realign a power transfer tunnel. Why can't I make anything work with a woman like Christi? It's like I don't know what to do, I don't know what to say.
You're doing fine with me.
You're different.
No, you're different.
But I'm not trying now.
That's my point.
What is it, Wes?
The main power returner is acting a little weird.
Define weird.
I'm getting fluctuating waveguide readings.
Run a maintenance sweep.
Right.
Activating power pack, Captain.
Mister Worf, be sure we get tricorder images of their tactical display.
Aye, sir.
The source of the distress signal appears to be coming from up there, Captain.
Let's put an end to their last cry for help.
Captain, I believe this is an information storage device. A crude analogue of our isolinear optical chip.
Crude by our standards today, Data. But when this ship was built, humans on Earth were just perfecting the mechanical clock, still using steel crossbows in battle. Is there any way to see what's on this?
Questionable, sir. I believe I can supply power to its playback unit, but its components are quite old. I will attempt to amplify its image with my tricorder.
GALEK SAR:I am Galek Sar, Captain of the Promellian cruiser, Cleponji. I wish anyone who finds this record to know my crew has behaved courageously. I want it recorded for all time that I, alone, am responsible for the fate that befell us. I have failed as a captain, and as the man responsible for all the souls aboard my ship.
Picard to Enterprise.
Go ahead, Captain.
I think we have seen all there is to see here. At Mister O'Brien's leisure, we're ready to return.
Aye, sir.
Thrilling. That was absolutely thrilling. And I was right, Number One. There were ghosts aboard that old ship. One of them actually spoke to us.
A friendly one, I hope?
My own counterpart. The captain's final message, praising his crew.
I hope you'll be as thoughtful when the time comes.
Mister Data, advise the Astral Five annex. This should be catalogued and scheduled for retrieval.
Aye, sir.
I'm sorry, Captain, it's just a rare pleasure to meet this side of your personality.
Mister Crusher, set course for the original coordinates.
Yes, sir.
Captain, we are experiencing a two percent drop in energy reserves. Compensating.
We were having a few problems while
Readouts indicate we are being bombarded with a field of high intensity radiation.
Shields up.
Captain, energy loss increasing to five percent.
Yellow Alert.
Aye, sir.
Energy loss increasing, sir.
Mister Crusher. Reverse course. Full impulse power.
No response, sir.
Increase speed to warp one.
Engines are not responding, Captain.
Mister La Forge.
We need warp power now!
Matter-anti matter mixture ratio settings at optimum balance Reaction sequence corresponding to specified norms. Magnetic plasma transfer to warp field generators per programme specs. Commander, we should be going like a bat out of hell.
Power loss now at twelve percent, Captain.
Red alert.
Radiation intensity increasing.
We'd better slow these engines down before we burn out the reaction chamber.
Slow to idle, Geordi.
Is it possible we've fallen into the same snare that killed them? A thousand year old booby trap?
With the engines idling, the energy loss has been limited, but our reserves will be depleted in less than three hours. We won't be able to hold our shields in place.
Mister Worf, have you been able to identify the source of the radiation?
No, sir. The radiation field is so strong it interferes with our sensors.
And no apparent explanation for the energy loss?
No, sir.
Is there anything in the history books, Data, that could give us a clue?
There are many fascinating records of Menthar battle strategy. They were exceptionally innovative. In fact, they were the first to use the Kavis Teke elusive manoeuvre as well as the passive lure stratagem that is comparable to Napoleon's
Any mention of a situation like this?
No, sir.
I recommend that I return to the cruiser with an away team.
They didn't have much success with this problem, Commander.
No, but they knew who their enemy was better than we do. They may have known what caused the trouble. They just didn't know how to get out.
Agreed. Mister Worf, what would be the impact of lowering the shields long enough to get the away team out?
Negligible.
Won't do much for our energy conservation, Captain.
That's your job, Commander La Forge. Determine some way to keep the Enterprise up and running. Data, you join Commander Riker on the away team. Find out what happened on that ship.
So why can't we move? Computer. As we increased our power levels, was there any counter-reaction?
Affirmative. The opposing force grew in direct proportion to the power output of the Enterprise.
So it kept us from forming a subspace field for the warp drive?
That is correct.
Computer, who is this L. Brahms?
Doctor Leah Brahms, engineer. Graduate of the Daystrom Institute Theoretical Propulsion Group. Galaxy class starships, team seven, junior member.
Junior member, huh? Looks like she wrote the book on propulsion. Call up subspace design logs.
Select menu. Visual records or L. Brahms' voice entries.
Voice entries.
Theoretical propulsion logs, Federation Starship Enterprise, Galaxy class. Heading, Subspace. Author, Leah Brahms.
Geordi La Forge. How're you doing, Doc?
Specify programme.
Yeah, down to work. You're absolutely right.
I recommend we evacuate and seal off all non-operational areas, and group the families and crew on the odd-numbered decks.
Proceed.
I'd also like to set up an assembly area for treating radiation symptoms in case it's needed.
After the shields fall, how long before fatal exposure?
Thirty minutes. After that, there is nothing that can be done.
Away team to Enterprise. Captain, we may have found something. There's a file of memory
Coils here.
They are identical to the coil we found earlier, Captain.
The Captain's log, perhaps?
That's what we were thinking.
Mister Data, are they in working condition?
I believe so, sir.
We can enhance them through the image processor in the ship's computer.
Good. Return at once.
Aye, sir.
Computer, generate a cross section image of the dilithium crystal chamber. What about re-orienting the crystal?
It is possible to reorient the crystal. The key lies in adjusting the lattice structure direction. This modification will be integrated into the next class starship.
Sorry, can't wait. You and me, Leah, we've got just two hours to figure this thing out. You know what I need to do? I need to get inside there. I need to be able to turn that thing inside out. Computer, is there a cross section image we can replicate on a holodeck?
Select menu. Design specifications or prototype schematic.
Prototype? Elaborate.
A development stage prototype schematic at Utopia Planitia. Drafting room five of the Mars Station, Stardate 40174.
Perfect. Recreate it in holodeck three. Stay with me, Doc.
Ready, computer?
Holodeck three programme is ready.
Damn. Right back where it all started. Whoa, this is incredible. Leah, did you design this?
The dilithium crystal chamber was designed at outpost designated Seran T One, Stardate 40052. Some of the Federation's best engineering minds participated in its development.
That's the visiting dignitary talk. What's the inside story? Off the record.
Access denied. Personal logs are restricted.
Great. Another woman who won't get personal with me in the holodeck. Leah, I want to find a way to supplement the energy supply to the ship and to the engines. Could we alter the matter-antimatter paths?
Theoretically, yes. The system should be able to accept more reactants at a faster rate of injection.
Well, this is your baby. Show me which ones.
Computer, did I ask for a simulation?
Affirmative. You asked Doctor Brahms to show you which system could accept reactants at a faster rate. By accessing available imagery, an adequate facsimile was possible.
I did do that, didn't I? Okay, well, it's good to see you, Leah. Continue your analysis.
Systems L-452 through L-575 will accept reactants, providing all other systems are calibrated to an equal factor.
Then, if we use multiple injector streams, hitting more than one crystal facet, we could do it, we could hold our own. Leah, you're beautiful. La Forge to Picard.
Go ahead.
Captain, we've found a way to extend the matter-antimatter energy supplies.
Well done, Mister La Forge.
Geordi, can you give us enough power to get us out of here?
Sorry, Commander, we haven't addressed that one yet. First priority was to maintain the shields.
Acknowledged.
We'll get to work on it right away, Sir.
Pass my congratulations to the rest of your team.
Thanks, Captain. We're all smiles down here.
Captain. We've been able to verify that these coils are the logs of the Promellian captain, but most of them have decayed and cannot be repaired.
Can you get any playback at all?
On most, there are brief sections which may yield some information.
Do the best you can, Data. Let's just hope we can get the section we need.
Surely he must have logged the cause of the ship's death. What captain wouldn't?
All found in an open locker? I don't think he was too concerned with security.
452 through system L-575.
Adjustments to dilithium crystal chamber complete.
Impact analysis, computer.
Warp energy has increased fourteen percent. Reactants per unit time remaining steady.
Yes! All right! Computer, do you have any, you know, personality on file for Doctor Brahms?
Starfleet personality profile analysis, stardate 40056.
Did she ever debate at the intergalactic caucuses on Chaya Seven?
Doctor Brahms attended Chaya Seven caucuses on the following stardates
Never mind the dates. Computer, if you add data from all these sources, could you synthesise a true representation of Doctor Brahms?
There would be a nine point three seven percent margin of error in the interactive responses from the facsimile.
I can live with that. Do it.  Doctor Brahms?
Geordi, it's me, Leah. Don't start calling me Doctor Brahms or I'll call you Commander La Forge.
Right.
Now, we've managed to maintain energy but we can't leave it in this realignment forever without burning out components, so we need to move quickly.
Are you with me?
Yeah. Yeah! Yeah!.
GALEK SAR:We have been stripped of all propulsion, and our weapons are useless. We cannot move and we cannot fight. The ship is being lashed with lethal radiation from the aceton assimilators concealed in the wreckage surrounding the
Aceton assimilators?
Aceton assimilators are a primitive generator which can drain power from distant sources.
Generators?
It would not be difficult to modify them to convert energy into radiation.
The Menthars hide them in floating debris. An unsuspecting enemy ship flies in. Instant booby trap.
And now we're supplying the devices with the energy to kill us.
No, no, no!
Will you listen to me!
You can't boost the warp power that way!
You can just increase the speed of the parallel subspace field processor to gain a quicker response time
I want to give us enough power to strengthen the shields and barrel out of here, not blow us up!
This is my design we're talking about. I did all the calculations myself.
I don't care if you built it with your bare hands out of an old Ferengi cargo ship, it's going to go  and we're going with it.
I am not used to having people question my judgment.
And I'm not used to dying. Okay, look. You worked in a lab on a static model. This is a working machine. It's got tens of thousands of light years on it.
True.
Damn right. Listen, we'd never be certain that the circuit paths are sealed.
You're good. Very good.
I know my ship. Inside and out.
Well then you must know me inside and out. 'Cos a lot of me is in here.
You know, I always wished that a Chief Engineer could be present when a ship is being built.
That's what's wrong with designers. We never get out in space.
Well, you're there now.
Commander La Forge to the Bridge.
On my way, Commander. Don't go away. I mean, computer, save programme.
How many devices do we think we're dealing with, Mister Data?
To create this radiation field would take several hundred thousand, sir.
They've been out there a long time, Data. There must have been some deterioration.
There is no way to precisely calculate that, Commander, but it is likely.
Is there any indication of a weakness in a specific part of the field?
Nothing substantial, Captain.
Of any kind.
There is a point one percent dip in the strength of the radiation field at two one mark eight by four two mark zero.
I want that point one percent.
I recommend we fire directional phasers at those coordinates.
We won't be able to maintain energy reserves. We might even lose a few circuits in the new configuration.
How critical will the losses be?
Not enough to shut down our engines, but if we don't make it I don't know that I can hold the shields.
There is also the possibility that the phasers will supply the assimilators with what they need most. Energy.
You know, I imagine a very similar discussion taking place on our neighbour ship over a thousand years ago. Let's hope our decisions are more successful than theirs were. Mister La Forge, I want you to return to Engineering and continue with your efforts without delay. Mister Worf, prepare the phasers.
Phasers locked on coordinates.
Fire.
Nothing.
Radiation levels increasing. Eight percent. Ten percent.
Energy reserves are dropping rapidly, sir.
Damn you.
Wouldn't that increase the output of the subspace processors to gain a quicker response time?
The processors can handle the extra input.
Yeah, but how do we reconfigure?
Energy reserves reaching critical stage. Standard procedure requires termination of all simulations.
Computer, override standard procedure.
Override authority restricted.
What? Computer!
The crystal lattice is breaking down. We'll have to pick up repairs when we can reach a starbase.
The optimist of the group.
How long do we have shields based on current calculations?
Under two hours, Captain. And the radiation field has increased by seventeen percent.
So what impact will that have on fatal exposure?
Down to twenty six minutes.
If we resist, we die. If we don't resist, we die.
Mister La Forge, have we shut down all non-essential energy usage?
Yes, sir. In fact, I need to get some back. I'm running a programme on holodeck three.
For what purpose?
Well, I've gone back to the beginning
To the earliest construction entries of the Enterprise. I've created a propulsion design model to assist me.
I believe we're making progress.
Computer, reinstate holodeck three programme.
Holodeck three programme is reinstated.
Mister La Forge, your best suggestion in an hour.
Picard out.
Computer, resume holodeck three programme.
Enter when ready.
There isn't much time left.
Somehow we have to generate enough energy to get out of here, but we've got a booby trap that eats energy for breakfast. How do we fool it, block it, shut it down, anything? Okay, we know for every movement the Enterprise makes, there's a counter movement by the energy field. Can we use that to our advantage somehow?
Maybe. There must be a time differential between the force and counter force. If we can just make quick, continuing adjustments in the linkups before the counterforce reacts, we might just be able to move this bucket.
Yeah. Yes!  Leah, you like Italian food?
Like it? Wait till I make you my fungilli.
Okay. Fusion reactor uplink to navigation processor.
But then we have to adjust the vector processor and the drive coils. This is impossible.
Don't do that.
I'm sorry. I thought it would feel good.
I don't want to feel that good right now. What time is it?
Coming up on sixteen hundred hours.
God, what am I supposed to tell the Captain? It's possible and yet it's not possible. Everything we've done says we can't adjust that fast, but if we could, it might work.
I could do it.
Data couldn't even do it. It'll take a hundred, maybe even a thousand adjustments every second. How are you going to do it? It's humanly impossible.
I'm not human.
You mean the computer could do it.
Captain. Captain, this is a holographic simulation of one of the propulsion experts who designed the Enterprise engines. Leah Brahms. We've, I've been examining the force-counter force response times, trying to see if we could create linkage at maximum power.
And?
There's a chance we could manoeuvre out of this trap if we turn the ship over to the computer.
What kind of chance?
I don't know yet, but we could programme it and try it out on a few simulated runs.
And this is the only way?
I think so, sir.
Come.
Any word from La Forge?
He's come up with something that may give us a chance, if we agree to stay out of it. He proposes to turn total control of the ship over to the computer because it is capable of making quicker adjustments than any human being.
Computers have always impressed me with their ability to take orders. I'm not nearly as convinces of their ability to creatively give them.
You know, Number One, you missed something not playing with model ships. They were the source of imaginary voyages, each holding a treasure of adventures. Manning the earliest space craft, flying a aeroplane with only one propeller to keep you in the sky. Can you imagine that? Now the machines are flying us.
End simulation. Fatal exposure.
Computer, reduce thrust levels another four percent. Adjust trajectory angle to compensate. Begin simulation again.
There you go. We got out.
Repeat simulation, same levels.
End simulation. Fatal exposure.
You see? Same variables, only this time the computer didn't quite make it.
Deflector shield failure. Lethal radiation levels. Fatal exposure in twenty six minutes.
It might work, Geordi.
And it might not. I can't ask Captain Picard to turn the ship over to a computer.
It's all we've got.
Picard to La Forge.
Captain.
Two minutes. Give me just two minutes.
There is another way, Captain. Two minutes, please.
Two minutes, Mister La Forge. Picard out.
Geordi, there's no other way.
No, no, wait. Listen. Turn it completely around. Literally. Come at it from the opposite direction. God, it's so simple it might even work. Okay, computer, new simulation.
Everything we've tried to do has been based on overpowering the trap. More energy, faster adjustments. But that's exactly what we can't do because that's what we're supposed to do. That's the booby trap. The answer lies in our own computer, the mind. The best piece of engineering we'll ever need.
But didn't your researches indicate a thousand adjustments per second would be required?
Not if we shut everything off. One blast of everything we've got left for a microsecond to beat the inertia and then we shut it all down, except minimal life support and two thrusters. No impulse engines. No computer.
One propeller, Captain?
Deflector shield failure. Lethal radiation levels. Fatal exposure in twelve minutes.
Have you analysed the risk factor?
The numbers say it's even money. It's no better than turning it over to the computer, but no worse either. But I say forget the numbers. There's no way the computer can compensate for the human factor. The intuition, the experience.
And the wish to stay alive. Make it so.
I've run the simulations, Captain. If you want, I'll take the conn.
Thank you, Mister La Forge, but you've done your job. Now I must do mine. I relieve you, Mister Crusher.
Yes, sir.
All hands, this is Commander Riker. We are about to engage impulse engines for a short burst. Inertial dampers are on manual. They may not fully compensate for acceleration. So brace yourselves.
Deflector shield failure. Lethal radiation levels.
Computer, discontinue radiation warning till further notice. It's all yours, sir.
Thank you, Number One. Firing impulse engines.
Impulse engines are down.
Shutting down all systems.
Velocity is one hundred thirty five metres per second.
We will be entering the debris field in eight seconds.
Starboard thruster firing.
Coming to heading three four zero mark one zero.
Thruster is off.
Captain, that large mass to port may contain an assimilator.
Port thrusters firing.
No reaction from the assimilator.
Okay, we're over the first hurdle.
Sir! Object to port.
Port thruster is firing. Sir, the gravitational attraction of the various masses has reduced our velocity by eight percent. By my calculations, we no longer have sufficient momentum to clear the debris field.
Thank you, Mister Data.
The asteroid's gravity is drawing us closer. Velocity is increasing. Velocity still increasing. Now at two hundred and nineteen metres per second. Starboard aft thruster. You have used the asteroid's gravitational pull as a slingshot. Excellent.
We're out. We got through.
You have the conn, Mister Crusher.
Yes, sir.
Initiate full restart. Put all systems back online.
With pleasure, sir.
Number One, make sure that booby trap doesn't bother anyone again.
Mister Worf, ready photon torpedoes. Set to detonate on impact with the Promellian vessel.
Aye, sir.
You know, I've always thought that technology could solve almost any problem. It enhances the quality of our lives. Lets us travel across the galaxy. Even gave me my vision. But sometimes you have to turn it all off. Even the gypsy violins.
Violins?
Different programme.
We made a good team.
Maybe we can do it again some time.
I'm with you every day, Geordi. Every time you look at this engine, you're looking at me. Every time you touch it, it's me.
Computer, exit holodeck. End programme.
The hospital facility will be located there, facing north in that grove of trees. And the school and the arts centre will be standing there, centrally located among the residential pods.
Very good. At this rate we'll be able to bring the next wave of colonists in in about six months. I've to tell you I envy you. This is a beautiful place to put down roots.
Somehow, Riker, you don't strike me as the kind that puts down roots.
No? How do I strike you?
As a free spirit. An adventurer.
An adventurer? Aren't you pioneers adventurers at heart?
Of course. But we also have this nesting instinct. It's exciting to find a new world but the joy comes in making it a home. Building houses, having children.
Very interesting. I'd love to discuss this further with you. Dinner tonight?
If you want to share camp rations in my tent, I'd be delighted.
Haven't we gotten you a replicator yet?
No, we haven't, but I've been saving my ration of dried chicken curry. It should go very nicely with that bottle of wine I happen to know you brought with you.
This is sounding better all the time.
And as you know, I provide the most memorable desserts.
My favourite part of dinner.
Will? Carmen? We've been going over the schematics for the hospital. The location seems fine.
When the Enterprise comes back tomorrow, we'll get a crew started on that.
Carmen, have you got construction started I didn't know about?
No. What is that?
Data?
I do not recognise the sound. I believe it is coming from above.
Will, what is it?
Data, what's our best bet for cover?
Subterranean caverns to the east, sir. Doctor.
Will.
Start gathering everybody together. We've seen this before. We know what it is. Now get moving.
Follow him. Let's go! Come on, come on!
No, stay together! Stay together! This way! This way! This way!
I've got you.
Will, help us!
Data!  Carmen!
Captain, sensors indicate a disturbance near the outpost on Melona Four.
What kind of disturbance?
I cannot tell. We are still too far away. It could be an electrical storm.
See if you can contact the colony.
Aye, sir. Captain, there is no response from Melona colony, but the disturbance in the atmosphere is increasing.
How far are we?
At current speed, twenty seven hours.
Bridge to La Forge.
La Forge here, Captain.
Are you picking up any readings from Melona?
Yes, sir. Something strange is going on. There are violent disruptions in the atmosphere.
Ensign, increase to warp eight.
Come on, keep moving.
Watch your step but keep moving.
Let's go, let's go. Keep moving. Deeper into the cave. Come on. Deeper into the cave. Keep moving.
How much protection will this cave give us?
The refractory metal in the rock formations may act as an effective barrier.
Let's seal off this entrance.
Let's hope there's enough air in here.
There's got to be a ventilation source somewhere. We need some light.
How are the others?
Just scrapes and bruises, I think. I'll check further. Where's Carmen?
She didn't make it. She was trying to save an old man who'd fallen.
I'm sorry.
I think we're going to be all right in here. I'm not sure about the air supply, so stay put, don't move around. Don't expend unnecessary energy. With any luck, we'll be able to wait this thing out.
Riker to Enterprise. Riker to Enterprise.
Commander, the refractory metals in the rock strata may also interfere with communication.
Data we've only seen the Crystalline Entity once before. How do you know these metals will protect us?
I am not entirely certain they will, sir.
I was afraid you were going to say something like that.
Sir, the disturbance on Melona is becoming more intense.
Keep hailing them. All channels, Mister Worf.
Captain, the fact that they're not responding doesn't necessarily mean there's anything wrong. The atmospheric disturbance could be jamming the signal.
I know, Counsellor.
Still no response, sir.
Increase to warp nine. How long, Mister Worf?
Six hours.
I've got one man unconscious. We can't stay in here much longer.
If I open that entrance and it's still out there, we're dead.
If we all stay in here, we're dead.
It has been over an hour since we heard the Entity, sir. It may be gone.
Or it may be out there waiting for us.
Everybody stay here.
Commander? Commander Riker, are you there?
Lieutenant Worf, I don't think I've ever seen a more beautiful sight.
It's good to see you're all right, Commander. What's happened here?
The Crystalline Entity paid us a visit. We lost two colonists, but we got the rest in here.
Captain's log, stardate 45122.3. We have notified Starfleet Command of our intention to pursue and investigate the Crystalline Entity. To that end, we have been joined by Doctor Kila Marr, a xenologist who has made studying the Entity her life's work.
Welcome to the Enterprise. I am Commander William Riker.
Commander, Doctor Kila Marr.
Glad you're here.
You were on the surface during the attack?
That's right.
Remarkable. You and your group are the only known beings ever to survive an assault by the Crystalline Entity.
We were lucky.
I should say. And your android. He was there, too?
Lieutenant Commander Data was there, yes.
Well, shall we get started?
I'd be glad to show you to your quarters.
Oh, Commander. A chance to talk to survivors so soon after an attack? I've been waiting years for this. I don't want to waste a moment more.
And when we came out of the cave there was nothing left. Everywhere we looked there was complete devastation. Trees gone, nothing.
That's typical. It could take years for anything to grow again.
Doctor, I ran a full spectrographic analysis, section by section. Trace elements confirm that it is the same entity which destroyed the colony at Omicron Theta.
The Crystalline Entity seems to function like a gigantic electromagnetic collector. It needs a lot of power to keep going so it strips every form of life from the worlds it encounters and converts it all into energy.
There's no vegetation, no insects, not even soil bacteria. It left nothing.
Except witnesses, for the first time in eleven recorded attacks. Now why, I wonder, did it spare your group?
It didn't spare everyone, Doctor. If you'll check your reports, you'll find that two of the colonists didn't survive.
My point is that until now there have never been any survivors.
Doctor, the cave in which we hid was made of rock which contained heavy concentrations of kelbonite and fistrium. We surmise that the Entity was unable to penetrate that barrier.
I would like to do interviews with each of the survivors. Collect as much specific detail as I can of their observations.
Of course.
And I'd like to inspect the remains of Melona Colony as soon as possible.
Commander Data, you will accompany the Doctor to the surface.
Yes, sir.
If you don't mind, Captain, I prefer to choose my own team.
Doctor, there is no one on this ship with more knowledge of the Crystalline Entity than Commander Data. He originated on Omicron Theta.
I am aware of his origins. I'm very much aware that his brother, Lore, worked with the Crystalline Entity, led it to Omicron Theta where it killed every living thing. I don't think it's unreasonable that I should prefer to make another choice.
You may request additional team members, but in the best interest of this investigation, I think you should work with Commander Data.
As you wish, Captain.
Well?
I don't think you need an empath to sense that woman's feelings. There's hostility that she seems to have transferred from Lore to Data. Perhaps you shouldn't have forced them together so soon.
If her discomfort is going to affect her judgement or her objectivity, I need to know now.
Doctor, there is evidence of residual bitrious matter in the soil. It was not present before the Entity's attack.
Doctor? Doctor Marr, you have made it clear that my presence disturbs you. However, I do not see how we can achieve our task if you continue to ignore me.
Commander, I can hear everything you say to me. If there is anything worth my response, you can be sure I will not be silent.
Then I do not understand your lack of interest in the bitrious filament I mentioned.
It's old news to me. I found evidence of bitrium on the last three attack sites. It seems to be a residual that the Entity produces after it absorbs living matter. I'm actually more interested in this cave. It still amazes me that your group was spared.
As I have speculated, the presence of refractory metals
Refractory metals. Yes, I know. On two separate occasions settlers sought refuge in caves. Some of them deeper than this one. They perished anyway.
Were those caves laced with kelbonite or fistrium?
The tunnels on Forlat Three had strong deposits of kelbonite, yes.
Then perhaps the combination of the two metals prevented the Entity from
Perhaps it was you.
I do not understand.
Maybe it was your presence which made the Entity pass over the people in this cave. Did that occur to you?
I cannot see what effect my being here would have had
If you had been in contact with the Entity, if that's the reason Melona was attacked, it surely wouldn't have killed its ally.
Do you believe that I lured the Entity here?
Did you?
No, Doctor. Because Lore betrayed the colonists on Omicron Theta, you believe that I am capable of the same behaviour. You are mistaken, Doctor. My programming is distinctly different from Lore's.
You don't understand. I am accusing you of collaborating with that monster!
I do understand, and I am attempting to explain to you it is impossible.
It's amazing. You can't feel anything, can you? Nothing I say to you hurts you.
That is true, Doctor.
I'm getting a slight elevation on monocaladium particulates in this cave wall. Are you making note of it?
Yes, Doctor.
My son died on Omicron Theta. He was sixteen when the colony was attacked. That is the reason I have became an expert on the Crystalline Entity. I have spent my life studying it, tracking it, and hoping someday to find it. And if I learn you have been helping that thing in any way whatsoever, I will see to it that you are disassembled piece by piece.
Okay, Doctor. We've input all the data you collected on the surface.
Just a minute, Commander. I have some cellulose readings from soil samples that weren't included.
You handle that unit like a veteran, Doctor.
One thing about spending your life gathering information, you learn your way around computers. Hydrocarbons slightly elevated, bitrious filaments in trace amounts, lanthanides, nitrates all normal. Nothing different. Everything falls within the parameters I established at the other attack sites.
Were you expecting a different result this time, Doctor?
I've never surveyed a site so soon after an attack. I thought maybe I'd find something new. Something that would make a difference.
Doctor, have you ever scanned your samples for gamma radiation?
Why would I do that?
We are seeing high energy reactions that may show up in a gamma scan.
And if they do, we might find a pattern, a kind of marker left behind by the Entity. That's a good idea, Data.
Frankly, I just don't see what that would get us.
If the Entity left a residual trace of antiproton in the samples we collected, a gamma radiation scan would reveal that.
Getting that readout now, Data.
If we try a logarithmic scale, we will have better resolution.
There it is. Do you see it?
Yes. Doctor?
A sharp spike at ten keV. Another. A pattern.
So we know the Entity leaves antiprotons behind.
If it also deposits antiprotons in space as it travels, can we detect them?
Sure. We can set the ship's lateral sensors for gamma radiation.
Well, let's get to it, shall we?
It seems I owe you thanks, Commander.
The thanks actually go to Doctor Clendenning on Omicron Theta who did the first experiments with gamma scans.
I've never read that. It wasn't in any of his records.
That is correct. But I possess much of his knowledge. He was working on new detectors at the time of the attack on Omicron Theta.
I'd heard that you'd been programmed with the experiences of the colonists, but frankly I find it hard to believe. Bridge.
It is true, Doctor. The contents of their logs and journals were transferred into my memory cells. The man who created me also experimented with scanning the synaptic patterns of the colonists' temporal lobes and programming them into my neural nets.
You possess their thoughts?
To some degree. Doctor Soong hoped to provide me with an amalgam of the colonists' memories.
Interesting.
There. A spike at ten keV. And again. It's the same pattern we saw in Engineering.
Mister Data, can you project a course from it?
Yes, sir. There are two possible destinations. The Brechtian Cluster and the Argos system.
Is either populated?
Yes, sir. The Brechtian Cluster has two inhabited planets.
Ensign, set a course for the Brechtian Cluster.
Captain, I've done some preliminary estimates on the firing pattern we need in order to destroy the Entity. The photon torpedoes will require some reprogramming, but with your permission, I'll give the calculations to Lieutenant Worf.
Reprogram the torpedoes, Mister Worf. Let's hope we don't have to use them.
I beg your pardon?
If we can possibly avoid firing on it, I would hope it would be
You aren't going to kill it?
Perhaps you should join me in my Ready room.
I don't understand. Why are we pursuing the Entity, if not to destroy it?
We're not hunters, Doctor. Nor is it our role to exact revenge.
What do you propose? We track it down, greet it warmly and ask if it would mind terribly not ravaging any more planets?
I don't denying that it may be necessary to fire on it. But I look on that as a last resort.
Why? Why not just kill it?
I want to try to communicate with it.
What?
We know from our own experience that our shields will protect us. So long as we're in no danger, I will make every effort to communicate.
To what end?
If we can determine what its needs are, we might find other sources to supply it.
Its needs are to slaughter people by the thousands. It is nothing but a giant killing machine.
Doctor, the sperm whale on Earth devours millions of cuttlefish as it roams the oceans. It is not evil. It is feeding. The same may be true of the Crystalline Entity.
That would be small comfort for those who have died to feed it. We're not talking about cuttlefish, we're talking about people.
I would argue that the Crystalline Entity has as much right to be here as we do. Now, Commander Data has some theories on how we might communicate. Please confer with him.
Come in.
Am I disturbing you?
Not at all, Doctor.
Commander, there's something I want to say. You have been helpful to me, and kind, and I repaid you with accusations, and I realise I may have been wrong.
That is very gracious of you to say, Doctor, but I have not been injured by you.
Captain Picard has told me you've done work in trying to establish communication with the Entity.
That is true. I have experimented with producing vibrations in crystals by means of graviton pulses.
Like tapping a crystal goblet?
Exactly. I will call up the results I have achieved this far for you to study.
All right. Commander, just what kind of memories do you retain of the colonists?
I do not possess the minute to minute remembrances of each person, although the more intense recollections are contained in my memory banks.
Do you have any of my son's memories?
Marr, Raymond. Called Renny. Yes. I do.
I see. And his journals?
Yes.
I was wondering. Do you know? Did he blame me?
Blame you?
For going away. For leaving him on Omicron Theta.
There are no records of any blame against you.
I left him with friends. I chose to pursue my own career. I planned to go back, but things kept interfering. I kept thinking, I'll go next month. And there weren't any more next months.
There are no records of any negative thoughts about you. His personal journals indicated that he was proud that you were such a fine scientist.
He was? What else do you know?
Commander Data, Doctor Marr, report to the Bridge immediately.
We are being chased by an unidentified entity travelling at warp speed.
A distress call from a ship called the Kallisko. It's being pursued by an unknown object.
Sensors indicate a crystalline structure of indeterminate mass.
How strong are your shields, Captain?
We are a transport ship. Our shields are minimal.
Do you carry weapons?
Only low level particle phasers. Do you know what this being is?
Kallisko, change course. Take evasive action. Do whatever you can to outrun it.
we are under attack! Captain, notify our people on Boreal Three
Mister Worf, try to reestablish.
I cannot, sir. There is no response.
The Crystalline Entity is moving away, sir.
Ensign, set a course for the Kallisko. Mister Riker, prepare an away team.
Captain's log, stardate 45125.7. An away team led by Commander Riker has conducted a thorough survey of the alien ship Kallisko, and has returned to the Enterprise to report.
It was pretty much as we expected, sir. No survivors.
Not a trace of anything that was ever alive. Not even a seed in their greenery storage.
Warp and impulse engines are down, sir, but they can be restarted. A skeleton crew could take the ship to a starbase.
No, we don't have time for that now. Mister Worf, send a message to the nearest starbase. Ask them to dispatch a crew.
Aye, sir.
Mister La Forge, make certain that we're still picking up the gamma radiation pattern of the Entity.
Aye, sir.
Have you and Commander Data made any progress in finding a means of communication?
I believe so. There are some details to iron out.
Please keep working at it. We may need it soon.
Deck seventeen. Doctor, you have seemed preoccupied since we surveyed the Kallisko.
I've found it easy to talk to you, Commander. Do you mind if I tell you something?
Not at all.
After hearing the screams of those men, I found it hard not to think about my son, about what happened to him. I've read stories about soldiers in the battlefield, wounded, dying. They call for their mothers. And I've often wondered if my son called for me. If he died wondering why I didn't come to him.
Come.
It's still headed for the Brechtian Cluster. We've re-established our course.
Very well. Oh, one thing, Number One. Starfleet will be notifying Carmen Davila's family of her death and returning her personal effects. Would you care to enclose a letter?
Yes, sir. I'd like that very much.
Is there something more, Number One?
Permission to speak freely, sir?
Of course.
I've been thinking maybe Doctor Marr is right. Maybe we should destroy the Entity.
Why do you think that?
It's already killed thousands. It will undoubtedly continue to kill unless we stop it. I don't want those deaths on my conscience.
Are you sure that that's it, Number One, or are you being influenced by personal feelings?
With all due respect, sir, I'm not a raw cadet. I've lost people on missions before. If we take time to try to communicate with this thing, we may lose our chance to destroy it. And I don't think we can risk that. I think I'll go write that letter to Carmen's family.
We should programme the bridge science station to vary the emissions we direct toward the Entity.
I'll write a subroutine that will allow us to change the frequency of the graviton beam. Data? You told me you carried some of my son's memories.
That is correct, Doctor.
What can you tell me about Renny? What were those thoughts? Was he was he happy at all, on Omicron Theta?
I have some vivid memories of sporting events. He played parrises squares with a group of his schoolmates.
Renny started parrises squares when he was young. Too young, really. But the older children kept asking him to play, and I couldn't keep him away. He had this natural gift.
Yes, he was pleased to have won a championship emblem.
I remember he wrote me about that. He was so proud. I'm characterising pulse widths in nanoseconds. Sound right to you?
Yes, Doctor. Your son's most intense memories revolve around a young woman named Jenina.
A girlfriend? I never knew about that. Of course, the last person he would tell would be his mother. What was she like?
He enjoyed her kindness, her gentleness, her physical attributes.
There. Now we can vary all the parameters directly from the Bridge.
Yes, Doctor.
Could you do something for me? It would mean a lot.
I would be happy to be of help.
You see, all I have left of Renny, the only connection of him is there, inside you. I was wondering if you would talk to me in his voice. I know you have the ability to sound like other people, isn't that right?
That is true, Doctor, but what would you want me to say?
Maybe something from his journals.
Many of his journal entries took the form of letters to friends and family. I could access one of those.
I took my last exam today I think I did all right on everything except cellular biology. I know you think it's important, Mom, but I don't see how I'm ever going to use this stuff. In a couple of weeks, a bunch of us are going on an archaeological dig in the mountains. The Wallaces said it would be all right as long as we had adult supervision, so don't worry. They're looking out for me. They're really great people and I like them a lot, but they're kind of serious. They don't have your sense of humour, Mom. Mom, I miss you.
Captain's log, stardate 45129.2. We are still in pursuit of the Crystalline Entity. Data and Doctor Marr are prepared to attempt communication with the being when we intercept it. I will admit to some uncertainty about the prospect. It could prove to be a scientific triumph, or a catastrophe.
Sir, the Brechtian Cluster is now five light years away.
Are we still picking up the Entity's pattern?
Yes, Commander, but sensors have not yet locked onto its exact whereabouts.
Captain, we are reasonably sure it's between here and the Brechtian Cluster. If I start emitting the graviton beam now, it may serve as a lure. A kind of beacon.
Make it so.
We'll start with a pulse width of five nanoseconds, frequency one pulse per second.
Commencing graviton emissions now.
No change in the sensor readings.
Let's ramp frequency.
Emissions now at ten pulses per second.
Sir.
What is it? Do you have something?
A large mass approaching at warp speed.
Full stop.
Aye, sir.
Doctor, continue emitting the signals. Mister Worf, on screen.
Shields up.
Magnify.
It's beautiful.
What's it doing? Checking us out?
Possibly. Just as we're checking it out.
Doctor Marr, do you wish to change the frequency? Doctor Marr?
Yes. Yes, proceed, Commander.
Changing to twenty pulses per second.
Is it responding to us?
Let's test that. Ramp the frequency again, Commander.
Emissions now at thirty pulses per second.
Captain, I'm reading a transmission from the Entity. A series of graviton pulses.
It's working. That's a response to our signal.
Remarkable.
Captain, there is a pattern emerging from the signals.
It's trying to communicate with us.
I believe so, sir, but it will take some time to decipher the patterns.
Then it's possible. Communication, understanding.
Let me try something else. A continuous graviton beam.
All graviton pulses from the Entity have stopped.
Maybe it doesn't like what we're doing.
Doctor, return to the intermittent signal.
Doctor? Doctor Marr? Doctor Marr, we must return to the intermittent signal.
Counsellor?
Something's very wrong, Captain.
Sir, the Entity is beginning to resonate. Vibrations are increasing.
Doctor, stop the transmission. That is an order. Doctor Marr, do you hear me?
It's for you, Renny I did it for you.
Mister Worf, take charge of the Doctor. Mister Data, shut down the transmission.
Vibration amplitude is increasing. It can't last much longer.
I cannot stop our graviton signal, Captain. Doctor Marr has isolated the access code.
Maybe I can create an override sequence. Shut it down from here.
The amplitude is still rising, Captain. Resonance is approaching critical.
I can override her programme, but it's going to take some time.
Mister Worf, will you escort the Doctor to her quarters.
Yes, sir.
It will never hurt anyone again.
Perhaps I should escort the Doctor, sir.
Fine, but don't leave her unattended.
Please come with me, Doctor.
Of course.
I will stay with you, Doctor.
How long will you live, Data?
There has been no predetermined limit placed on my existence, Doctor.
I'm glad. As long as you're alive he'll be alive. I need your help, Data.
In what way, Doctor?
Like you did before. Tell me that you understand, Renny. That you know I did it for you, because I love you. Because I wanted to give you peace at last.
I do not find such a file in your son's journals. However, from what I know of him by his memories and his writing, I do not believe he would be happy. He was proud of your career as a scientist, and now you have destroyed that. You say you did it for him, but I do not believe he would have wanted that. Yes, I believe your son would be very sad now. I am sorry, Doctor, but I cannot help you.
Anything from the surface?
No sir. There have been no communications from the colony for over twelve hours.
Sensors picking up any signs of life?
None.
O'BRIEN:The surface environment is safe for transport, Commander.
Mister O'Brien
Verify these are accurate coordinates for New Providence colony.
O'BRIEN:Coordinates verified, sir.
O'BRIEN:You're at the centre of town.
Captain's log, Stardate 43992.6. Admiral Hanson and Lieutenant Commander Shelby of Starfleet Tactical have arrived to review the disappearance of New Providence colony. No sign remains of the nine hundred inhabitants.
The truth is, hell, we are not ready. We've known they were coming for over a year. We've thrown every resource we have into this, but still
Then you're convinced it is the Borg?
That's what I'm here to find out. The initial descriptions of these surface conditions are almost identical to your reports from system J two five.
Commander Riker wrote those reports. He agrees with you.
Commander Shelby took over Borg tactical analysis six months ago. I've learned to give her a wide latitude when I want to get things done. That's how I intend to operate here.
My priority has been to develop some kind, any kind of defence strategy
Obviously nothing we have now can stop them.
We've been designing new weapons but they're all still on the drawing board.
We expected much more lead time. Your encounter with the Borg was over seven thousand light years away.
If this is the Borg, it would indicate they have a source of power far superior to our own.
I'd like to see the colony site as soon as possible, Captain.
It'll be dark there in thirty minutes. We've scheduled an away team for dawn.
Number One, why don't you show the Commander to her quarters?
It's our poker night, Admiral. There's always an open seat for you.
Another time, Commander. Your captain and I have a lot to cover. But rumour has it Commander Shelby's played a hand or two.
Keep your eye on her, Jean Luc. She's one very impressive young lady.
You seem rather taken with her, JP.
Just an old man's fantasies. When Shelby came into Tactical, every admiral's uncle had a take on this Borg business. She cut through it. She put us on track.
Earl Grey?
Please. She'd make you a hell of a first officer.
I already have a hell of a first officer.
Don't tell me he's going to pass up another commission?
One's available?
The Melbourne. It's his if he wants it. Hasn't he told you?
He'll make a fine captain, JP.
You may want to tell him that. We're still waiting on his decision. This is the third time we've pulled out the captain's chair for Riker. He just won't sit down. Let me tell you something, Jean-Luc. There are a lot of young hotshots like Shelby on their way up. Riker could suddenly look like he's standing still next to them. He's hurting his career by staying put. If I were you, I'd kick him in the rear end for his own good.
I don't know exactly what I'm looking for, but we've tested the sections of the Enterprise's hull that were damaged by the Borg. There were some unusual magnetic resonance traces.
A Borg footprint?
That's my theory. I'll see if it holds up tomorrow. I've reviewed your personnel. I'll be assigning Mister La Forge and Mister Data to accompany me on the away team.
I've already assigned them to the away team. And I'll be with you as well, Commander.
Of course. I appreciate any assistance you can offer. Tell me, Commander. Is serving aboard the Enterprise as extraordinary an experience as I've heard?
Every bit.
Good. Because I intend to convince Captain Picard I'm the right choice for the job.
Job? Which job?
Yours, of course. I'm sorry. I heard that you were leaving.
If I were, I'm sure you'll be the first to know. Poker's at seventeen hundred hours in my quarters. Deck eight.
Got another king in the hole, Data?
I am afraid I cannot answer that Wesley. And as you are a newcomer to the game, may I say it is inappropriate for you to ask. I will buy another card, Counsellor.
No help there.
Fold. Again.
Three jacks looking back for the handsome young ensign.  Pair of deuces stands.  Flush, possible straight flush. Your bet, Mister Crusher.
I'm in for ten.
Call.
Now it's time for the long pants. There's your ten, and one hundred.
He's got the straight flush, folks.
Not necessarily. Commander Riker may be bluffing, Wesley.
I don't think so. Fold.
With three jacks? What, are you kidding? Wesley, you may get straight A's in school, but there's a lot you need to learn about poker.
Well, I've only got two pair, but I've got to see your hole card. I'll call.
You got him.
Mister Data and our guest appear to be tardy.
O'BRIEN:Sir, Commander Shelby and Data beamed down to the planet surface an hour ago.
On whose authority?
O'BRIEN:On hers, sir.
Morning. Early bird gets the worm, eh? We've had some interesting results.
Commander Shelby. Walk with me, Commander.
Early bird? I believe Commander Shelby erred. There is no evidence of avifaunal or crawling vermicular lifeforms on Jouret Four.
That's not what she meant, Data, but you're right. She erred.
I'm sorry, but I woke up early and I saw that a weather system was moving in it. It could have affected the soil readings.
So without any regard to the risk of coming down alone
Really, Commander, if we ran into the Borg here, two extra bodies wouldn't've made a hell of a difference, now would they? We had three hours before the storm front hit, less than two hours now. Data was available. I took him. We came. I don't see your problem.
My problem, Commander, is I expect to be notified before there's a change in my orders.
Noted for future reference. Do you wish to hear my report, sir?
Go ahead.
The soil contains the same magnetic resonance traces That's our footprint. There's no doubt any more. It is the Borg.
Captain's log, stardate 43993.5. With confirmation of the Borg's presence in Federation space, Admiral Hanson has returned to Starbase three two four to discuss strategy with Starfleet Command. Lieutenant Commander Shelby remains on board to continue tactical preparations.
I've also ordered a standing Yellow Alert. All Federation and allied outposts have been warned. Ops will continue to monitor long range sensors. I've assigned Data, La Forge and Mister Crusher to work with Commander Shelby.
Good. You've covered all the bases. What's your impression of Shelby?
She knows her stuff.
She has your full confidence?
Well, I think she needs supervision. She takes the initiative a little too easily. Sometimes with risks.
Sounds a little like a young lieutenant commander I once recruited as a first officer.
Perhaps.
Will, what the hell are you still doing here?
Sir?
You've been offered the Melbourne.
I've decided not to pursue that commission at this time.
She's a fine ship, Will.
Yes, but she's not the Enterprise. With all due respect, sir, you need me. Particularly now.
Indeed? Starfleet needs good captains, particularly now. Reconsider your decision.
Are you telling me to leave, Captain?
I'm asking you to look at your career objectively. Will, you're ready to work without a net. You're ready to take command. And, you know, the Enterprise will go along just fine without you.
What am I still doing here? Deanna, I pushed myself hard to get this far. I sacrificed a lot. I always said I wanted my own command, and yet something's holding me back. Is it wrong for me to want to stay?
What do you think?
Maybe I'm just afraid of the big chair.
I don't think so.
The Captain says Shelby reminds him of the way I used to be. And he's right. She comes in here full of drive and ambition. Impatient, taking risks. I look at her and I wonder whatever happened to those things in me? I liked those things about me. I've lost something.
You mean you're older, more experienced. A little more seasoned.
Seasoned. That's a horrible thing to say to a man.
I don't think you've lost a thing, and I think you've gained more than you realise. You're much more comfortable with yourself than you used to be.
Maybe that's the problem. I'm too comfortable here.
I'm not sure I know what that means. You're happy here. Happier than I've ever known you to be. So, it comes down to a simple question. What do you want, Will Riker?
A manipulation effect in the Borg ship's subspace field. A definite pattern at four point eight minute intervals during your first confrontation with them.
Might indicate high output auxiliary generators kicking in.
One theory is that their systems are decentralised with redundant power sources located throughout the ship.
That is a reasonable conclusion. Borg technology has given each member of their society the ability to interface and function collectively. It is likely they have constructed their ship with the same philosophy.
You knock out one generator and another takes over without interruption.
What kind of damage would we have to do to shut them down?
Projections suggest that a Borg ship like this one could continue to function effectively even if seventy eight percent of it was inoperable.
And our best shot barely scratched the surface.
Well, from what I've seen, I can't believe any of these new weapons systems can be ready in less than eighteen months, Commander.
We've been projecting twenty four.
Is there anything we can do here to adapt to our current defence systems?
We'll have to go through the specs again, but. I don't know. My mind's turned to clay.
Mine too.
I think we should look at modifying the plasma phaser design.
Commander, I think we should call it a night. That's an order. We'll reconvene at oh five hundred.
Sir, if you'll allow me to continue with Mister Data, who does not require rest.
You need rest, Commander.
If we have a confrontation with the Borg without improving our defence systems
If we have a confrontation, I don't want a crew fighting the Borg at the same time they're fighting their own fatigue. Dismissed.
At nineteen hundred hours yesterday, the USS Lalo departed Zeta Alpha Two on a freight run to Sentinel Minor Four. At twenty two hundred hours and twelve minutes, a distress signal was received at Starbase one five seven. The Lalo reported contact with an alien vessel described as cube shaped. The distress signal ended abruptly, and she's not been heard from since.
Mister Data, how long would it take to get there at warp nine?
One hour, seventeen minutes, sir.
Make it so.
We're coming with every available starship to assist, Captain, but the closest help is six days away.
We'll try and keep them occupied until you arrive.
I know you will. Hanson out.
All hands will stand to battle stations.
Commander Shelby, what is the status of out defence preparations?
Mister La Forge has a plan to modulate shield nutation. Hopefully, that'll hold them off for awhile.
At the same time, we'll be retuning phasers to higher EM base emitting frequencies to try to disrupt their subspace field.
What's your assessment of our potential effectiveness?
It's a shot in the dark, Captain. But for now it's the best we can do.
Dismissed.
Sir, reading unidentified vessel just entering sensor range. Bearing two one zero mark one five one.
Hail them, Mister Worf.
No response, sir.
Move to intercept.
Aye, sir.
Sir, the vessel has already changed course to intercept us. Approaching at warp nine point three. Entering visual range.
On screen. Magnify.
Mister Worf, dispatch a subspace message to Admiral Hanson. We have engaged the Borg.
Captain, you are being hailed.
I am?
Yes, Captain. By name.
Data, is it the same ship we faced at J two five?
Uncertain, Commander, but the dimensions are precisely the same.
On screen. I am Jean Luc
Jean Luc Picard, captain of the Starship Enterprise, registry NCC 1701D, you will lower shields and prepare to transport yourself aboard our vessel. If you do not cooperate, we will destroy your ship.
You have committed acts of aggression against the United Federation of Planets. If you do not withdraw immediately
You will surrender yourself or we will destroy your ship. Your defensive capabilities are unable to withstand us.
What the hell do they want with you?
I thought they weren't interested in human life forms, only our technology.
Their priorities seem to have changed. Open.
Channel open.
We have developed new defence capabilities since our last meeting and we are prepared to use them if you do not withdraw from Federation space.
Captain.
The shields are being probed. I'm modulating nutation.
Captain, the Borg are attempting to lock on to us with their tractor beam.
Load torpedo bays. Arm phasers. lock coordinates on the source of the tractor beam.
Shield status?
Holding, sir.
The nutation modulation has them confused.
They have the ability to analyse and adapt, Commander.
Shield modulation has failed. They've locked on.
Shields are being drained. Ninety percent. Eighty.
Trying to recalibrate nutation. Damn.
Shields have failed.
Fire all weapons.
Their subspace field is intact. New phaser frequencies had no impact.
Reverse engines.
Full reverse.
We're not moving.
Fire at will.
Launching torpedoes. Phaser spread continuing.
Still no damage to the Borg vessel, sir.
Warning. Outer hull breach.
They're cutting into the hull. Engineering section.
Geordi, evacuate Engineering.
Computer. Evacuation sequence.
Sealing doors to core chamber.
Come on, move it, people! Let's go! Let's go!
Decompression danger, deck thirty six, section four.
Sealing Main Engineering.
Data, fluctuate phaser resonance frequencies. Random settings. Keep them changing. Don't give them time to adapt.
The tractor beam has been released.
Warp nine. Course, one five one mark three three zero. Engage.
They are in pursuit, Captain.
Maintain course.
Damage report, Geordi?
Hull rupture in main Engineering. The damage is pretty heavy. We lost a lot of good people down there.
Eleven dead, eight more unaccounted for, Captain.
Repair teams to Engineering. Seal hull breach.
They didn't get to the core I can control functions from here.
Now approaching the Paulson Nebula, sir.
Drop to impulse. Take us in, Ensign.
The field is getting too dense, sir.
Steady. Analysis of the nebula cloud, Mister Data.
Eighty two percent dilithium hydroxyls. Magnesium, chromium. It should provide an effective screen against their sensors, Captain.
Mister La Forge, prepare to reverse engines. Full stop.
The Borg ship is continuing scans, attempting to locate us.
Good. As long as they're looking for us, they won't hurt anyone else.
Time index five one four. Data started to fluctuate phaser resonance frequencies. The Borg's beam breaks contact. Slow playback. Take a closer look, Commander. Mister La Forge?
There's a two percent drop in power for an instant, but it is system wide. The phaser frequency spread was in a high narrow band.
Conceivably, the ship's power distribution nodes are vulnerable to those frequencies.
If we can generate a concentrated burst of power at that same frequency distribution, I mean a lot more than anything our phasers or photon torpedoes could ever provide.
How do we do that?
The main deflector dish.
It's the only component of the Enterprise designed to channel that much power at controlled frequencies.
End programme. Unfortunately, there is one slight detail. In the process, the blast completely destroys the Enterprise as well.
But if we could get further away, increase the deflector's range.
It could work. In the meantime, we should retune all phasers, including the hand units, to the same frequency.
Proceed. I'll inform the Captain.
There is one other recommendation I'd like to make, Commander. Separate the saucer section. Assign a skeleton crew to create a diversion
We may need the power from the saucer impulse engines.
But it would give them more than one target to worry about.
It's too great a risk.
I'd like the Captain to make that decision, sir.
Commander, I bring all the alternatives to the Captain's attention. That'll be all.
I'm going to need to install higher capacity power transfers to the deflector dish, Commander.
How long?
Better part of a day.
She gets a full head of steam, doesn't she.
She's a formidable presence, to say the least. But I'm convinced she can help us here, Commander.
I am too. Don't worry about it. I can handle Shelby.
Come.
Come in, Number One. Commander Shelby was just telling me of your concerns about her plan.
I'm sorry if she troubled you, sir. I have already informed her
Yes, I entirely agree with you, Number One. It's not the time. But the time may come when we will be required to take greater risks. I want you to consider her plan as a fall back position. Make the necessary preparations.
Very good, sir.
Deck eight. Battle bridge.
Halt. Commander, you and I need to have a conversation.
You never ordered me not to discuss this with the Captain.
You disagree with me, fine. You need to take it to the Captain, then fine. Through me. You do an end run around me again, I'll snap you back so hard, you'll think you're a first year cadet again.
May I speak frankly, sir?
By all means.
You're in my way.
Really? How terrible for you.
All you know how to do is play it safe. I suppose that's why someone like you sits in the shadow of a great man for as long as you have, passing up one command after another. Proceed to deck eight.
When it comes to this ship and this crew, you're damned right I play it safe.
If you can't make the big decisions, Commander, I suggest you make room for someone who can.
Captain's log, stardate 43996.2. The Enterprise remains concealed in the dust cloud. And to my surprise, the Borg have maintained their position, waiting for us to come out of hiding. I have no explanation for their special interest in me or this ship. We continue to prepare our defences for the inevitable confrontation, but I must admit, on this night I contemplate the distinct possibility that no defence may be adequate against this enemy.
Trouble sleeping?
Something of a tradition, Guinan. The Captain touring the ship before a battle.
Before a hopeless battle, if I remember the tradition correctly.
Not necessarily. Nelson toured the HMS Victory before Trafalgar.
Yes, but Nelson never returned from Trafalgar, did he?
No, but the battle was won.
Do you expect this battle to be won?
We may yet prevail. That's a conceit, but it's a healthy one. I wonder if the Emperor Honorious, watching the Visigoths coming over the seventh hill, truly realised that the Roman Empire was about to fall. This is just another page in history, isn't it? Will this be the end of our civilisation? Turn the page.
This isn't the end.
You say that with remarkable assuredness.
With experience. When the Borg destroyed my world, my people scattered throughout the universe. We survived. As will humanity survive. As long as there's a handful of you to keep the spirit alive, you will prevail. Even if it takes a millennium.
Captain Picard, report to the Bridge.
I'm on my way, Lieutenant.
They're some kind of magnetometric guided charges.
Status of shields?
Back to forty eight percent, Captain.
Mister La Forge, I may have to take us out of the nebula. I want all the power you can give me.
Engines are ready, Captain.
Recommend we adjust shield harmonics to favour the upper EM band when you proceed.
Acknowledged.
Direct hit, deck nine.
Damage report?
Structural latching system integrity breached.
Prepare to take us out of here, Number One.
Fire up the engines. Half impulse until we clear the nebula, then punch it to warp nine.
Ready phasers. Load forward torpedo bays. Engage.
Borg tractor beam is attempting to lock on.
Fire at will. Continue rotating shield frequency.
Shields failing. Tractor beam has locked on.
It's no use. They've already adapted to the new frequencies.
The Borg ship is disengaging. Leaving at warp speed.
Maintain pursuit.
Borg vessel has reached warp nine. Nine point four, nine point six.
Stay with them. Riker to O'Brien. Can you get a fix on the Captain?
O'BRIEN:Negative, sir. There's some kind of interference. I can't lock in on his signal.
Senior officers, report to the Bridge.
Sir, the coordinates they have set, they're on a direct course to sector zero zero one. The Terran system.
Earth.
Captain Jean Luc Picard, you lead the strongest ship of the Federation fleet. You speak for your people.
I have nothing to say to you, and I will resist you with my last ounce of strength.
Strength is irrelevant. Resistance is futile. We wish to improve ourselves. We will add your biological and technological distinctiveness to our own. Your culture will adapt to service ours.
Impossible. My culture is based on freedom and self determination.
Freedom is irrelevant. Self determination is irrelevant. You must comply.
We would rather die.
Death is irrelevant. Your archaic cultures are authority driven. To facilitate our introduction into your societies, it has been decided that a human voice will speak for us in all communications. You have been chosen to be that voice.
Commander, they are leading us into the heart of our own defences.
Yeah, well, so far they haven't had any reason to worry about our defences.
Commander, if the Borg stay at warp nine point six, we'll be forced to discontinue pursuit and power down in less than three hours.
Two hours, forty minutes and three seconds.
How soon before the deflector's ready?
We're close. Few hours maybe. I know, I'll get it done in two somehow, but Commander, I going to need serious power from the warp engines to make this weapon work. So far we're using everything we've got just to keep up with them.
Sir, we've got to get that ship down to impulse.
I'm leading an away team over there to get the Captain back. We'll find a way to bring them out of warp. Ensign Crusher, you continue to assist Mister La Forge. Commander Shelby, you'll take the Bridge and coordinate with Starfleet. Data, Worf, Doctor, you're with me.
Excuse me, sir. With my knowledge of the Borg
Those are my orders, Commander.
Commander Riker. It is inappropriate for you to lead the away team. Until the return of Captain Picard, you are in command of the Enterprise. We're in a state of war, and your place is on the Bridge.
Commander Shelby, you'll lead the away team. Make it so.
First Officer:First officer's log, stardate 43998.5. Our pursuit of the Borg continues on a course that will take us to the very core of the Federation. The devastation they could bring is beyond imagination.
These phasers have been retuned. Each has a different frequency spanning the upper EM band.
All right, a reminder. We only get to use each of these once, maybe twice, before the Borg learn to adapt. Don't fire until you have to.
What kind of resistance should we expect?
At our first encounter, the Borg virtually ignored us when we beamed aboard their vessel. Clearly they did not consider our being there a threat to them.
That may change, however, if we start interfering with their plans. Shelby to Bridge.
Away team ready.
We've got fifty eight minutes before we have to power down and disengage.
Understood.
Proceed. Commander
No unnecessary risks. Clear?
Very clear, sir. Shelby out.
O'BRIEN:We've matched warp velocity for transport, Commander.
Energise.
Tricorder functions minimal.
Any signs of human life?
Inconclusive.
Look at this. This is extraordinary.
These appear to be some kind of power wave guide conduits which allow them to work collectively as they perform ship functions.
There's no way to take out enough of these to disable them down.
What if we look at this from a mosquito's point of view.
Interesting metaphor, Doctor. What is your idea?
If we sting them in a tender spot, they might stop for a minute to scratch.
Distribution nodes.
If we take out a few of these, it just might make them scratch.
The Captain's communicator. It is still activated.
Crusher to Picard. Can you hear me?
Can you locate it, Worf?
This way.
I strongly recommend redeploying all available defences to protect sector zero zero one, Admiral.
We're moving to intercept at Wolf three five nine. We'll make our stand there. How much longer can you maintain pursuit?
Twenty two minutes if they stay at current speed. If we can't bring them out of warp, we'll do as much damage as we can before we have to disengage.
Picard?
Nothing yet, sir.
In here.
Shelby to Enterprise.
Go ahead.
We've found the Captain's uniform and his communicator. We're resuming our search.
Stand by, Commander.
We're in business.
It'll burn out the main deflector, but it'll be one hell of a bang.
Radiation danger?
We're going to have to evacuate the entire forward half of the secondary hull and the lower three decks of the saucer.
I'll see to that.
Commander Shelby
We have only seventeen minutes of warp power left. Do whatever you can to get them out of warp.
Acknowledged. Shelby out. Let's take out some of these distribution nodes and see what happens.
Sir, they've done it. The Borg ship is dropping out of warp.
Go to impulse.
Aye, sir.
Diverting warp energy to main deflector.
Move us to within forty thousand kilometres. Match velocity. Commence arming sequence. Increase deflector modulation to upper frequency band.
Shelby to Enterprise. Encountering resistance. Prepare to beam us back on my signal.
They're adapting to the frequencies.
Jean-Luc!
Captain!
Enterprise, get us out of here.
The Captain?
We were unable to retrieve him, sir. Sir, The Captain has been altered by the Borg.
Altered?
He is a Borg.
We'll go back. I need more people. We need to retune the phasers again. We'll get him out of there.
Commander, reading subspace field fluctuations from within the Borg ship. Looks like they're regenerating, restoring power. They could be capable of warp any minute.
Is the deflector ready?
It's ready.
Will, he's alive. If we could get him back to the ship, I might be able to restore
This is our only chance to destroy them. If they get back into warp, our weapon is useless.
We'll sabotage them again if we have to.
We can't maintain power. We don't have the time. Prepare to fire.
At least consult with Starfleet Command. Get Admiral Hanson on subspace.
Belay that order, Lieutenant. There's no time.
Sir, we are being hailed by the Borg.
On screen.
I am Locutus of Borg. Resistance is futile. Your life as it has been is over. From this time forward, you will service us.
Mister Worf. Fire.
Dalen!
It's good to see you again, Beverly.
You look wonderful.
A lie I can live with. It's kind of your captain to ferry me home.
It's on our way. Thanks, O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:My pleasure, Doctor.
Dalen, I'm sorry to hear about Patricia.
She'd been ill for some time.
Is her death the reason you're giving up your post here?
We had a lifetime together, doing all the things we'd ever dreamed, and more. But when she was gone, I couldn't continue to work in that office, sleep in that bed without her. The absence of her was too distracting. I'm not sure that I'm making any sense.
Jack and I didn't have a lifetime together, only a few short years, but I understand. When you realise someone you love is lost forever
You know what the worst part of growing old is? So many of the people you've known all your life are gone and you realise you didn't take the time to appreciate them while you still could. Oh, I'm sorry. There was no reason to heap all this emotional baggage on you. I usually travel light.
Wes, time for the experiment is over. I want my warp engines back now.
Almost done, Commander.
Almost isn't good enough. You want to be the one to explain when the Captain says 'Engage' and we just sit here?
I just need a couple more minutes. I'm ready to try the new warp field. Mom?
Don't let me interrupt.
Wesley!
Right! Okay!
Computer, level two diagnostic on warp drive systems.
Antimatter containment positive. Warp drive within normal parameters.
Wesley, talk to me.
That shouldn't have happened. Why would there be any visible phenomena outside the drive?
Prepare for umbilical disconnect.
Are you done?
Yeah. Mom?
Clear all moorings. Engineering, aft thrusters.
Aft thrusters, aye. Impulse power to the helm.
Dalen? Dalen, it's Beverly.
Computer, current location of Doctor Dalen Quaice.
There is no Doctor Dalen Quaice aboard the Enterprise.
Come.
Lieutenant Worf, yesterday, before we left starbase, an old friend of mine came onboard. Doctor Dalen Quaice. I requested quarters for him. He was assigned here.
I was not aware of this passenger.
I'm sorry. I thought it was standard procedure for you to be notified after Captain Picard approved passage.
It is. Please proceed.
We were to meet for breakfast, but I can't seem to find him or his belongings.
Computer, where is Doctor Dalen Quaice?
There is no Doctor Dalen Quaice aboard the Enterprise.
Lieutenant, Doctor Quaice is very old and rather frail. If he fell somewhere, if his communicator were damaged.
I will order a search immediately.
Thank you.
Even if Doctor Quaice had been injured, why would his belongings be missing?
Sir, I have several teams conducting a deck by deck search. It is not yet complete.
I have scanned the entire ship, Captain. Other than the Enterprise's regular complement, I can find no one else onboard.
Your sensors wouldn't detect him if he were dead.
That is correct, Doctor.
Could your friend have returned to the starbase without telling you? An emergency of some sort?
There were a lot of people going back and forth between the ship and the starbase yesterday.
We can easily check the transporter ID traces.
By all means check the trace log. But even if the results are negative, contact Starbase Command. We should leave nothing to chance.
Aye, sir.
One moment, Doctor. I'm sure you are aware of the procedure involving passengers.
Of course. I don't know why Lieutenant Worf wasn't told about Doctor Quaice.
I was not informed either.
But I sent in a request weeks ago.
Then it must have been intercepted before it reached me.
And someone else sent the approval? Why?
Doctor Quaice had been stationed at the starbase for some time?
Six years.
Perhaps it would be prudent to find out if he'd acquired any enemies there.
Course laid in for Durenia Four, sir.
Thank you, Number One. Mister Data?
Sir, Starbase one three three has no record at all of a Doctor Dalen Quaice.
You said he was stationed there for six years.
Not according to their computer. I have also accessed Starfleet records. There is no doctor currently serving in Starfleet named Quaice. In fact, I can find no service record whatsoever. There are no birth records with that name. I find no
Data, I interned with him on Delos Four. I've known him for fifteen years.
I do not doubt you, Doctor, but I have tried one hundred seventy three phonetic variations of the name, and I
His name is Dalen Quaice. Q U A I C E. Whatever your records say, they're wrong.
Mister Worf?
We have completed our search, Captain. We cannot locate Doctor Quaice.
You're not alone.
He was on board. I met him myself in Transporter room three.
Then it appears, for reasons unknown, someone has gone to great pains to erase all traces of this man.
Who was on transporter duty when he came aboard?
O'BRIEN:Doctor Quaice? Was he part of the regular crew rotation?
No. He's a friend of Doctor Crusher's.
O'BRIEN:When did he arrive?
Yesterday at sixteen hundred hours.
O'BRIEN:That was my watch. I beamed this man onboard?
Yes. I was here to greet him. An elderly man, not in the best of health.
O'BRIEN:I'm sorry. I remember you were here for a short while, but you were alone.
Was he invisible? Did I carry on a conversation with thin air?
O'BRIEN:No, Doctor. As I recall, you came in and you looked around for a few moments. I asked you if I could help you with anything. All you said was 'Thank you.' I said, 'My pleasure,' or something, and that was the end of it. There was no one else here.
I can't believe that Chief O'Brien might be lying.
He believes what he says. And there is no trace imprint for Doctor Quaice.
Will, I didn't conjure up one of my best friends from a test tube.
If the ship's records have been tampered with, then transporter records could have been changed as well.
And with everybody coming and going yesterday, maybe O'Brien just doesn't remember, or
Or?
It might be a good idea to run a diagnostic on him.
To make sure he wasn't tampered with?
What do you think?
It's worth a try. I'll check the replicator activity logs. Eighteen hours is a long time to go without food. Or without someone seeing him.
Chief, this examination should only take a few minutes.
O'BRIEN:But I feel fine.
Sit down.
O'BRIEN:Doctor, it's no use checking my eyesight. I didn't see your friend.
I'll be a little more comprehensive than that, Chief. Doctor Crusher to Doctor Hill. Respond, please. Doctor Selar, your present location? Computer, current whereabouts of Doctors Hill and Selar.
There is no Doctor Hill or Doctor Selar aboard the Enterprise.
Doctors Hill and Selar, and four other members of my medical staff have all vanished. All record of their ever having been on the Enterprise has been excised from the computer's memory.
Did they come aboard with Doctor Quaice?
No. They've been on board for months. But my two duty nurses don't remember them. Their families don't even remember them.
As O'Brien didn't remember Doctor Quaice.
I checked O'Brien thoroughly. I found no physiological abnormalities.
Crusher to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Ensign.
I'm in Engineering, sir.
There's something down here I think you'd better see. It may be connected to Doctor Quaice's disappearance.
On my way.
Progress, Number One?
No one's seen him. The replicator in his quarters has not been used.
Mister Worf, check hull and shield integrity for any sign of intruders.
Yes, sir, but I have been closely monitoring all on-board sensors. There has been no indication that any
Then give me a Level One diagnostic of any onboard sensors, and run a manual sweep of any anomalous airborne or electromagnetic readings. I want some answers.
I've been experimenting with Kosinski's warp field equations, trying to improve engine efficiency.
I've read your reports.
We did a test run while we were still at the starbase. Here's what the computer recorded.
This is the static warp field we created inside the warp drive. The experiment was designed to see if we could keep a bubble like this intact.
As you'll see in a moment, we couldn't.
There was a momentary flash of light. It was all over the spectrum.
I remember that.
Are you suggesting that a bubble could have made Doctor Quaice disappear?
If he were caught in it, yes, sir, it would seem to us like he'd disappeared.
Where would he go?
Who knows. He could even end up outside of our space time continuum.
Was Doctor Quaice in Engineering during your experiment?
No, sir.
And the bubble never expanded beyond Engineering?
No, sir.
Then how could it have trapped Doctor Quaice or the others?
There are others missing?
Yes, and they weren't anywhere near Engineering.
It doesn't make sense.
I doubt the warp bubble could alter computer records, or erase memories. Keep at it, Ensign, Mister La Forge. It's our only working theory for now.
Has something else happened?
Sickbay is totally empty. Apparently I no longer have any staff.
And that surprises you, Doctor?
Surprises me? I'll say it surprises me. There should be at least four members of my staff on duty at all times.
I am afraid ship's records do not concur. Doctor.
What are you talking about?
You do not have a staff.
You're telling me I'm the sole medical officer on a ship with over a thousand people on board?
Excuse me, Doctor, but the entire ship's complement is two hundred and thirty.
What?
Doctor, may I see you in my Ready room?
Would you care for something? So, Beverly. Tea, Earl Grey, hot. You're saying this ship has lost nearly eight hundred of its personnel?
I know how it sounds.
None of the scans show any anomalies. No signs of an intruder. Wesley's experiment clearly did not have the scope to affect an entire starship.
Captain, the Enterprise is in serious danger. You must believe me.
I have no choice but to believe you. The safety of my entire crew is at stake, but I must be sure.
That I haven't lost my mind? I just examined myself. And being the only doctor on board, I had to do it myself. There were no signs of dysfunction. Yes, there was an increased elevation of adrenalin, but I think is understandable.
Did you find anything that might suggest why you're apparently the only one among us unaffected by this, this phenomenon?
No. I'll talk to Troi.
It wouldn't do any harm.
Captain, please. Return this ship to Starbase one three three for a full diagnostic. I realise you have my word only to convince you.
Mister Riker?
Captain?
Set a course for a return to Starbase one three three immediately.
Aye, sir.
Your word has always been good enough for me.
I've had a team in Sickbay for two hours. We've run the mass spectrometer on all particulates. We've scanned the EM spectrum in case there was a wave guide somehow leaking radiation. We've even crawled in the life support ductwork. Captain, I don't know what this vortex was that Doctor Crusher saw.
I didn't just see it. I felt it. I barely escaped from it.
Well, there's nothing there now. And no sign there ever was.
Is there any possible connection with Mister Crusher's experiment? Could this warp bubble be floating around the ship perhaps?
No, sir. That bubble was definitely contained in Engineering. There's no way it could possibly have affected anything up on deck twelve.
Sir, I have completed level one computer diagnostics. There are no malfunctions.
Any other ships respond to our queries, Data?
The Wellington is the only Federation vessel in this sector. It reports normal operations. A Ferengi ship within communications range also reports nothing unusual.
Are all members of the crew accounted for?
Yes, Doctor.
How many are there?
There are one hundred and fourteen people on the Enterprise.
What?
That is the exact number there should be.
There are now over nine hundred missing. Deck after deck of this ship is deserted now. How do you account for all the empty rooms? If there are supposed to be only a hundred and fourteen people on board, why all the extra space?
Transportation of colonists, diplomatic missions, emergency evacuations.
Thank you, Mister Data. Have security confine all nonessential personnel to their quarters. Computer, go to Red Alert.
I'd like Lieutenant Worf to programme onboard sensors to monitor all personnel. If we can catch the exact moment someone disappears
I'm sorry, whom did you say?
Worf. Chief of Security. The big guy who never smiles? The Klingon!
Deanna. I need you to tell me if I've gone completely mad.
If you can ask the question, I'd say no.
Don't evade the question.
Then ask me one I can answer.
Deanna, I've delivered babies that no longer exist. No one else remembers them. Yet I can close my eyes, and see their faces as clearly as I see yours now. What if it's not some huge conspiracy? What if it is just me?
What if it is just you?
Then I've delayed a mission, frightened a lot of people including myself.
So what? You've acted in the best interest of your ship and crew. What more could you ask of yourself? If it turns out to be a mistake, then we'll be a little late arriving at Durenia Four. That's all.
It's not a mistake. I wish it were.
When we reach Starbase, I'll order a complete workup, both physical and psychological.
If we reach Starbase. Wesley. Where's Wesley?
Wesley?
Mom? Are you all right?
No. We may have very little time left. You don't believe me.
Look, Mom, I don't know.
I don't have time to convince you. Hundreds of people are missing and your experiment is the only possible explanation we have that we can work on right now.
Well, there it is. I don't know what else to do with it.
Then find someone who does, someone who knows something about warp bubbles.
I've already talked to Kosinski on subspace, and he can't explain it either. And this is based on his equations. There is someone who may be able to help, but I can't reach him.
Who?
He was Kosinski's assistant. He was an alien from Tau Alpha C. He said he was some kind of Traveller. Somehow he combined warp technology and the energy from his own thoughts.
Yes, I remember. Wesley, do you think it's possible that you've accidentally recreated something that he did? Something that could alter reality?
I don't see how. He's the only one who could explain it to us. I sent a message to Tau Alpha C, but it's so far away, it could take days to get there.
Maybe the Captain can help us. We've got to find him. Come on.
I don't even know if he's still alive. He was very sick.
Well, we can't stand around here doing nothing.
It's a chance. We have to try to...
Wesley.
Wesley?
They're all gone? Riker, Troi, Data? Wait a minute, let me guess. You never heard of any of them.
You know, Doctor, I have been more than fair. I have done everything I can to substantiate your, your perceptions of a
Will Riker! Your First Officer. He's very good at playing poker, loves to cook, he listens to jazz music, plays the trombone.
I cannot find any evidence of a Will Riker.
Commander Data, the android who sits at Ops, dreams of being human, never gets the punch line of a joke.
Doctor, we'll be arriving at Starbase one three three in a few hours.
Deanna Troi, you ship's counsellor, half Betazoid, loves chocolate. The arrival of her mother makes you shudder. O'Brien, Geordi, Worf, Wesley, my son. They all have been the living, breathing heart of this crew for over three years. They deserve more than to be shrugged off, brushed aside, just pinched out of existence like that. They all do. They deserve so much more.
Beverly, perhaps it would be best if you were to confine yourself to Sickbay until we arrive.
It's all perfectly logical to you, isn't it? The two of us roaming about the galaxy in the flagship of the Federation. No crew at all.
We've never needed a crew before.
I don't suppose you remember an alien from Tau Alpha C who was on board once? He called himself a Traveller. Jean-Luc, I don't know how, but you and I have got to find this Traveller, or another from his race. If anyone can help us
I give you my word. When we arrive at the Starbase, I will make every effort to find him.
It's not a delusion. It is not a dream. There is a physical, measurable phenomenon at work here. Perhaps you could help me to identify it.
How?
I'd like to use the ship's computer to monitor your life functions.
Until I disappear.
It will happen.
All right. Computer, continuous scan, Captain Jean-Luc Picard, vital signs. Audible readout. Begin now.
Body temperature thirty seven point two degrees,
I promise you I will continue to do whatever I can to find out what's happening, and to bring you all back. I'm sorry I lost my temper. You do remember that?
Vividly. But if I have forgotten my closest friends and comrades, as you say, I deserved every word.
For quite some time I've been meaning to say something to you. I might not have another chance.  Jean Luc, you and I
I won't forget. I won't forget any of you.
Wesley, have you got it? What's happening?
I'm losing it!
The link isn't holding, Commander.
I'll go to the secondary equations.
No. Look.  I've lost it.
Damn. I'm sorry, Wesley.
It's over. There's no way we'll get her back now.
It's not over, Wesley. There's still a way.
Captain's log, stardate 44162.5. Two attempts to retrieve Doctor Crusher have failed. And now, the Traveller, a mysterious visitor from our past, has reappeared.
Is she alive?
As long as she thinks she is alive, she is alive.
What the hell does that mean?
Your species have very narrow perceptions of time and space and thought. When Beverly Crusher was caught in the static warp bubble, she created her own reality. Her thoughts at the precise moment she was trapped determined its shape and form.
Can you go in and get her back?
No, it is her reality. I cannot enter it any more than I can enter her thoughts.
But you said there's still a way.
I can help, but I can't do it myself. Wesley, there is a power within each of us that most people haven't begun to realise, but you have begun, or else I would not have known to come here now. Together we may be able to open a gateway for her. But she must choose to walk through it.
Computer, we are going to apply precise diagnostic methodology. Once we've cataloged the symptoms, we will proceed to determine the illness, and find the cure. We will start with the assumption that I am not crazy. If I am, it won't matter one way or the other. Computer, read the entire crew roster for the Enterprise.
Doctor Beverly Crusher.
Have I always been the only member of the crew of the Starship Enterprise?
Affirmative.
If this was a bad dream, would you tell me?
That is not a valid question.
Like hell it's not.
What date did I report on board?
Stardate 41154. Fourteen hundred hours, three minutes.
That sounds about right. Computer, is there more than one USS Enterprise?
This vessel is the fifth starship to bear the name USS Enterprise. It is currently the only one in service.
What is the primary mission of the Starship Enterprise?
To explore the galaxy.
Do I have the necessary skills to complete that mission alone?
Negative.
Then why am I the only crew member? Aha, got you there.
That information is not available.
Computer, are you familiar with the inhabitants of Tau Alpha C?
Affirmative.
Are any presently located on any starbase or vessel within communication distance?
Negative.
Estimated time to Tau Alpha C at warp nine point five.
One hundred twenty three days.
Lay in a new course for Tau Alpha C. And send a subspace message advising them of our arrival.
Acknowledged.
Engage.  Computer, did you change course?
State new destination or coordinates.
I stated it, damn it. Tau Alpha C.
There is no Tau Alpha C listed on current star maps.
Captain's log, stardate 44162.8. At the direction of the Traveller, the Enterprise is returning to Starbase one three three and the precise position where the subspace bubble was formed.
Our goal will be to create a stable gateway between our reality and your mother's reality.
We've tried. We can't stabilise the link.
Of course not. The equations are only the first step. We will be going beyond mathematics.
Just tell me what I have to do.
Begin by letting go of your guilt, Wesley.
It's my fault. I shouldn't have tried
Focus on the present. You will have to be here completely to help her back. You must open yourself to time and space and the intricate threads that bind them. Begin entering your warp field equations. Now close your eyes. See past the numbers. Trust yourself.
I can't. I can't do it.
When the time comes, you will, Wesley. You will.
Starbase one three three, this is the Enterprise. Starbase one three three, this is the Enterprise. Please acknowledge. Viewscreen on.
It's not just people. Everything is disappearing! Computer, what is that mist I'm seeing?
Sensors indicate it to be a mass energy field seven hundred and five metres in diameter.
It surrounds the ship?
Affirmative.
If there's nothing wrong with me, maybe there's something wrong with the universe. Computer, what is beyond the mass energy field?
Sensors cannot penetrate the field.
Here's a question you shouldn't be able to answer. What is the nature of the universe?
The universe is a spheroid region seven hundred and five metres in diameter.
Captain, approaching Starbase one three three.
Slow to ten metres per second.
Mister La Forge, prepare for precision
Station keeping.
Acknowledged. Readying thrusters.
There. There it is. We're moving into phase now. There's your warp bubble, Wesley.
What? What's wrong.
It is collapsing.
Computer, give me a graphic representation of the universe.
I've seen this before. Wesley's experiment! The bubble. Of course. But that would mean that I'm the one trapped in the bubble.
Computer, what's happening?
Explosive decompression decks five through fourteen. Sealing off forward sections.
Cause?
A flaw in the ship's design.
Show me. Analysis.
No ship's structures exist forward of bulkhead three four two.
Superimpose previous image over this one, same scale, and continue to monitor.
It's collapsing!
Hull integrity now compromised on decks three through fifteen.
Computer, how long can life support be maintained?
Four minutes, seventeen seconds.
Captain, we have re-established exact coordinates and attitude.
Geordi, we're in position. Your status?
The warp bubble is contracting at a rate of
Fifteen metres per second. We're going to lose it in about four minutes.
It is time, Wesley.
We're ready, Commander.
Proceed.
I'll be in Engineering.
Let it go, Wesley. Let go of the anticipation, the expectations, the demands upon yourself. Let it all go. Leave it behind. Yes. The ability is there inside of you. You do not need to look for it.
Three minutes thirty seconds to life support failure.
The Traveller used his thoughts to alter warp fields. Thoughts became reality. Now I'm in a warp field. Could my thoughts have changed this reality? Come on, Beverly! What's the next step? What was I thinking at the moment Wesley's bubble formed? Dalen Quaice. He said all the people he'd known were gone. I thought of Jack, I went to see Wesley, the flash in Engineering. That's when it started. That's when I started losing everybody. My thoughts created this universe. Can they get me out of it again?
That information is not available.
I'm not talking to you. Click my heels together three times and I'm back in Kansas. Can it be that simple?
Two minutes, thirty seconds to life support failure.
Computer, hypothetical situation. A person is trapped inside of a static warp bubble. Determine a means of escape.
Escape would theoretically depend on establishing a stable threshold between the warp field and the outer environment.
Describe this threshold.
Negative. There are no known practical applications of this theory.
Extrapolate from theoretical database. How would it manifest itself?
A dynamic atmospheric disturbance of great intensity.
Disturbance? The vortex. They must have been trying to reach me! But how do I find it? Wesley, where do I go? Help me.
Stable threshold. They've been trying to create a stable threshold. Where are they trying to do it? Where did they do it the first time? Engineering!
One minute, thirty seconds to life support failure.
Engineering.
Failure in turboshaft four. Unable to proceed to main Engineering.
Just take me anywhere on deck thirty six!
We're losing the bubble!
Beverly!
Jean-Luc.  You. Do I have you to thank for getting me back?
No.
Jean-Luc, if I might ask, how many people are there on board?
One thousand and fourteen, including your guest, Doctor Quaice.
Is there something wrong with that count, Doctor?
No. That's the exact number there should be.
Captain, we have arrived at Tanuga Four. The away team has completed its survey of Doctor Apgar's work and is ready to return to the ship.
Good. Please. And feel free to examine the work of the other students too.
Ensign Williams' striking style is heavily influenced by geometric constructivism.
Lieutenant Wright has effectively fused the incongruities of the surrealists with the irrationality of Dadaism.
Interesting.
Oh, thank you. In what way?
While suggesting the free treatment of form usually attributed to Fauvism, this quite inappropriately attempts to juxtapose the disparate cubistic styles of Picasso and Leger. In addition, the use of colour suggests a haphazard mlange of clashing styles. Furthermore, the unsettling overtones of proto-Vulcan influences
Thank you, Mister Data.
You are welcome, sir. If I can be of further assistance
No! Thank you.
Captain's log, Stardate 43610.4. After completing a delivery of dicosilium to the Tanuga Four research station, our away team has received an update from Doctor Nel Apgar on his efforts to create Krieger Waves, a potentially valuable new power source.
Welcome back, Mister La Forge.
Thank you, sir.
Where's Commander Riker?
He's still on the station, sir. Doctor Apgar wanted to have a word with him.
Any problems?
Not with the scientific part of the mission, no, sir.
Riker to Enterprise. I'm ready to leave, now.
I'm sure Commander Riker will be able to explain everything, Captain.
O'BRIEN:Stand by, Commander. Engaging transport.
O'BRIEN:Transporter Room to Engineering. I have a power drain.
Transporter Room! Is Commander Riker aboard?
O'BRIEN:Not yet, Captain. I'm having trouble clearing the signal
O'BRIEN:Transporter Room to Bridge.
O'BRIEN:He's aboard.
Why do you sound so surprised, Mister O'Brien?
O'BRIEN:For a moment, we weren't sure you left the space station in time.
In time for what?
O'BRIEN:It just exploded, sir.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander Riker has informed me that Doctor Apgar was the only one aboard the space station when it exploded. We remain in orbit investigating the accident.
O'BRIEN:I've gone through the whole system, Captain. I can't find any malfunction in the transporter.
O'BRIEN:Nothing that would cause an explosion like that
Why was there a power drain before transport?
O'BRIEN:I don't know, sir.
I shall want an answer to that. I'm sure the Tanugans will too.
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir.
Captain, the radiation and debris are consistent with an overload of the station's reactor core.
Were there any indications of reactor core problems while you were on the station?
No, sir.
Number One? Mister La Forge indicated that this was not an entirely routine mission.
It's a long story, sir, but I'm sure it doesn't have anything to do with this accident.
Captain, Chief Investigator Krag of the Tanugan security force requests permission to beam aboard.
Granted. Will you escort him to the Bridge, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
Perhaps you had tell me as much as possible prior to his arrival, Number One.
I'm Lieutenant Worf, head of ship's Security. I will take you to the Captain.
Chief Investigator, welcome to the Enterprise. I'm Captain Picard. This is my First Officer, Commander William Riker.
Commander Riker, I am here to take you into custody.
Custody? On what charge?
Suspicion of murder.
Murder? Now wait a minute, you can't come on
Chief Investigator, we are perfectly willing to cooperate with you, but
Then release the prisoner for transportation to the planet.
Let's continue this discussion in private. Number One, you have the Bridge.
Just what is the evidence against my officer?
Two witnesses have come forward to describe Commander Riker's threats against Doctor Apgar.
Threats? I'm aware there was a private conversation between them.
Apparently, it was much more than just a private conversation, but he will have a chance to prove his innocence.
Investigator, in our system of jurisprudence, a man is innocent until proved guilty.
In ours, he is guilty until he is proved innocent, and you are under our jurisdiction. If I understand the Federation regulations on these matters, and I just happened to look them up before I
I am aware of Federation regulations, sir, and if you investigate them further, you will find the captain decides if extradition is warranted.
Are you saying it is not?
I'm saying, if there is sufficient cause to warrant a trial, I will release my officer into your custody.
Would you say you're close to your First Officer, Captain?
That question is irrelevant here.
Really, Captain, you cannot believe that. How can I expect a fair and impartial decision?
I must protect the rights of my officer.
I can appreciate that, but you will do it on the planet, not here. After all, what if you were suddenly to decide to leave this star system?
You have my word as a Starfleet officer that I will not.
Unacceptable. Captain, you will turn him over to me for interrogation now.
Interrogate him here.
We must recreate, step by step, moment by moment, all the events leading to the explosion. We will require access to all the witnesses, as well as the data from the lab's ground computers. It would be impossible to accomplish here.
Perhaps not. Mister Data, will you report to my Ready Room?
Aye, sir.
We may be able to assist you in recreating the events.
Commander Data, this is Chief Investigator Krag. Commander, by taking testimony from the away team and from witnesses provided by the Investigator, would it be possible to programme the Holodeck to recreate what happened on the science station?
It would require construction and design specifications, full orthographic representations of the Krieger equipment, as well as visual representations and voice analyses of the persons involved. But it is possible.
Very well. Arrangements will be made to provide you with all available information. I shall return shortly with our witnesses.
Commander, will you escort Investigator Krag to Transporter Room Three.
Ensign Crusher, Mister La Forge, we are going to recreate the research station here on the holodeck. I want you to work with Commander Data on the preparations. In addition, Commander La Forge and Commander Riker, I want you to give the computer detailed depositions of everything you saw, everything you heard while you were on board. Counsellor, I want you to assist me during this inquiry. My decision about the extradition will be based upon the evidence presented during these recreations.
Captain, may I have a word with you?
Under these circumstances, Number One, I think that would be inappropriate.
Second Officer:Second officer's log, Stardate 43611.6. Programming of the holodeck has taken eighteen hours eleven minutes, and is now complete. All participants have entered their depositions. Technical schematics and complete records from the lab's ground computers, as well as Doctor Apgar's personal logs, have been included. The recreations will have a nominal eight point seven percent margin of error.
Is there anything you'd like to say before we begin, Number One?
Just this. I'm not a murderer. I went to the Tanugan lab as an official representative of Starfleet. I acted accordingly. I was there to evaluate Doctor Apgar's progress in the development of a Krieger Wave converter. That's all I was interested in. Computer. Load deposition programme Riker one. Run the simulation.
Doctor Apgar, I'm Commander William Riker. Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge.
My assistant, Tayna. Well, let's get on with it, shall we?
Don't be in such a hurry, dear. Perhaps our guests would care for some refreshments.
My wife, Manua.
A pleasure to meet you, Mrs. Apgar. If you're prepared to get started, so are we.
Of course I'm prepared.
All right, why don't you give me the overview of your research while Mister La Forge and your assistant take a look at the experimental data.
Fine, whatever. I must say, Commander, I resent this early arrival. Starfleet will get its converter. I've had a few setbacks, that's all.
We're not here to pressure you, Doctor. We just want an update on your progress.
Tayna, show the Commander's assistant whatever he wants to see. Give him full access to our records.
Yes, Doctor. If you'll come with me. Our lambda field generator is on the planet since it requires a minimum of five thousand kilometres for the field to collimate.
Really, darling, you're being rude. After all, Commander Riker is willing to sit through all your prattle about Krieger Waves. Let's have a drink, Commander, and we'll hear all about Krieger Waves.
To your success, Doctor.
And the rewards that come with it.
Riker, what is Starfleet doing here anyway? My delivery wasn't scheduled for another three months.
We were in this sector on another mission, and since you had already contacted Starfleet about additional dicosilium, it seemed like a good opportunity.
How interesting. Tell us about this other mission.
It's just a study of a proto-star cloud. The Enterprise'll be back tomorrow.
The Enterprise just left you here?
We didn't want to inconvenience you. We've made arrangements for quarters on the planet.
I won't hear of such a thing. Commander, I insist you and Mister La Forge stay with us.
I hardly
I know that you would prefer to be alone with your very important work but I, for one, am glad for the company.
Good. I must apologise for my husband's lack of social graces. He may be one of the great scientific minds in the galaxy, but he does come up a bit short in other areas.
Wait a moment. Stop.
Computer, freeze programme.
Then it's your testimony that it was Mrs. Apgar's idea for you to spend the night aboard the space station.
It's my testimony and it's the truth.
Resume programme.
Our guest quarters aren't luxurious but I've tried to make this room warm and inviting.
I'll be very comfortable, thank you. Good night.
The environmental controls are over here.
I'm sure I'll find everything I need.
And the door shuts by touching this panel.
Mrs. Apgar.
This is my sanctuary. Privacy is very important on a small station. I'm left alone here. Often for hours.
It's late. I am tired.
Are you still tired, Commander?
Ma'am, excuse me. I really think that you ought to leave.
I knew I'd find you with him. Did you think I didn't notice how you looked at him? I'm not the fool you take me for.
Doctor.
Doctor, believe me. This has been a terrible mistake.
You won't get away with this. I'll see to it. I swear I will, Riker.
Freeze programme.
I didn't see Doctor Apgar until the following morning when he asked to see me alone. Commander La Forge returned to the Enterprise. Resume programme.
I suppose if I make a formal complaint, your report on my work won't be very good.
Doctor, this is going to have no impact on my report. It was a misunderstanding of the worst kind. We could straighten the entire thing out if you would ask Mrs. Apgar to join us.
My wife and my assistant have transported down to the planet. What are you going to put in your report, Riker? That there is no justification for all the extra dicosilium I've requested? That is why they sent you early, isn't it?
Doctor, I
I can explain why I needed it. They have no idea what my problems are. There are explanations for all of it.
I don't need explanations.
Then we have nothing further to say to each other.
I'll tell my Captain to expect your grievance.
Do that.
Riker to Enterprise. I'm ready to leave. Now.
O'BRIEN:Stand by, Commander. Engaging transport.
Freeze programme. Then I returned to the Enterprise.
And you have nothing further to add, Commander? Nothing about firing a phaser?
I never fired a phaser on the science station.
That's odd. Very odd. Captain Picard, is it not true that your sensors detected an energy drain just as Commander Riker began transport?
That's correct.
Have you been able to explain it?
Not to my knowledge.
We have. Our readings are quite clear about it. Information retrieved from the lab's ground computers indicate that a focused energy pulse was fired just as Commander Riker began transport. Furthermore, by analysing the angle and trajectory, we have determined that it came from the very spot Commander Riker was standing. So then, will you allow me to show you my recreation of the end of this story? A speculation, if you will. Computer, run hypothetical Krag one.
Riker to Enterprise. I'm ready to leave. Now.
O'BRIEN:Stand by, Commander. Engaging transport.
Freeze programme. Three seconds later, the station exploded.
The Tanugans are right. Something was fired at the reactor core just before transport.
The energy signature would seem to indicate a phaser-like blast.
Well, it wasn't the commander's phaser. It couldn't have been. There's another answer. We're just not seeing it.
Was there anything else in the lab capable of creating this kind of energy discharge?
Not that I saw. Besides, how do you account for the fact that it came from Commander's Riker's exact position. Damn it, I should have stayed with him.
Commander, sensors indicate a radiation burst on deck thirty nine, outside cargo bay twelve.
Source?
Unknown, sir.
Computer, identify type of radiation.
Emission is not consistent with any known radiation.
It is subsiding, sir.
What kind of radiation could do this? Make any sense to you?
I don't recognise it. Not even the main deflector puts out that kind of spillage.
Where would it be coming from?
I don't know, Wes, but whatever it is, it's capable of putting a hole in solid duranium.
In a sense we have already met Mrs. Apgar, so we shall dispense with introductions.
Mrs. Apgar, you understand the purpose of this hearing?
We understand how difficult this will be for you. If you need a recess, please, don't hesitate to ask.
Would you like to make a statement before we begin?
No. I just know he did it. He killed my husband.
Computer, load Manua simulation one.
Run programme.
If you greet them with such a long face they're going to assume something is wrong with the experiment.
I just need time. A little more time.
I'm certain they'll give you the time you need if you just show a little charm.
You do that so much better than I do.  Manua, someday I'll be able to reward you for all your patience. I'll get you everything you ever dreamed of.
I have all the reward I need. Now go on, I'll be right in.
Doctor Apgar?
I'm Commander William Riker. Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge.
My assistant, Tayna. Well, let's get on with it, shall we?
Don't be in such a hurry, dear. Perhaps our guests would like some refreshment?
My wife, Manua.
It's a pleasure to meet you, Manua.
I'm anxious to get started.
If you wish.
I must say I resent your early arrival, Commander I have much work to do.
Doctor, I'll do everything in my power to make this as painless as possible for both of us. Do you assist your husband in his work?
Oh, dear, no. I'm no scientist.
No, neither am I.
But I find this all fascinating, don't you?
Mister La Forge, why don't you take a look at the doctor's experimental data. Later, you can give me an overview.
Fine. Whatever. Starfleet will get its Krieger wave converter. These things take time. I've had a few setbacks, that's all.
Doctor, I'm not trying to put any pressure on you. I'm sure my report will only underscore the need for continued support of your research.
Tayna, I'll call up the records. Show the Commander's assistant whatever he wants to see.
Yes, Doctor. If you'll come with me? Our field generator is on the planet, since it requires a minimum of five thousand kilometres for the field to collimate.
Darling, let Tayna take care of that. I'm sure Commander Riker wants to hear how close you are to a breakthrough. I'll pour the two of you a drink and you can talk all about Krieger waves.
Commander.
To success.
Success.
Well, in a way, I suppose it's good that you're early. Manua's right, it gives me a chance to show you the progress we've been making.
I'd appreciate it if Commander La Forge and I could stay here until the Enterprise returns.
It's a little inconvenient.
It would help to accelerate the process.
Well, if you wish, Commander. Now, where shall I start? Well, first of all, you should know that I am very close to being able to collimate a Krieger field.
Our guest quarters are very modest.
Very charming. It has your touch.
The station is small, and we don't often have guests. I use this as my sanctuary.
Who do you need sanctuary from?
The environmental controls are here.
Commander, please. It's late and I'm tired.
A man more interested in Krieger waves than in a lovely woman like you. How is that possible?
My husband is one of the great minds in the galaxy and we love each other very much.
Please don't.
It must be very lonely. A princess in a very high tower.
Please, my husband will be looking for me.
Your sanctuary, remember?
Commander, don't, please!
She's lying! That never happened.
Freeze programme.
Please.
Captain, you know I would never act like that.
Commander Riker!
This isn't me. I wasn't the one who closed the door. I didn't proposition her and I certainly didn't try to rape her. Why are you doing this?
It's exactly what happened.
Will, come on, sit down.
Resume programme.
Please.
I knew you'd try this, Riker. Do you think I didn't notice how you looked at her? I'm not the fool you take me for.
You won't get away with this. Your career is over. I'll see to it. I swear I will, Riker.
If you report this, you'll be making a terrible mistake, Doctor. A terrible mistake.
Freeze programme.
Your career was safe. He was a scientist. In another day some fascinating bit of technical trivia would have distracted him. He would have forgotten about you and his complaint to Starfleet. Excuse me.
We'll, um, we'll take a short recess.
Why would she lie like that? She was lying. You could tell.
Will, I didn't sense any deception from her.
Then you think that I?
No! No, of course not. I know you. You don't have to convince me of anything.
We can't both be telling the truth.
It is the truth as each of you remembers it.
But her version puts a noose around my neck.
This is healing beautifully. I think you can work on strengthening these muscles again.
Security to Doctor Crusher. Evacuate. Repeat, evacuate. Radiation emissions are indicated in Sickbay.
It is definitely the same radiation that penetrated deck thirty nine. Highly focused, very powerful but of unknown origin.
If this should happen in the engine core or the anti-matter containment tanks, we'll be in big trouble, Captain.
Do you have any theories?
Captain, Data's noticed something that's too strange to be a coincidence.
The two radiation events aboard the Enterprise occurred five hours, twenty minutes and three seconds apart. The science station exploded yesterday at almost four times that interval.
There's a point zero zero one four second variance we haven't been able to explain yet.
So you're saying there's a connection between the radiation bursts and the explosion?
We do not have the evidence to support that conclusion at this time, Commander.
If they're right, we should be able to predict the next event.
We're expecting it in just over five hours.
Take every precaution to protect the ship's vital areas. If we haven't identified the source before the time interval, we'll leave orbit. If you perceive any further danger, advise me immediately.
We'll figure it out for you, Commander.
After the fight, Doctor Apgar came to find me he was very upset.
And he told you what happened?
Yes, he told me everything that happened.
Based on Tayna's deposition, we have recreated the incident in Commander Riker's quarters as Doctor Apgar described it to her. Computer.
Inspector, Inspector, this is hearsay. She wasn't a witness to this incident.
But Doctor Apgar is dead. Her statement is admissible according Tanugan law and I insist you consider it.
Well, we'll watch this evidence, and we'll weigh it accordingly.
Computer, run Tayna simulation three.
I knew I'd find the two of you together. Do you think I didn't notice how you were looking at each other? I'm not the fool you take me for.
I'm going to report this, Riker. You can count on that.
You're a dead man, Apgar. A dead man.
Freeze programme. And then Doctor Apgar came to find you?
Yes.
Run Tayna simulation four.
I want you to take Manua and beam down to Tanuga immediately.
But Doctor, if he threatened you, you shouldn't stay
I'm not leaving him here alone. He's capable of anything. I've got to protect our work.
I'll contact the authorities.
No. I'll take care of that.
Doctor, be careful.
It'll be all right. Go on.
Freeze programme. Then what happened?
I left the station with Manua. The next day, when I heard the station had exploded, I knew what had happened. He'd killed Doctor Apgar.
Thank you. You are excused.
Captain, I have established motive, method and opportunity. In any court in the Federation, that is sufficient to warrant the extradition of the accused. I await your decision forthwith.
I don't see any alternative, do you?
We both know Will's innocent.
Of course he's innocent. But as a Starfleet Captain, I can't allow myself the luxury of yielding to my personal feelings. The evidence warrants a trial. I'll have to allow extradition.
Do you think there's enough evidence to prove his innocence?
No.
Captain, I believe we have found the source of the radiation. Can you join us on the Bridge?
Acknowledged.
As you know, Captain, we are looking for a phenomenon that reoccurs every five hours, twenty minutes and three seconds.
The interval between radiation bursts.
We have found one such phenomenon on the planet's surface.
It's the field generator that Apgar during in his research. When it's fully charged, it automatically emits an energy pulse and then takes five hours, twenty minutes and three seconds to recharge itself.
It must have been left on after the explosion of the lab.
But why would a generator be affecting the Enterprise this way?
It should not be. It is a harmless lambda field generator.
But we knew that somehow it was related to our radiation bursts and then the pieces started just falling together.
We now know what is causing the bursts, and why the science station exploded, sir.
And we also know who killed Doctor Apgar.
Chief Inspector, we've watched the events replayed over and over again and I am impressed, and admittedly dismayed by the body of evidence against Commander Riker. But isn't it remarkable that with all the witnesses, all the different points of view of the events aboard the space station, we haven't seen what really happened?
I do not understand.
Allow me, with the help of Mister La Forge, to explain. Computer, load Manua programme one, time index fourteen four one. Play programme.
Fine. Whatever. Starfleet will get its Krieger wave converter. These things take time. I've had a few setbacks, that's all.
Freeze. Mrs. Apgar, this was from your deposition. It would seem to suggest that your husband had failed to create Krieger waves.
Yes, but he was very close to a breakthrough.
He said he needed more time. He was upset by our early arrival. But in fact I maintain he already had made that breakthrough and that he was lying to us.
On what basis?
For the last several hours, the Enterprise has been experiencing unusual radiation bursts. We've identified them as Krieger waves.
Krieger waves? But that's impossible. From where?
From right here. Inside the holodeck.
We recreated your science lab in every conceivable detail. Essentially, what was in the original lab is here.
Including the Krieger wave converter that Doctor Apgar claimed didn't work. Except it does work.
Your field generator on the planet surface has been sending out harmless energy charges, which this facsimile has been converting into Krieger waves.
But the holodeck can't create anything dangerous.
Well, it didn't. When you get down to basics, the converter is nothing more than a complex series of mirrors and reflective coils. The energy from the field generator down on the planet simply reflects off of elements in the convertor which turns it into highly focused Krieger waves.
And those same waves have been randomly striking different areas of our ship as we orbit the planet and our angle to the generator changes.
Why would Apgar lie about his success?
Computer, run Manua programme one, time code, fourteen three eight.
Manua, someday I'll be able reward you for all your patience. I'll get you everything you ever dreamed of.
I have all the reward I need.
Freeze programme. Run Riker programme two, time code, sixteen one zero.
To your success, doctor.
And the rewards that come with it.
Freeze.
I never said that.
Nevertheless, it seems clear that your husband was motivated to earn the kind of rewards that pleased you, Mrs. Apgar.
What's wrong with that?
Well, he wouldn't have earned great profits from his dealings with Starfleet. We were only interested in a new power source.
But if he could turn this into a weapon it would be worth a lot to the Romulans, the Ferengi and a few others. Now Doctor Apgar had been ordering extra dicosilium for months. That's a pretty good indication that he was trying to create larger reflective coils.
And when the away team arrived early he must have been worried that Starfleet was becoming suspicious. He needed more time to finish his work. Apgar said that each of the three versions. No doubt, he was afraid that Commander Riker might learn the truth and cut off his support prematurely. Discovering Commander Riker with his wife didn't help matters. I submit that he decided to murder Commander Riker.
Ridiculous.
Is it? Computer, run Tayna programme four, time index eighteen one four.
I'll contact the authorities.
No, I'll take care of that.
Freeze.
Tayna, exactly is Apgar doing here?
Activating the generator on the planet.
Why would he do that?
Maybe he was going to work on the converter, I don't know.
Maybe he was already thinking ahead to his next confrontation with Commander Riker. Computer, play Riker programme four, time index twenty four one.
What are you going to put in your report, Riker? That there's no justification for all the extra dicosilium I've requested? That is why they sent you early, isn't it?
Doctor.
I can explain why I needed it. They have no idea what my problems are. There are explanations for all of it.
I don't need explanations.
Freeze. To Apgar, this must have seemed as though Commander Riker were confirming his worst fears. And I believe it was now that he decided finally to kill him.
You forget, Picard, we know the energy pulse which blew up the reactor originated from Commander Riker's position, not Doctor Apgar's.
We are hypothesising that Doctor Apgar energised the converter at the moment of Commander Riker's beam-out, hoping to make his death look like a transporter accident. But something went wrong. The energy pulse hit the transporter beam and reflected back to the reactor, which caused the explosion.
An interesting hypothesis. But impossible to prove.
Not really. We know that the field generator on the planet has been repeating a discharge ever since the explosion. The intervals are like clockwork, except the explosion occurred point zero zero one four seconds after the initial discharge. And the only explanation for that variance is the time it would take the energy pulse to bounce back from the transporter beam to the reactor.
We've arranged a demonstration to illustrate. Mister La Forge, I think it's about time, isn't it?
Computer, load programme, La Forge one. Coordinate auto-engage time sequence. The next discharge from the field generator is scheduled to occur in just a few moments, and we've aligned the holodeck programme to recreate the final events as Commander Riker described them. Only this time our facsimile will automatically process the energy charge from the planet and reflect it just as the original convertor did before the explosion.
If we're correct, we'll know it instantly.
Auto-engage time sequence synchronised.
Then we have nothing further to say to each other.
I'll tell my Captain to expect your grievance.
Do that.
Riker to Enterprise. I'm ready to leave, now.
O'BRIEN:Stand by, Commander. Engaging transport.
Doctor Apgar killed himself during his attempt to kill Commander Riker.
Based on this new evidence, I withdraw my request for Commander Riker's extradition. Commander, my apologies.
Number One, have we any further business in the Tanuga system?
Not that I know of. I'd be more than willing to put it behind me.
Then perhaps you would do me the pleasure of getting this ship underway.
With pleasure, sir. Ensign Crusher, set course for Emila Two, warp three.
Course laid in, sir.
Engage.
Forward tubes armed and ready, Captain.
Fire.
A direct hit, sir.
The asteroid has shattered. However, the core is still intact and still on a collision course with Tessen Three.
Is it big enough to cause a threat?
Yes, sir. It is of sufficient size and density to cause planetwide damage.
Time to impact.
It will reach the upper atmosphere in forty four seconds and impact on the planet eleven seconds later.
Ready torpedoes.
Aye, sir.
Sir, the core is composed of nitrium and chrondite. It is unlikely another photon torpedo will be of any effect.
Mister Worf, prepare a tractor beam.
Aye, sir.
Thirty seconds to impact.
Captain, I am unable to get a positive lock with the tractor beam. There is magnetic field interference emanating from the core materials.
Activate a deflector dish. If we project a particle beam, we may be able to produce a disruptive nuclear effect within the core.
Aye, sir.
Impact in seventeen seconds.
Particle beam activated. The target has been destroyed, Captain.
The remaining debris is of no threat to the planet, sir.
Well done, everyone . Ensign, put us back on course for the Moselina system. Warp four as soon as we're clear of the debris field.
Aye, sir.
My instructions were clear.
They were not!
Before he was allowed to play, he was to place his soiled clothing in the garment reprocessor.
I was not!
I sense a touch of hostility here, gentlemen.
You were specifically told that.
You told me that yesterday, not today!
If I may suggest
You know very well the same rules apply today that
Please! Why not simply draw up a contract which clearly defines the duties of each family member.
You mean he tells me what he wants and I have to do it.
No, I means you both agree to your responsibilities. And when you've done the things that you've agreed to do, then you've earned the privilege to doing the things that you want to do. When he's cleaned his room, for instance, then perhaps he's earned a visit to the holodeck to fight his alien monsters.
You suggest bribery.
I suggest working out an equitable system with the rules clearly spelled out. For the child and the parent. You must make a list of your responsibilities, too. What would you like your father to promise, Alexander?
No yelling.
I do  I do not yell.
Well then you should have no trouble with that part. Why not go back to your quarters and talk this thing over? Decide on which points each of you wants in the contract.
Very well.
One day you'll learn to be glad your father cared enough about you to insist on rules. It may be hard to imagine right now, but eventually, most children come to appreciate their parents.
Riker to Counsellor Troi. Your mother's just come aboard.
On the other hand
Deanna, my dear! It's Mother!
Oh, I've got such deliciously exciting news, you're going to be absolutely thrilled! I'm getting married!
You know, with just a bit of redecorating here and there, this Ten Forward room should make a very nice wedding hall.
I beg your pardon?
Where else, my little one, but here amongst all my good friends and in the presence of my adored daughter.
Mother, where did you, when did you meet this man? Who is he? I mean, marriage? When did all this happen?
My poor, plodding, little Deanna, with her questions, questions, questions. Wherever did you inherit such pedestrian genes? What matters, my little one, is that your mother's happy.
Mother, if you're happy, then I'm happy for you. I only asked who he is, and where you met him. Those are not unusual questions.
He's such a wonderful man, and he has such good breeding, I tell you, he's absolute perfection.
Who is he?
He's Campio, Third Minister to the Conference Of Judges on the planet Kostolain. Royalty, my little one, naturally.
Naturally. I didn't know you'd ever been to Kostolain. Or was he on some diplomatic mission to Betazed?
Well, neither, actually. You see, we haven't exactly met yet, really. Oh, but the profiles we've exchanged. Why, they're in such accord that you could weep, my little one. You would weep at the harmony between us.
Mother, don't you think it would be a good idea if you actually met the man you're going to marry before committing to spend the rest of your life with him?
Deanna, I love you, but you do make everything sound like an epitaph.
I don't want to agree.
But you have to agree. That is what an agreement is. Counsellor Troi, excuse the intrusion, but we're having some difficulty drawing up our contract. Mrs. Troi.
He's not fair!
The boy is unreasonable.
Well, of course he's unreasonable. He's a child. And such a child. You know, making little boys reasonable only gives them pimples.
Alexander, this is my mother.
Alexander! What a wonderful name. You know, I once knew a tall, handsome warrior named Alexander. Oh, he utterly adored me. We went everywhere, simply everywhere. Have you been anywhere yet? Contract? What contract?
Between father and son. A fair and balanced way to achieve a mutual sense of order.
Well, how ghastly for you. And you're doing this to your own child, Mister Woof?
Mother!
It is Worf, Madam.
Contracts are usually between people who don't really trust one another. A child who is trusted becomes worthy of that trust.
Mother, will you kindly stay out of this?
And if he does not perform his contractual duties, I assume he will be chastised?
He will be sanctioned, yes.
And if you fail to perform your duties, what is the child supposed to do about it?
Mother, will you please
I? Not perform my duty?!
Alexander. Now life's true gift is the capacity to enjoy enjoyment. Now, have I arrived too late, or can you still smile?
Married? She's getting married?
Yes. If we stay on our present course, we should rendezvous with her intended groom in thirty one hours.
I will not continue have that woman continuing to use this ship for her convenience, simply because her daughter happens to be one of my officers.
Apparently, Deanna being on board is only part of the reason.
The other reason being?
She thinks the honour of giving away the bride should fall on you.
Permission for an on-board wedding is granted, Number One. Nothing would please me more than to give away Mrs. Troi.
Ah! My little warrior. And how are you this morning? Oh, I see. Being punished for something, are we?
It's just my regular time to meet with Counsellor Troi. She's not here yet.
Then you're early. That's very responsible of you.
No, I just wanted to be out of my room before
Before what? Now, if we're to be real friends, we've got to share only the truth.
Why?
Well, for one thing, it's easier. When you tell the truth, you never have to remember later what you lied about. But mostly, a true friend is a person you can always tell the truth to without worrying about it.
I wanted to leave before my father got back.
Oh.
I hate him. I wish my mother was here. But she died.
That's not very fair, is it.
All he cares about are rules. I'm supposed to do everything right all the time. I don't know how.
To tell you the truth, little warrior, neither do I. But, I do know one marvellous thing we can do with rules.
I'm supposed to wait for Counsellor Troi.
Exactly.
I'll bet you've never been to a colony of free spirits.
What do they do there?
Whatever they want. Artists, philosophers, free thinkers and people who don't quite fit other people's rules. Personally, I come for the mud baths. You, oh, you're going to adore the mud baths. Computer? I'm assuming you have the Parallax Colony of Shiralea VI?
That programme is available.
Oh, good. Then run it for us, dear.
What's that?
A Wind Dancer. He stands guard. You see, only those whose hearts are joyous may enter. Come on.
Fire sculptor. We'll chat with her later if you're not wearing anything flammable.
Hello. A few of us were just gathering together for our laughing hour. Would you care to come laugh with us?
Actually, we were about to experience a mud bath.
Were you? What an idea! My friends and I will join you. One can always laugh in the bath.
Do you ever drop one?
Oh, no. No, no. These are my worlds. I protect them. I am a master of worlds, and they fly only as I wish.  We're having guests for laughing hour. Would you care to join us!
YOUNG MAN:We'd love to!
YOUNG WOMAN:No, thank you.
YOUNG MAN:Yes.
YOUNG WOMAN:No.
YOUNG MAN:Why do you always say no when I say yes?
YOUNG WOMAN:I don't.
YOUNG MAN:You just did.
YOUNG WOMAN:There you go again. You are the most negative person!
Why are they arguing?
They're friends. They love contradiction. They thrive on challenge. They flourish in conflict.
Then why are they friends?
Who else are you going to fight with if not your friends?
Hold! What is the lesson for today?
Damned if we know. We're just here for some fun and a mud bath.
Every moment requires a purpose.
No, it doesn't.
Every purpose requires a plan.
He does this every day. Usually while everybody's food gets cold. It's rather boring.
The higher the fewer!
Well that's a conversation stopper if I ever heard one.
I am not!
Yes, you are.
I am not.
Excuse me! If you're going to argue, you should remember, the higher the fewer.
So, my little warrior wants to see more in life than just fighting. The mind opens, and in creeps wisdom.
Alexander. Be patient, she says.  Come. I can't believe this.
Isn't Alexander supposed to be with you?
He didn't show up for his appointment. I assumed he must still be here.
Computer, what is the location of Alexander Rozhenko?
Alexander Rozhenko is in holodeck two.
Is he there alone?
He is with Lwaxana Troi.
To all the creatures within us!
All the creatures within us?
Of course. Every one of us has a thousand different kinds of tiny people inside of us. And some of them want to get out and be wild, some want to be sad, or happy, or inventive or even just go dancing. That's why we all have so many different urges at different times. And all those different little people inside us, we must never be afraid to take them with us wherever we go. I mean, who knows when we may need one of them to pop up and rescue us from ourselves. Variety, my little Alex. The great secret is not the variety of life, it's the variety of us.
Are we ready for the entertainment?
Yes. Bring on the entertainment.
Mother.
Little one! Mister Woof. Come, join us.
Mother, I'm trying to help the boy learn the value of responsibility. You're not helping by giving him a lot of mixed messages.
I exposed you to all sorts of mixed messages when you were that age. You still turned out deadly dull. What are you so worried about?
Among other things, his relationship with his father. No more holodeck, Mother. Please. And why aren't you all absorbed in your wedding plans? It's only three days away.
I'm letting Mister Homn take care of all the mundane details. He knows my tastes.
Mother.
Deanna, there's absolutely nothing to do, you nosey little girl. Campio's already sent me his mother's wedding gown, which Mister Homn is now altering for me. Outside of that there really isn't anything else
Wedding gown? Mother, stop. You're telling me you're not going to be naked at your own wedding?
Campio is from a different planet with different traditions. He would not approve of a traditional Betazoid wedding, so I am happily adapting. Now it's as simple as that. I need some tea.
I can't believe I'm hearing this from the Heir to the Holy Rings of Betazed, holder of the Sacred Chalice of Rixx.
Oh, why can't I ever work this replicator?
Mother, I think it's time you tell me about this mysterious marriage to a man you've never met.
Computer, some jestral tea, please. Anyway, why shouldn't I get married if I choose to? You make everything into such a mystery. There is no mystery, Deanna, except about this Petrokian sausage.  The tea. All I wanted was a cup of tea. Oh dear, I think your replicator's having a nervous collapse.
A level-four diagnostic of the food replication systems has failed to detect any faults in the orientation terminals.
That may be, but we've still got over two hundred reports of malfunctioning replicators.
There is an energy fluctuation in one of the utility access corridors.
Well, we'd better look into it, whatever it is, before the captain decides to order dinner.
Yeah, dash six four. Here we are. Some kind of intermittent EM field pattern. Give me a hand with that, will you, Data? There's no plasma leakage, just a little negative ion charging.
Bad enough having to wear anything at my own wedding, but this? Perhaps if we lower the bodice? Raise the hemline, then. What a constant joy you are.
Mister Homn.
Alexander! My little warrior, come here. Come on. Give me a great big hug. Now, you're not escaping another appointment, are you?
No, ma'am.
Well, I suppose eventually we all have to live up to our obligations. Well now, tell me. What brings you here to brighten my day?
I wanted to say I'm sorry if I got you in any trouble.
That's very sweet, dear, but I really wasn't in any trouble. Until I saw this dress. Ugly, isn't it?
What's it for?
I'm getting married.
Why?
Are you sure my daughter didn't send you? Just a joke. People get married because they want to spend their lives with someone.
Their whole life? They must have to like that person a lot.
Well, if you're young and lucky, it'll be someone you like a lot, yes. And if you're older.
Are you very old?
I'm alone, Alex. And when you do get older and can no longer pick and choose from whatever may come your way, then you do what we call compromise. It keeps you from being afraid.
We have traced the failure to a data net interface which routes replicator selections to the correct subprocessors.
When we opened the panel, we discovered that the interface had been transformed into a gelatinous material that we haven't been able to identify.
We have an intermittent failure of the inertial damping system.
Take us out of warp, Ensign.
Primary attitude control has failed. Going to secondary systems.
We have lost helm control, sir.
Try a manual bypass of the damping systems.
Aye, sir.
Backup generators.
Coming online now.
How long before we regain attitude control?
We're almost there.
Ensign, put us back on course. Let's stay at impulse for now.
Did something hit us, Mister Worf?
Negative, sir.
The inertial dampers shouldn't fail without kicking in the automatic bypass. I want to know what went wrong. Analysis in thirty minutes.
The same thing that happened to the replicator happened to the stabiliser. The transfers in both systems were turned into this.
Some kind of corrosion?
We have not yet identified the substance, Commander.
Whatever it is, it looks like there's been a conversion process, transforming some of the metal into gelatinous residue. But what caused it is a mystery.
Replicators and stabilisers. Two totally unrelated systems.
Yes, sir. And we still don't know why the sensors didn't pick up the problems.
Let's run a mass spectrometer analysis and find out what this stuff is.
Transporter room one to Captain Picard. Minister Campio is beaming on board, sir.
I'll be right there. The bridegroom.
Ah, Campio! My dear, your compatibility profile didn't do you justice. I, of course, am Lwaxana, and any introductory compliments you'd care to make will be happily received.
Indeed, Mrs. Troi. You are even lovelier in person.
Now that worked just fine.
Now, now we don't wish to be too familiar at this early juncture.
Forgive this tardiness. Ship's business. Minister Campio, Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise. Welcome aboard.
I thank you and greet you with appreciation for permitting this wedding aboard your fine vessel.
Not at all, sir.
Campio, may I present my daughter? Deanna Troi, meet, well, your future stepfather, come to think of it.
Ah, yes. If I recall the profile, you are the ship's counsellor?
I am, sir.
And my escort, who need not be addressed in this company Protocol Master Erko.
Campio? Personally I adore all the ostentation I can get, but, Protocol Master?
I would not do you nor our benevolent hosts the disservice of failing to ensure that priorities are observed.
Oh, yes. How very thoughtful.
After all, it would be unpardonable to simply abandon ourselves to the moment, would it not?
Unpardonable.
Well, it looks like the only alloy common to both the replicator and the stabiliser is nitrium. Computer, analyze the nitrium content of both the affected stabiliser and replicator.
There is no nitrium present in the affected stabiliser or replicator.
There is none present in the residue, either.
According to the mass spectrometer, the elements in the residue have been broken down into simpler molecular structures.
That would suggest the nitrium has been organically metabolised.
Maybe that's it, Data. If a living organism ingested the nitrium.
This residue would be the waste left behind.
If that's true, if something's eating away at the nitrium on the ship. That means the dilithium chamber is vulnerable, as well as the power transfer conduits. We'd better get to Engineering.
Ha! Ha!
Eat, son.
Ha!
What are you doing? What is that noise?
Ha! It's my laughing hour. Ha! Ha!
That is enough, please. It is your dinner hour. Eat.
Ha! I promised to meet Mrs. Troi for another lesson in happy wisdom. Ha!
Will you stop doing that, please? Alexander, eat your food. Wisdom will wait, I assure you.
I promised. Should I break my promise, Father?
A Klingon ever breaks his word.
Where are you going?
You said no Klingon ever breaks his word.
I did not mean now. Now just sit down and eat.
I don't understand, Father. You're confusing me.
Understand later. Just eat.
Father? The higher, the fewer.
I don't wish to be authoritative, my dear, but Master Erko says that now is our proper time for discussion of certain details.
Well, I certainly don't wish to be considered anti-Erko, dear, but I did promise Alexander one more holodeck trip. Come along, my little love.
Surely there'll be other occasions for you to spend time with the boy.
My goodness, Campio. You and I are going to have the rest of our lives. I'll tell you what. I'll be back here with you in one hour exactly, all right?
Minister, the woman should not be addressing you in the familiar.
Mother, we have to talk.
Yes, we certainly do, dear, but not just now. Well, how, er how do I address him?
Mother, we've come for Alexander. Please, forgive the intrusion.
Preferably he should be called by his ministerial title.
Ah. I'll remember. Oh, Mister Homn. You make everybody comfortable until we get back. Especially the Minister, here. Now, I'll be back. One hour, darling. I'll see you then.
Mrs. Troi, it is Alexander's dinner hour.
How thoughtless of me. I guess we'll just have to have a little picnic before our mud bath.
We have business to deal with here. Leaving is simply not acceptable.
Oh, well can't we just pretend it's acceptable? We'll be back.
You are missing the point.
Alexander, you will return to our quarters and have dinner.
But we're going to go to the holodeck.
Mother, you're undermining every effort we're trying to make here.
Don't be absurd. You poor dear, don't they ever let you change those colourless outfits?
It is essential that we begin a discussion of the wedding procedures now.
Oh, Minister, darling, perhaps you and the Jerko here can come with us.
Lwaxana, this exceeds all boundaries.
Oh. Well, half hour, then. No longer, I promise. Mister Homn, your duties.
Counsellor Troi, have you no influence?
Ha!
Ha!
Lwaxana, if you will remain, I may allow the boy to stay
Definitely not!
Definitely not. My son is to return to quarters.
Nor may a servant be present during a prenuptial consultation.
Well, sir, I'm afraid even the bride won't be present for this one.
The dilithium chamber shows no anomalous readings.
So far, these transfer conduits are clean, too. Hold on, I'm getting something here. There's a severe energy fluctuation in this access panel.
What happened?
I was just juggling and I happened to catch one in my mouth. It tasted good, so I ate it. Before I knew it, I'd eaten up every one of my worlds. It never occurred to me that once they were gone, I'd have nothing left to juggle. If you ever have a world, plan ahead. Don't eat it.
Well, now. Almost time to get back.
Are you sad?
Of course not. I'm about to be a bride.
You know that man you're going to marry? He would never come and take a mud bath, would he.
Oh, he might. Probably not.
You know, maybe this would be a good time to get one of those little people that live inside of you to come out and tell you what to do, or help you, or something.
Alexander, what are you talking about?
I'm sorry.
No. No, don't you dare be sorry.
What's wrong?
Come along, Alexander. Let's not leave everyone waiting for us.
Once we saw that photonic trail moving through the wall, we realised we must be dealing with a metal parasite of some kind.
We believe the parasites came through the ship's hull after we destroyed the asteroid near Tessen Three.
Are they attacking anything other than nitrium alloy?
No, sir, not that we can tell. But we've got nitrium everywhere. The computers, the life support, the ventilation, the engines, even the dilithium chamber.
Mister Data, the asteroid we destroyed. That was rich in nitrium.
Aye, sir.
And that asteroid came from the Pelloris Field. If the rest of that field is rich in nitrium, it would make a natural feeding ground.
We should think about going back there. The parasites could possibly be lured back to the asteroids for a meal that's more appealing than we are.
Mister Data, how long to the field?
At warp nine, five hours twenty minutes, sir.
Picard to the Bridge
Riker here, sir.
Set a course for the Pelloris asteroid field, warp nine.
Aye, sir.
Captain, with our sensors unable to detect the parasites and given the speed with which they appear to be moving through the ship
We may not have five hours and twenty minutes. I'm aware of that. How can we slow them down?
In several cases, an exanogen gas barrier has been known to slow the progress of metal parasites.
They don't like cold, eh? Make it so.
The problem is finding them. As soon as we spot an energy fluctuation, they've already consumed all the nitrium and have moved on.
Primary power systems are going down. I've rerouted to the secondary generators.
Inform the Bridge. Mister Data, with me.
Bridge. Commander, do you have any suggestions on how we could encourage the parasites to leave the ship once we reach the Pelloris Field?
If we reconfigure a particle beam with a high concentration of nitrium, and project it toward one of the asteroids.
Then they would follow the beam like a trail of breadcrumbs. Very well.
Turbolift velocity is beginning to fluctuate, Captain.
Computer, stop at next level. Computer, acknowledge.
We have reached the bridge, sir.
Report, Number One.
Ventilation and life support are failing at random spots all over the ship.
Captain, we've dropped to warp five point seven.
Picard to Engineering.
La Forge here.
What's happening, Mister La Forge? We're losing speed.
The parasites must've gotten into the primary warp controllers, Captain. Trying to do a bypass patch to isolate the backup controllers but it looks like warp six is about the best I'm going to be able to give you.
At that speed, Mister La Forge, there won't be a ship left to reach the Pelloris Field. Do what you have to.
Working on it, sir.
Captain, we're losing life support on decks eleven and twelve.
Mister Worf, have security evacuate all personnel from those decks.
Aye, sir.
Engineering to Bridge. We've got warp six point five but I don't know how much more coaxing
We can do here.
We need more speed than that, Commander.
The matter-antimatter
Injectors are failing. I'm rerouting to secondary injector power now. Watch the antimatter containment for any system failure.
Atmospheric systems are down twenty seven percent. We're going below tolerable oxygen limits.
We must evacuate decks twenty through twenty four, Captain.
Make it so. Shut down life support to those decks.
Direct all evacuees to decks nine and ten.
Divert emergency life support to those decks.
Aye, sir.
Time to asteroid field?
If we maintain our current speed, two hours, twenty three minutes, sir.
Mister Data, the rest of us may lose consciousness. If we do, it will be your job to execute the plan as discussed.
Aye, sir.
Structural integrity of the dilithium chamber is at thirty four percent. Estimated breach in one minute.
Computer, transfer power from warp engines to life support.
Transfer complete.
Activate Bussard collector.
Activated. Breach of dilithium chamber in forty seconds.
Reconfigure hydrogen plasma mixture to include thirty percent nitrium.
Mixture complete.
Project emitter beam, heading zero two four mark zero four one.
Structural integrity of the dilithium chamber is at twenty eight percent and holding.
Mister Data?
The plan was successful, sir.
Well done. Mister Worf, coordinate your teams with Doctor Crusher and Commander La Forge. Assess damage and injury.
Aye, sir.
Captain's log, stardate 45733.6. Temporary repairs to the ship have been completed. Our attention now turns to matters of a more festive nature.
This is intolerable.
You'd think she'd at least get to her own wedding on time.
Minister! Minister! This is infamous. Infamous! We leave immediately!
Ah, heavenly. Every pore in my body tingles with contentment. Isn't it wonderful how things work out, Alexander? I wanted to teach you how to grab the joys of living, and you turned around and taught me not to let go of them. How very mutual.
We still have to learn how to live in the real world, Mother. All of us.
She's absolutely right, Alexander. But only when necessary.
You're just supposed to sit here?
Standard orbit, sir.
Lieutenant Yar is calling from Cargo Bay One, sir. Standing by to beam Ligonian welcoming party aboard.
On our way. You have the helm, Mister Data.
Cargo One. This should be an interesting experience.
Agreed. Not only are they closely humanoid, but their history has remarkable similarities to ours.
A highly structured society. and they're exceedingly proud.
They've insisted on using their own transporter device, sir.
It's their way, Lieutenant. Do they have our coordinates?
They have, sir, precisely, and they're standing by for your signal.
This is Captain Picard aboard the Starfleet vessel Enterprise. Please do us the honour of visiting our vessel.
I am Lutan.
Captain Jean-Luc Picard. Welcome aboard. These are my officers. My second in command, Commander William Riker. Ship's Counsellor, Deanna Troi. And my Security Officer, Lieutenant Natasha Yar.
A woman? Your Chief of Security?
Yes, Lutan, that is her expertise.
I am honoured to meet your officers. This is my Secondary, Hagon. A sample of the vaccine.
My duty, Lutan. I'm sorry, but I'm required to
Out of my way, woman.
How interesting. May we prove as surprising to you.
If I may suggest, sir, no apology. In their view, it would weaken us.
Nothing concealed, Captain. Would you care to accept it?
Unless you care to examine it further.
Absolutely not. This vaccine sample is a gift of life and we are honoured at receiving it. Would you do us the additional honour of now letting us entertain you? LUTAN Yes, yes. Please prepare it. We shall join you shortly.
I ask forgiveness.
They are strange alien beings. You bear no fault.
But the female?
May be exactly what I have needed.
Lutan, we are aware of many of your planet's achievements, and its unique similarity to an ancient Earth culture we all admire. On behalf of the Federation, therefore, I would like to present this token of our gratitude and friendship. From China's Sung Dynasty, Fourteenth Century.
Thirteenth Century, sir.
Ah, yes, indeed.
A most thoughtful gift. We are pleased. We of Ligon have been apprehensive about strangers. We are not technologically advanced as you, yet we possess something you do not. A vaccine which has been found to be an effective antidote to your dreaded Anchilles fever. If you respect our customs and if we see that respect, we will be friends. And we will make the antidote available to all who need it.
If you require respect from us, I am sure that you will see it.
Surrounded by such friendship, I feel no need for my guards. I will return shortly. Prepare to transport me then.
If there is something else, any further courtesy?
Would it possible to see one of your wondrous holodecks? We have heard how they are used to train your officers.
And used for many other things too. Commander Riker, perhaps you and Counsellor Troi will demonstrate.
Would it be possible for Lieutenant Yar to do so, Captain? Some demonstration of defence training?
We've noticed you're intrigued with her having security responsibilities. But these things are not at all unusual with us.
With us, it is the duty of women only to own the land, and the duty of men to protect and rule it.
Much the same has happened in human history too.
I'd like to do it, sir. As a sign of respect, perhaps.
Very well.
This way, please.
Aikido one.  It won't move until my actions activate it.
You can create people? Without a soul?
It's not a real person, Lutan. It has no life. Everything it does is controlled by computer. Who am I? Do you hear me?
But it will feel real when it hits you.
A force like that cannot possibly come from an image, Lutan.
Then you will show me, Hagon.
Thank you, Lieutenant. How very enlightening.
Aikido, vanish. I could create two, even three, but really one is enough. As you fight with it, it learns, and before long it knows exactly how to defeat you.
Even the extraordinary Lieutenant Yar?
It forces us to keep improving.
Your skill impresses me. I like you.
Farewell, my new friends of the noble Enterprise.
Understanding has made friends of many different people. We've had a good beginning, Lutan.
May I also extend a personal farewell to Lieutenant Yar? In your Federation terms.
Picard to Bridge. Red alert.
Shields up, photon torpedoes activated, sir.
What comm. contact have we had with them?
With their orbital control station, sir.
Make contact there and on all hailing frequencies. This is the Enterprise to Lutan and the Ligonian government. You have committed an unfriendly act. We insist that you reply immediately.
Photon torpedoes ready, sir.
Set them for a display blast a thousand metres short of the planet's surface.
Set.
Fire.
Do we know the source of their transporter beam?
Our own transporter people have tried to trace it, sir, but to no effect.
It reads similar to early Starfleet efforts but uses the Heglenian shift to convert matter and energy in different.  Which is actually not important at this time.
This is Captain Picard of the Enterprise with a message to Lutan, whom I have so far acknowledged as a friend. But you have now committed what our laws regard as an attack upon us. Since you have visited our vessel, you most certainly know the power of it. We insist that you reply to this message. Opinion, Counsellor. Will they injure Lieutenant Yar?
I believe not, sir. They seem mainly curious. In the case of Lutan, however, I did feel other needs.
What kind of needs?
Some sexual attraction from all the males. Lieutenant Yar is physically very attractive. But with Lutan I felt something else. Something more like avarice or ambition.
Other comments?
If I may, sir. One of the things about them in the briefing studies was their respect for patience.
Strongly emphasized. And you can see it in the precise, ritualistic way they do things. I'm worried about Lieutenant Yar too, sir, but maybe we should sit and wait them out.
Stardate 41235.32. I am concerned. Over a full day of waiting with no response from Lutan. We are now testing whether they are aware of our sensors probing them. So far, we believe we have pinpointed Lutan's government compound.
The vaccine, sir.
Yes, Doctor?
The vaccine. I'm a physician, I've seen death, but not on the scale this could mean.
You were testing if you can replicate the vaccine.
And we can't. The sample works fine when used as an injection, but it becomes unstable when we try to replicate it. You must get the vaccine from the planet, Captain. As much as you can. Immediately.
I'm aware of that, Doctor.
You've never had to watch a patient die from this disease.
That's true. But I have seen my share of death.
Damn. Where are the calluses we doctors are supposed to grow over our feelings?
Perhaps the good ones never get them.
May I speak about my son, Wesley?
What? Oh, yes. Alright.
He seems quite interested in starship operations. And speaking as a mother, of course, he seems quite knowledgeable.
Well, yes, speaking as a mother.
He's on the turbolift. You'll remember you ordered him to stay off of the Bridge.
Wesley?
I haven't stepped one foot on your Bridge, Captain.
It's all right, sir, I'll see that he leaves immediately.
No.
No?
Why don't you sit at Ops next to Lieutenant La Forge.
Sir?
Sir?
Is the whole ship deaf?! Sit down over there, young man. Temporarily.
Captain, we have more information from the briefing studies on Ligon.
Excuse me. Doctor Crusher, some of this may interest you. Lets hear the analysis.
It is a highly structured society in which people live by strict codes of honour. For example, what Lutan did is similar to what certain American Indians once did called counting coup. That's from an obscure language called French. Counting coup
Mister Data, the French language for centuries on Earth represented civilisation.
Indeed? But surely, sir
I suggest you drop it, Mister Data.
Yes, sir. Counting coup could be as simple as touching an enemy with a stick in battle, or taking something from him and escaping. It was considered extremely heroic.
And under these circumstances Lutan considers himself heroic, risking literally everything in the face of our superior power.
And it fits Lutan's personality profile as well. He has an abnormally high need for achievement. Self image to him is a function of what he thinks he's achieved. Those who set their standards too high can kill to meet them.
Why Tasha?
As a Starfleet Security Officer, she may have represented his riskiest prize.
Transmission from the planet surface, sir, Main viewer on.
Well, Lutan, what do you want?
You will display your image, please.
What is required is an image of Lieutenant Yar, well and
Are you making demands, Captain?
Sir. According to the Ligon Code of Honour, Lutan has done what he set out to do, achieve recognition for being daring and bold.
We've studied this in some depth now, sir. The proper thing for you to do now is to ask to get Tasha back.
Ask for her?
Politely, Captain.
And now, Lutan, you have boldly taken Lieutenant Yar from us, and we ask that you now please return her.
Then come visit us, Captain, and we will return her to you.
Commander.
Commander? That's quite formal.
So is this request, sir. We believe it would be preferable if the Captain led this away party.
Agreed, sir. Their customs concerning guests make it much preferable.
And I'm very much against that idea. Lutan is clearly a liar, and devious. Counsellor Troi has admitted she believes he's capable of killing. It is my duty to keep the Captain from danger, sir.
Except that Ligonian custom makes it clear that a visiting leader becomes an honoured guest. Not us, not second in command, him.
And the custom requires that Lutan should die rather than violate that.
Yes, it seems reasonable put that way. But I warn you, if you get hurt, I'll put you on report, Captain.
Welcome to my Centreplace, Captain Picard. Consider yourselves my honoured guests.
Every hospitality will be accorded you.
This is my First One, Yareena.
Lutan is a fortunate man. You've met Counsellor Troi.
Yes. As on your vessel, you have only to name whatever courtesy we can provide.
Then, sir, the courtesy of seeing Lieutenant Yar.
Lieutenant Yar will be returned to you tonight at a banquet I have arranged in your honour.
I'd like to see her now.
Bring Lieutenant Yar. I find it odd, Captain, that a man of your experience has such difficulty in understanding ordinary politeness.
Such as the politeness of saying please before abducting someone?
The expression please is used only when requesting the person back.
Yours is a different world.
With clear and simple ways deeply rooted in our culture. If you are willing to ask for Lieutenant Yar's return tonight in front of all, honour will be satisfied.
One can see the importance of honour here.
Honour is everything.
Have you been treated well, Lieutenant?
Fine, Captain but they're showing some signs of wear.
There isn't any need to be concerned, Captain. She's being well cared for.
My ship's company and I are certain of your gentle wisdom in that.
For a moment I thought I heard a threat implied. But that would be foolishness.
Something to be carefully avoided. I agree.
The festivities for her return to you are in preparation. Shall we retire till then?
Until tonight, Lutan.
Lutan, you have granted us hospitality and the safety of your Centreplace]. The gifts you give us are rare and precious. We thank you. And now, according with the customs of your ancestors, whom we honour and respect, I am here in peace to ask for the return of Lieutenant Yar.
Well spoken. There are those among my equals in this gathering who were wary of my approaching the Federation. I am proud to have taken this first step towards a treaty, and proud that we have something of great value to offer you, a priceless life-giving vaccine. The abduction I have done according to our custom, for all to see. Your conduct in this matter has been beyond exemplary, Captain Picard, but now that the moment has come, I find I cannot part with her.
You speak of a code of honour, but what you are saying now, according to our customs, is called an act of war.
This is not an act of war, but of love. I want Lieutenant Yar to become my First One.
I challenge your right of supercedence!
No woman has challenged supercedence for over two hundred years!
The right is mine and I will have it! Natasha Yar, I challenge you. A struggle to the death.
No! The challenge is unequivocally refused!
Then you shall have no treaty, no vaccine, and no Lieutenant Yar!
Ship's log, First Officer Riker reporting. We have been informed of the challenge to Lieutenant Yar, and are maintaining combat readiness round the clock. We are probing Lutan's compound deeply with our sensors now, still unnoticed.
Captain. Deanna.
Did you have any idea, Lieutenant, that Lutan was suddenly going to announce that he wanted you for his First One?
No, sir.
Tell me what you know about this?
Nothing, sir.
But it was a thrill. Lutan is such, such a basic male image and having him say he wants you
Yes, of course it made me feel good when he. Troi, I'm your friend and you tricked me.
Only so you'd think about it, completely and clearly.
We're all being manipulated, Lieutenant, myself most of all.
How simple all this would be without the Prime Directive.
That thought had passed through my mind, Counsellor.
What is this message from Starbase Fourteen?
It's showing the infection rates, percentage illness increases. The plague on Styris Four has flared up out of control.
They're estimating deaths in the millions, sir.
Captain Picard, come in.
I know I can win. Not that I'd take her life, of course, but I'd be glad to embarrass her. The idea of accusing me of taking
The plague?
If anything, even worse than we'd heard.
Which means they desperately need the vaccine, sir. And I know I can win this challenge.
You have nothing to prove anything here, Lieutenant.
But the vaccine is important in this case, sir.
Counsellor, you're the last person I'd expect to argue in favour of accepting the challenge.
Betazoid blood is also practical, Captain. The odds are very good she'd defeat Lutan's wife easily and you would win all the bargaining points you need.
The odds are.
You have pointed out yourself we are all at risk every day of every mission.
I want some explanations from Lutan.
Lutan, why are you so obsessed with this Lieutenant Yar? Surely Yareena is more desirable? Certainly she can offer you much more. She owns many things, many lands.
It's a great pity you began by abducting my Security Officer, Lutan, because I should tell you I do admire the hospitality you offer here.
I am in the grip of forces you do not understand.
Some of it I do understand. She is a rather lovely female.
You surprise me, Captain. What do you know of needs and feelings?
Nothing. Well, almost nothing in my position of ship's Captain.
I see.
But it puzzles me. If you feel that way for Tasha, why have you challenged her to a fight to the death?
Not I, Yareena. I am merely a spectator.
Ah, but you are also a man of great importance and wealth.
Great importance, perhaps, but he does
Ah, I see. You, too, understand the proper value of women.
We understand they are highly pleasant things, but after all, unimportant. Except for the land they own.
You are a truly clever person, Lutan. You stand to lose nothing, either way the challenge goes.
A code of honour protects one, Captain, like a magic cloak.
I will order Lieutenant Yar to fight. And may your cloak bring you all you deserve.
Come in.
Why that razor, my friend? Why not the one I adjusted to perfect efficiency?
Shaving is a human art form, Data. Technological perfection can shave too close.
Puzzling. How can anything be too efficient?
Thousands of things are too efficient, Data, at least for humans.
We always come back to the human equation.
Exactly. Have you continued to work on it?
Constantly, my friend. Particularly the humour. A man goes to a store to buy some kidneys.
Oh, no.
He says to the shopkeeper, I'd like a pound of kiddillies, please. The shopkeeper says to him, You mean kidneys, don't you? The man says, I said kiddillies, diddle I?
It's too old. And you didn't tell it very well.
How do you know when something is funny?
It's not explainable. You just do.
Perhaps it is you, Geordi. Includling the kiddillies, I've learned six hundred sixty two jokes, and you have not
Includling the kiddillies! Now, see, that's funny.
It was not meant as a joke. The tongue slipped.
Oh, boy.
Riker to Commander Data, Lieutenant La Forge. Report to the Transporter Room for away party duty.
First officer to Captain. Ready with the away personnel.
Lock in on this location.
Transporter locked in, sir.
Energise.
You've both seen the message about the plague?
And how badly the vaccine is needed. Yes, sir.
We need to know as much as possible about Ligonian armaments. Data, especially important is an analysis of their combat capabilities. Geordi, concentrate on their cutting edges, wherever applicable, durability, composition, weaknesses of material.
Aye, sir.
From any particular point of view, sir?
From the perspective of Lieutenant Yar using them in combat with Lutan's wife.
Most interesting. Could this be human joke number six hundred sixty three?
Negative, Data. That's a Captain's order.
Which makes it important to know which of these weapons are to be used.
And that won't be known until combat begins. You're right, Data. It does sound like a joke. With the power of the Enterprise, we could overwhelm this place easily, just take what we want.
I may not understand human humour, sir, but I am a Starfleet Academy graduate.
Which means, of course
understanding the Prime Directive, sir.
That is, ironically, what this is about. By our standards, the customs here, their code of honour, is the same kind of pompous, strutting charades that endangered our own species a few centuries ago. We evolved out of it because no one else imposed their own. I'm sorry, this is becoming a speech.
You're the Captain, sir. You're entitled.
Not entitled to ramble on about something everyone knows. Carry on.
Ship's log, Commander William Riker reporting. Continuing our appraisal of Ligonian technology. The Captain has made it clear he wants Lieutenant Yar beamed immediately to safety if her life should become endangered, and I fervently hope the rules of that contest make it possible.
Riker to Transporter Chief. Do we have our people on sensors yet?
Their general area, sir. Visual on screen now. As you see, we're still doing some fine tuning.
I've agreed to this meeting, but I see no point to it. You've accepted the challenge and there is nothing further to say.
I think you should know that there is no physical training anywhere that matches Starfleet, especially its security people.
And you should know that even though these contests are rare, we have a tradition of making ourselves capable of them.
Yareena, my acceptance had nothing to do with Lutan.
It has everything to do with Lutan. Lutan wants you to be his First One.
Impossible, Yareena. I am a career Starfleet officer.
How could you not love him? Every woman loves him.
I fight for the vaccine, That's the truth.
The truth is I will kill you if I can. And believe me, I can. There is nothing else to say.
In my world, it's a greater honour to refuse
You are on our world!
Captain, I'm your Counsellor. You brought me with you to Ligon to be of help.
Then help me, please. What is a way out of this?
With the vaccine? None.
The weapons in that room, Captain, are surprisingly flexible, durable, and deadly.
And light, as if they were made for women to use.
Some of them still have traces of blood and poison.
Poison?
Alkaloid base. Lethal.
What about those lengths of metal in the yard outside?
Uncertain, sir. However, joined together they would make a rectangle or square enclosing one hundred twenty one square metres. If put end to end vertically, they would make a pole forty four metres high, or two of twenty two.
Thank you, Data.
You're welcome, sir.
She won't budge. She loves him, without reservation. And she thinks I love him too.
Most interesting. Do you?
Of course I don't, Data. As Troi pointed out to me, I'm attracted to him but that is entirely different.
Riker to Captain.
Go ahead, Riker. We're alone.
We're fine tuned enough to see your hosts gathering in the open area outside, sir. Three of them are heading for your location.
Thank you, Number One. Lieutenant, do you still feel that you want to go through with this challenge? Do you judge your condition good?
I judge it excellent, sir.
Your weapons, Lieutenant Yar. You may choose your size.
Tasha, don't touch the spines. They're poisoned. If you're not careful, you could kill yourself.
These I understand.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. Captain Picard, faced with a critical need for a vaccine produced on this planet, has permitted Lieutenant Natasha Yar to engage in a fight to the death. I have yet to understand his reasoning or his plan.
Care to lend a hand? Sit at Ops.
Was I seen leaving?
They've got eyes only for the programme.
Captain Picard wanted no risk of our communications being overheard. You are to proceed now as he indicated.
Captain's orders too.
Does the Captain understand what you and Geordi reported about those weapons? They're razor sharp, split-second lethal.
I'm here to brief you on what he plans.
Any last minute instructions, sir?
Stay alive. We'll hope to do the rest.
I speak for Lutan. The rules are known. Let combat continue until there is a victor. It will not be interrupted.
Combatants, hold your positions. Return the weapon.
Careful, Yareena.
Move!
We're too late. She's growing cold.
Sorry, that clashes with my instructions.
Oh no. No.
Exactly what do you find unfair, Lutan? They fought to the death. You saw the final blow. You know the effects of your poison.
But what of your Lieutenant Yar? She is to become my First One now.
I certainly won't stop her, if she cares to claim that honour.
Remember, you now have all Yareena's lands and wealth now.
At least all has not been lost.
Riker to Captain.
Picard here.
Since you've fulfilled your agreement, Captain, can we now beam the vaccine aboard?
Ah, yes, of course.
No problem, Number One. Send down a medical team.
And to complete our business here, we are locked onto you.
Five to beam up. Energise.
First Officer:First Officer's log, Stardate 41235.6. I am returning the conn to Captain Picard as we begin loading the vaccine supply aboard. Shortly, we hope to signal mission complete.
Welcome back, Captain. You're wanted in the lounge.
This way, gentlemen.
She is not dead! There was no death combat. You violated our agreement. There will be no treaty, no vaccine!
The challenge was carried out. She died, Lutan.
There was no challenge! She lives!
I am a physician and saw her die. If you doubt this poison, why don't you test it on yourself?
Lutan, we can provide you with records of her death and how Doctor Crusher brought her back.
And at the instant of death, Lutan, a mating agreement dissolves.
But this is witchcraft, Yareena. To discard a mate in this manner
Is less painful than the one you selected for me.
Yareena, no.
Even as I battled, Hagon, I heard you calling out for me.
Yareena, be my First One.
All my land and all my goods, all I have is yours to rule.
How so sad for you. You've lost everything.
I have my honour.
It's such a waste.
Do you want him?
No. There would be complications.
Then I will have you as my Number Two. Take your place accordingly.
Well, as you see, Captain, you may excel in technology, but not in civilised behaviour.
What? Wesley.
Young Wesley, he'd been manning that station for me. I forgot.
Well, thanks again for manning one of our bridge stations, Wesley. We'll see that you have another chance.
Yes sir.
So what's the delay, Number One? Why aren't we warping out of here?
Set course for Styris Four, warp three.
Course laid in for Styris Four, sir.
Engage.
Geordi, have you found it yet?
Not yet. I'm starting to get some fumes. Ammonia, chlorine, potassium chloride.
I can feel the heat from here.
There it is.
How far?
About ten metres up the ODN line. Boy, it's hot. I'd say over two thousand degrees. I'm going in.
We're okay. I've activated the emergency suppression system.
All his vital functions are completely normal.
The interface unit is operating within expected parameters.
Why did he start coughing when he went through the gasses?
Psychosomatic response.
I feel like I'm actually here. I mean there, in the Jefferies tube. It's funny. When I saw the smoke, I couldn't help but cough.
No one else has reported so complete a sensory experience.
The interface is perfect for Geordi because his visor inputs allow the probe to transmit information directly into his cerebral cortex.
It looks like this is going to work. Geordi, I'd like to get the probe out of the Jefferies tube and onto the launch bay before we reach Marijne Seven.
Will do. Wait a minute.
Something's wrong. Can't get my left leg to work.
What is it?
The probe is designed to respond to any movement Geordi intends to make. When his brain sends a message to move his leg, the interface should move the probe instead.
Apparently the tactile sensors are too low. I will increase the input.
There it goes. I'm on my way down.
Why the body suit?
It provides tactile sensations so that Geordi can feel he's in the same environment as the probe.
Geordi, what's wrong?
Nothing. I'm seeing my reflection in a panel.
I forgot what a handsome guy I am.
Captain's log, stardate 47215.5. We are responding to a distress call from the science vessel Raman, which is apparently trapped inside the turbulent atmosphere of an unusual gas giant planet. We will use an experimental interface probe in our attempt to rescue it.
I have reviewed the vessel's mission plans. The Raman was to descend to the lower atmosphere, eleven thousand kilometres below its current position. The crew was to sample the atmosphere at that level, and then return to a safer orbit.
Something must have happened down there. Maybe the shields failed, or they had some kind of inversion reaction in the nacelles.
Any life signs?
Our biosensors are useless. There's too much interference in the atmosphere.
The crew might still be alive. There's no way we can tell from up here.
Will the probe be able to transmit through that interference?
The probe sends information via a focused particle beam. It should be able to cut through the interference.
But we may have to operate the probe at close to tolerance levels.
Will your nervous system be able to handle that much sensory input?
We've already tested the interface at about seventy percent tolerance.
We shouldn't have any trouble going higher. The safety override will kick in at about ninety eight percent tolerance, and that'll disengage the interface.
Captain, I am receiving a transmission from Starfleet Command. Admiral Holt.
In my ready room. The seven people on that ship are our first priority. Is the probe ready for launch?
Yes, sir.
Send it directly to the aft section of the Raman through the secondary air lock. That way it should put it just one bulkhead away from the Bridge.
I'll interface with the probe as soon as it's ready, take it the rest of the way from there.
Make it so.
Hello, Marcus.
Jean-Luc.
How's life on DS Three?
We're hosting this year's palio. The Ferengi have already been accused of trying to bribe the Breen pilot into throwing the race.
There's nothing unusual about that.
Nothing at all. I wish I could say I was just calling to catch up on things. Nine days ago, the Hera left here on a routine courier mission. We were in contact with them for five of those days. Then the ship disappeared without a trace.
The Hera?
I'm afraid so. The Excelsior and the Noble have been retracing its course for the last seventy two hours. Nothing. I'm going to keep them at it for another seventy two. But to be honest, I don't think another week would make any difference.
I'll inform Commander La Forge.
Mister Data, I'd like a word with Commander La Forge.
Aye, sir. I will be on the Bridge.
Geordi, I've just spoken with Starfleet. The Hera is missing.
Missing? My mother?
Captain La Forge has disappeared along with the rest of her crew.
I saw your father last week and your sister about ten days before that. I decided I missed my favourite son.
Your only son, Ma.
You're going to have to see the Hera again. We've got a lot of new faces on board, including a Chief Engineer who juices up the nacelles every chance she gets. I think she's the best technician in the fleet. Okay, second best.
Come in.
I'm sorry, I didn't know you were
Don't worry about it.
Maybe you should meet her. We're going to be in the same sector next week. Take a shuttle over and I'll introduce you.
My mother's always trying to find me a wife.
But if you're too busy, I'll see you at your father's birthday party. Remember, if you talk to him it's a surprise.
This came in about three weeks ago. I never got back to her.
Geordi, the probe has entered the planet's atmosphere and I'm ready to take it onto the ship. If you would like to take a couple of days off, I'll run the interface.
The interface is calibrated specifically to my visor's inputs. It would take you at least ten hours to convert it, and those crewmen down there can't wait.
The interface doesn't have to be fully compatible. I could run it right now. I wouldn't have the same control that you have, but it would still work.
Forget it. I'm the best person for the job, and there's no reason why we shouldn't proceed as planned.
The Hera is reason enough.
The Hera is missing, that's all. Now until I hear something different, my mother might just as well have taken the crew on an unscheduled holiday. Let's go.
Captain, the probe is through the airlock and in position aboard the Raman.
Picard to Commander Data. Report.
We are ready to bring the interface online, sir.
Proceed.
Activating the remote sensors. Initiating interface now.
Vital signs normal. Geordi, how do you feel?
Fine.
Do you have visual contact?
Not yet.
Data, turn up the input sensors. I'm not seeing anything.
Acknowledged.
Okay, I can see.
But no colours.
Increasing signal strength to seventy five percent of tolerance.
Ah, that's better.
Your pulse has gone up. Your nervous system probably has to get used to the input levels.
I'm excited, that's all, Doctor. This is like being on a roller coaster. Or a first date. I'm all right.
I'll be the judge of that. If your heart rate gets too high, we're going to disconnect you.
Understood.
It's a mess in here. There must be a breach in the hull someplace. I'm picking up atmospheric gasses in the corridor. Methane and ammonia, primarily. That break in the hull might even be on the Bridge itself. I'm heading towards the Bridge. I've found someone.
What is your position?
About twelve metres up the main corridor. He's trapped under some conduit from the bulkhead. I can't move it. I'm going to need more power to the tractor beam.
Go to eighty percent of tolerance, Data. No higher.
He's dead. Data, that door at the end of this corridor. What's it lead to?
A magnetic storage bay.
If there was a break in the Bridge, that'd be the safest place to go. Data, give me a phaser burst. Narrow focus, level four intensity.
I've found them. They're dead. All of them. There's a fire in here. Argh!
Data, disconnect! What happened? Geordi?
I don't know. My hands.
They're burned.
How did this happen?
There was some kind of energy discharge in the interface suit.
But shouldn't the safety overrides have prevented that?
Yes, but I have a theory why they didn't. The tolerance levels of the interface were set extremely high. I think Geordi's neural response to the input was so strong that it created a feedback loop.
The sensors that were transmitting the sensation of heat to my hands must've overloaded.
The crew of the Raman are dead. I would like to retrieve them and their vessel, but not if it means putting Geordi's safety at risk.
If we turn down the sensory input on the probe, I should be fine. Seven people lost their lives down there, Captain. We should at least retrieve the information they were collecting.
Doctor?
If we operate the interface at lower input levels, I'd say the risk is acceptable.
Picard to Riker.
Riker here.
We will proceed with the probe.
We'll have to take it into the Raman's auxiliary control room. Their Bridge is too badly damaged.
How long before you have it in position?
A couple of hours. We have to cut through the bulkhead.
Acknowledged.
Well, it looks like you'll have time to recuperate.
Yeah. There's something I've got to do anyway.
How are you, Dad?
DR LA FORGE:As well as expected, under the circumstances. Are you okay?
Yeah.
DR LA FORGE:I spoke with your sister this morning. She said she'll be in touch with you in a few days. Right now, she's pretty upset. The service for the Hera will probably be on Vulcan. Most of the crew was from there. But your sister and I want to have a private ceremony.
Dad. Don't you think everybody's jumping the gun here? Last I heard there were still two starships out there looking for them. They've found no debris, no residual warp distortion.
DR LA FORGE:And no ship.
Not yet, but that doesn't mean they won't.
DR LA FORGE:Starfleet is considering the Hera lost. The search isn't much more than a formality at this point. Geordi, your mother's gone.
Yeah, well you can think that if you want. But until I see some hard evidence, I'm not going to give up hope.
DR LA FORGE:All right, Geordi. Call me if you need anything.
Come in.
Hey, Data. Still working?
No. I have completed the adjustments on the interface. I am now waiting for Commander Riker to finish moving the probe. Do you need to be comforted?
No. I was just passing by. I was wondering what you were up to.
I am using the time to catch up on my study of poetry.
Data, there's nothing on the screen.
That is not entirely correct. While it is true the display is currently blank, this emptiness has a poetic meaning. Therefore it cannot be considered nothing as such.
Says who?
The ancient Doosodarians. Much of their poetry contained such lacunae or empty spaces. Often these pauses measured several days in length, during which poet and audience were encouraged to fully acknowledge the emptiness of the experience.
I remember a few lectures from Starfleet Academy that seemed like that.
Are you certain you do not wish to talk about your mother?
Why would you ask that?
You are no doubt feeling emotional distress as a result of her disappearance. While you claim to be just passing by, that is most likely an excuse to start a conversation about this uncomfortable subject. Am I correct?
No, Data. Sometimes just passing by means, just passing by.
Then I apologise for my premature assumption. This particular poem has a lacuna of forty seven minutes. You may experience the emptiness with me if you wish.
Thanks.  You know, Data, maybe you gave up a little too easily.
I do not understand.
Well, when I said just passing by means just passing by, I really didn't mean it.
My initial assumption was correct. You do wish to speak of your mother.
Am I crazy to think that she's still alive?
Your sanity is not in question. However, your evaluation of the available information is biased.
She's a starship captain. She's gotten herself into and out of impossible situations before. Why should this be any different?
Disappearances fitting the profile of the Hera have rarely ended with the safe recovery of ship and crew.
Well that makes me feel much better. Look, I'm sorry, Data. I didn't mean to snap at you.
I am not offended. You are upset. Your reactions are not surprising.
It's just that, if she really is dead, I don't know what I'm going to do.
We're receiving the probe's telemetry.
The input levels are currently at fifty three percent of tolerance.
That's too low, Data. I won't be able to do anything down there.
I want to start with as wide a margin of safety as possible. We can adjust upward later. Ready?
Go ahead.
Initiating interface.
I can't see anything.
I am increasing the input now.
Yeah. Yeah, that's better, but I need more.
Is this level sufficient? Geordi? Geordi, do you hear me?
Mom? Mom, is it you?
Is it you?
Oh, I forgot. All you can see is this probe. Yes, it's me. I'm actually on the Enterprise. I'm interfaced with this probe.
Geordi, who are you speaking to? What are you seeing?
But is it really you?
Yes, Geordi. It's mom.
But bow can that be? I mean, how is it possible?
There's no time to explain. We have to go down.
Down where?
The surface.
Geordi, report.
Hang on, Doctor. Why? Why do we have to go down to the surface?
We're dying.
We? The Hera? You mean the Hera is down there?
We're disconnecting you right now.
No, wait.
We need your help. I need your help. Geordi
Mom.
The cut off has been automatically activated.
He's in neural shock.
The sensory overload didn't cause any permanent damage, but I wouldn't want to expose his brain to that kind of stimulus again.
Is there any indication what caused this hallucination?
His brain functions are normal.
I told you, I wasn't hallucinating.
Geordi, I have analysed the probe's sensor logs. There are no record to indicate the presence of a living human on board the Raman.
Well she wasn't actually there. Her ship is down on the surface.
So you believe that what you saw was some kind of transmission?
Somehow she has managed to communicate with me.
We have no indication of a transmission of any kind.
Maybe I'm the only one who can detect it because I'm interfaced with the probe.
The probe does allow Geordi to sense quantum fluctuations, subspace anomalies, and other phenomenon not perceptible by any other kind of sensors.
Granted, but how could he perceive his mother visually as if she were standing there in the room?
I'm not sure, I do know that our brains weren't designed to process the kind of sensory information Geordi was getting. When the brain receives something it can't understand, it interprets the input as best it can, sometimes as a smell or a sound, sometimes visually.
You see?
But Geordi, I'm not saying that your mother was really communicating with you. I'm just trying to give you a reason why you might've thought that she was.
Look, I'm telling you my mother's ship is trapped down there and we've got to help them.
Geordi, the Hera's last reported location was three hundred light years away. How could it end up here?
If the Hera is on the surface, its hull could not possibly withstand the pressure of the atmosphere.
Well at least let me go back down there just to be sure.
I do not recommend that he use the interface again. The sensory overload almost killed you.
I'll be all right.
No, no, I'm sorry, Geordi. I'm not prepared to risk your life. Data, find another way of salvaging the Raman. I want an alternate plan in two hours.
Geordi, I'd like you to talk to Counsellor Troi. She's expecting you.
Aye, sir.
What's your mother like, Geordi?
If you think I'm going to start talking about my childhood, Counsellor, you're way off.
That's not what I asked.
Well, she's, she's brilliant. Funny. She's incredibly perceptive. She knows people. Knows what they're all about even before they open their mouths. She's always been that way. She's a real good judge of character.
When was the last time you saw her?
About seven months ago, when she first took command of the Hera. I went to a party she had for her crew. She wanted me to come over and see her, but I was really busy at the time. I mean I suppose I could have made the time to go and see her, but, you know, I just didn't think that. I mean, you know, I, I didn't think that
You didn't think it would be your last chance to see her.
That's not what I was going to say.
I want to suggest something. Call it a theory, all right?
All right.
You're worried about the disappearance of your mother, guilty that you didn't see her when you had the chance, so you're unwilling to consider that she might be dead. Your need to believe she's alive is so strong that it manifests itself as a physical image.
But she told me she's trapped on that planet, that she's in danger. Now, if this was some kind of wish fulfillment, don't you think I'd be fantasising her safe and sound?
No. Because that would be the end of your fantasy. You'd know it wasn't true. The more involved and complicated and unending your story is, the longer you can believe your mother's still alive.
Yeah, well, that's your theory, Counsellor. I've got one of my own.
I have been exploring the possibility of using a tractor beam to pull the Raman from the atmosphere. However, the high level of interference prevents a positive lock.
If we set up some sort of relay system?
That is my conclusion as well, Commander. Two shuttlecraft, staggered between the Enterprise and the Raman, with their shields adjusted to refocus the tractor beam.
Can we get the shuttles close enough without danger? Mister La Forge.
Sure. Yeah. As long as we keep them both above the troposphere, that'll be all right.
Then in that case
But what about the Hera? We'd be leaving my mother and her crew stranded on the planet.
Commander.
I've been thinking about this. A couple of weeks ago I got a message from my mother. She said she had a new Chief Engineer who had been experimenting with the warp drive. Now, I've seen the Hera. It uses trionic initiators in the warp coil. They have a reputation of strange side effects, especially when you start playing around with them.
There have been reports of warp bubbles and other subspace deformations.
So, what if that's what happened? Not a warp bubble, but a subspace funnel.
Connecting two points through subspace?
Well the Hera could have accidentally created a distortion that emptied out right here at Marijne Seven.
Why here?
The Hera passed near this planet just ten days ago. There's an awful lot of subspace disturbance in the atmosphere. The ship could've accidentally picked up some residual traces that directed the funnel right back here.
So the Hera's in one piece somewhere out there?
Maybe it's being surrounded by some kind of warp field, but who knows for how long?
Mister La Forge, do you have any evidence to support this hypothesis?
I did pick up some pretty strange subspace readings when I was interfaced with the probe.
Geordi, that could have been anything.
Yeah, but I talked to her, Commander. She asked me to bring the Raman closer to the planet.
Mister Data, is any of this possible?
Yes, sir. However, it is highly unlikely.
How unlikely?
Nearly impossible, sir.
let's proceed with the shuttle plan.
Captain
Dismissed. Mister La Forge.
I want you to know that I am not unsympathetic to what you're going through. Your mother's disappearance is tragic, but I cannot risk your safety on the basis of a dubious hypothesis.
Captain, if I'm right and there's just one chance in a million that she's alive
I'm sorry, Geordi. My decision is made.
I understand, sir.
We'll be in position to use the tractor beam in less than an hour.
You didn't come all the way down here to tell me that.
No, I didn't. Geordi, I may have seemed a little harsh about the situation aboard the Raman. I just don't like the idea of one of my best officers putting himself in unnecessary danger.
I guess I feel like I should be the one to decide whether it's unnecessary or not.
My mother died when I was a baby. All I have is pictures, and the stories that my father used to tell me about her. I begged him to tell those stories over and over. When I was five and I went to school, I started to tell my new friends those same stories, pretending that she was alive. Then I started believing that she was alive, that she'd just gone away, that she was coming back. The teacher got wind of this, and she and my father had this talk with me. They told me it was important to accept the fact that my mother was dead and that she wasn't coming back. And all the hoping in the world wouldn't make it so. In my mind, that was the day that my mother actually died. I cried all that night. But after that, it started feeling better.
Your mother was dead. There was proof. There was a body, and a funeral. It was a reality.
Geordi.
If I could see a body, if there were wreckage, I could accept it, but my mother has just disappeared. And now, there's a possibility that she is alive. And I'm not going to quit. Not yet.
I suspected you would attempt to operate the interface alone.
Did you?
I am familiar enough with your behaviour patterns to predict certain decisions.
Well I guess you know me pretty well.
You are disobeying the Captain.
I can't just sit back and do nothing when I know that my mother might be down on that planet.
I can not allow you to endanger your well-being.
Data, if I leave without knowing for sure, then I'll have to live with that for the rest of my life, wondering if I left her to die. I couldn't do that. That's why I've got to do this.
I could have you confined to quarters for the duration of the mission.
If that's what you need to do, Data, then do it. Because nothing short of that is going to stop me from trying to save my mother.
What are you doing?
I will monitor the interface and attempt to keep you safe. I can not have you confined to quarters for something you have not yet done.
You know we could both get in a lot of trouble for this.
There is a high degree of probability that you are correct.
Thanks, Data.
However, I do have a request.
Yeah? What's that?
I would ask you to consider the possibility that what you see is not real.
I will. I promise.
I am establishing the interface.
Mom? Mom?
Hello, Geordi.
Mom, how did you get here?
I'm not really with you, Geordi. I'm on my ship, on the surface. We were pulled into a warp funnel.
That's just what I thought. How are we communicating?
We found a way to send a subspace signal that could cut through the atmospheric interference.
Geordi, are you seeing the image of your mother?
Yes, and she's just
Confirmed everything I've been saying.
I am reading unusual subspace energy in your vicinity, similar to what the probe sensor recorded the first time you encountered your mother.
That's how she's communicating with me. It's the only kind of signal they could send that could cut through the interference.
We need your help.
I've been thinking about this. I'm going to take the Raman into a low stationary orbit and initiate an inverse warp cascade.
Why?
The subspace distortion from the cascade should reverse the warp funnel. Your ship will end up right back where it started.
Geordi, the atmosphere becomes increasingly turbulent the farther down you go. You may not be able to bring the Raman close enough to the Hera before being destroyed.
I have to try, Data.
We're running out of time.
Shields back online. We're starting our descent. Thank God.
Thank God?
That you're alive. That I was right about all of this. I can't wait to call Dad. He and Ariana had given up.
We're going home.
Well, eventually, yeah. Data, everything's fading in and out.
I'm losing the interface.
The probe is descending out of range.
You'll have to turn up the input gain to maintain my connection.
We are already at seventy five percent of tolerance.
